_	However, in 2006 the government de-registered the FDD on the grounds that it had failed to submit an annual report.
_	"He also wanted the recently released film "Mohammad, Messenger of God", to be banned on the grounds that it is sacrilegious.
_	He made an Application (Motion) in the Supreme Court of Ontario to declare the election invalid on the grounds that the government of Premier David Peterson failed to ensure the "Equal access to goods and services as any other business or any other person" for all political parties and all candidates as stipulated by the Ontario Election Finances Act.
_	As Bareil's condition worsens, Kira asks Bashir replace the remainder of his damaged brain with positronic matrices, but Bashir refuses on the grounds that it will remove any 'spark of life' that Bareil has left.
_	For many years, media on Du and his exploits were officially banned in China on the grounds that they encourage criminality.
_	However, his lawyers petitioned the Home Secretary, Henry Brooke, on the grounds that Simcox was still severely injured from his self-inflicted wounds, could not walk, and would probably have to be hanged in a wheelchair.
_	On final appeal, the Supreme Court of Canada ruled in favour of the program on the grounds that segregation of this workplace is a step towards equality in Canada.
_	After 18 months of litigation, a judge dismissed the suit on the grounds that the Sultan had sovereign immunity as head of state.
_	Jindal opposes the Fairness Doctrine on the grounds that it is a violation of the Constitution's guarantee of free speech and vowed protection of property rights.
_	In 2017 he led a group of priests calling for the repeal or amendment of the Law for Equal Opportunities, on the grounds that it had in practice concentrated exclusively on the promotion of the rights of sexual minorities.
_	The Church of Scientology publicly classifies itself as a religion, and some scholars consider it a new religious movement, but that claim has been challenged for decades on the grounds that the Church operates more like a for-profit business than a church.
_	Also the Palestinian Authority agreed to never recognize the unilateral declaration of independence by Kosovo on the grounds that it was illegal and that it violated international law.
_	Vladimir Petrov applied for political asylum in 1954, on the grounds that he could provide information regarding a Soviet spy ring operating out of the Soviet Embassy in Australia.
_	Following the death of party founder Morgan Tsvangirai in early 2018 Khupe opposed the ascent of Nelson Chamisa as leader of the MDC-T on the grounds that she was the only one of its three Vice Presidents elected by congress, whereas Chamisa and the third vice president Elias Mudzuri had been appointed by Tsvangirai.
_	The editor of "Cyrulik Warszawski" (Koc was an initiator and an organiser of the comical journal) was using Koc's generosity to support the magazine, which might cast a shadow over the new political system, on the grounds that budget money was used for political purposes.
_	Britain dropped the earlier established recommendations by the Mandate Commission on the grounds that those recommendations should be directed to the Turkish Government and not the Iraqi Government, Assyrians from the Hakkâri and Tur Abdin originally, escaped and have no intentions of returning to Turkey.
_	Kessler dismissed him on the grounds that he was too divisive, and he was succeeded by John Maurice Shaftesley.
_	CBS banned it entirely, on the grounds that it contained "medical advice" which could lead listeners to believe that molasses was "good for sexual debility, insomnia, nerves and underweight condition."
_	The Society also called for a boycott of Jewish shops in Cairo, on the grounds that Egyptian Jews were financing Zionist groups in Palestine.
_	Meeker sat on the jury in the first trial, which resulted in a hung jury, with Meeker and another man holding out for acquittal on the grounds that Leschi was a combatant in wartime.
_	They justify the state on the grounds that it is the logical consequence of adhering to the non-aggression principle and argue that anarchism is immoral because it implies that the non-aggression principle is optional, that the enforcement of laws under anarchism is open to competition.
_	The spread of the feast, by now with the adjective "Immaculate" attached to its title, met opposition on the part of some, on the grounds that sanctification was possible only after conception.
_	The railroad company, which had opposed the law on the grounds that it would require the purchase of more railcars, had been previously informed of Plessy's racial lineage, and the intent to challenge the law.
_	Not only was Aubrey not punished for his actions, he was congratulated by the king, on the grounds that an assault on the king's officers was the same as an assault on the king's own person.
_	Such arguments were ultimately rejected on the grounds that a socialist union would have a tiny number of members so long as socialists remained in a minority, but when socialists attained a majority all unions would become socialist unions by having socialists members.
_	By 1344 Bishop Grandisson and the Arches court of Canterbury had ordered the friars to demolish their chapel on the grounds that it had been built on a site "belonging to the Abbot and Convent of Torre".
_	He was almost immediately invited to become the teacher at the Boston church, but he refused the invitation on the grounds that the congregation had not separated from the Church of England.
_	In 2012 his conviction was quashed on appeal on the grounds that his confession was obtained by torture.
_	The film's director Amer Shomali was unable to attend a screening of the film at the Human Rights Watch International Film Festival in New York City when he was denied entry to Jerusalem by the Israeli government on the grounds that he was a security threat, and was therefore unable to attain a U.S. Visa.
_	Japan later claimed that the Cairo Declaration and the Potsdam Declaration did not apply to the islands on the grounds that they had never belonged to Russia or been claimed by it since the establishment of diplomatic relations between the two countries in 1855, and thus they were not among the territories acquired by Japan "by violence and greed".
_	The House of Commons successfully amended it so as not to apply to Scotland, on the grounds that Scottish common law was sufficiently stringent.
_	In 2007, a plan to develop a $400 million eco-tourism resort east of Kin Kin was rejected by the Government of Queensland on the grounds that the development was not part of the regional planning document.
_	By 1978, in response to the extensive criticism of pull-outs on the grounds that they were asynchronous with the instruction occurring in , another option for providing assistance to students was introduced, the school wide approach.
_	Benedict XIV maintained this decision of his predecessor on the grounds that Clement's life was little known, that he had never obtained public cultus in the Church, and that some of his doctrines were, if not erroneous, at least suspect.
_	In October 1977 after the police decided, under the Public Order Act 1936, to ban a National Front march through Hyde town centre on the grounds that it was likely to be a focus of "serious disturbances", Webster announced that there would be two NF marches, the second being conducted by him alone.
_	When the novel ends, Jackrum has reunited with her long-lost son on the advice of Polly, although she has apparently introduced herself as his father rather than his mother, on the grounds that a fat old woman showing up claiming to be his mother would just be an inconvenience, but a distinguished sergeant-major claiming to be his father would be something to be proud of.
_	He served until March 16, 1854 when the Senate resolved that he was not entitled to the seat on the grounds that he had been legally appointed by the Governor of Vermont when the Vermont General Assembly was not in session, but that the General Assembly had not acted to fill the vacancy at its subsequent session, as required by law.
_	The resolution opposed these rankings on the grounds that they "fail to account for the many conditions affecting crime rates" and "divert attention from the individual and community characteristics that elevate crime in all cities", though it did not provide sources or further elaborate on these claims.
_	In the era's namesake case of "Lochner v. New York" (1905), the Court struck down a New York State law limiting the number of hours bakers could work on the grounds that it violated the bakers' "right to contract".
_	The decision was made on the grounds that it was of national importance as a well-preserved and documented settlement showing the evolution from a pre-crofting to a crofting economy, and which therefore has the potential to provide information about the Scottish rural economy and society in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries.
_	In the movie, anti-Irish sentiment is implied to be an element of party policy, Prothero mocks a member of the technical staff on his show as "that Paddy" and Creedy views Finch with suspicion on the grounds that Finch's mother was Irish and then gloats about the death toll in Ireland from the "St. Mary's Virus", although the outbreak in Ireland may have been an unintended result of infected British citizens travelling to the Irish Republic.
_	20th-century anthropologists largely reject the notion that all human societies must pass through the same stages in the same order, on the grounds that such a notion does not fit the empirical facts.
_	Despite this, the committee recommended inclusion of an elector's date of birth in the elector lists "on the grounds that this would provide a further safeguard against electoral fraud, especially in cases where a prospective voter presents himself or herself at a poll without adequate identification", and this was included in the committee stage in the House of Commons.
_	Several tens of thousands of organisations were investigated by the Intelligence Bureau in the first year of the administration, on the grounds that they were slowing economic growth.
_	In March 2009, Douban removed art paintings of the Renaissance on the grounds that they contained 'pornographic' elements.
_	The HBC later claimed him for its own and based its claim to Port Nelson on the grounds that Benjamin had arrived before the French party.
_	The Australian Broadcasting Tribunal knocked back the application, firstly on the grounds that it could not allow the leasing of stations, and secondly because of questions raised as to the suitability of Newton's partner.
_	This brought Hurley into conflict with the AIF on the grounds that montage diminished documentary value.
_	When some remained, John A. Commerford, the Superintendent of Arlington National Cemetery, asked the Army's Quartermaster General in 1887 to close the Village on the grounds that people living in the Village had been taking trees at night from the cemetery for use as firewood.
_	Samuels also regards Livy's figure as far too high, on the grounds that the cavalry would have been inadequate to prevent the Roman infantry escaping to the rear.
_	On 22 March the Department of Trade and Industry was granted an injunction in the High Court freezing the company's assets on the grounds that the company was not registered under the Companies Act 1985 and that Mr Trull was not authorised under the Financial Services Act 1986 to conduct investment business.
_	He was among the authors that influenced a type of Turkish nationalism known as Ülkücü movement (translated as ""idealist""), a nationalist movement later associated to Alparslan Türkeş (and which was a break with Atsız's previous ideology of Pan-Turkism, on the grounds that it reconciles with Islam instead of denouncing it as "Arab religion", which Atsız previously stated).
_	A recent study has found evidence of nepotism in "F. fusca", in contrast with previous experiments with other ant species; this conclusion has been challenged, however, on the grounds that the observed pattern may result from differences in egg viability.
_	The postulation of such a multiplicity of categories has been criticized on the grounds that they appear not to be universal, many being found in only a minority of languages.
_	Thomas Jefferson was a firm supporter of the Great Chain of Being and an opponent of extinction, famously denying the extinction of the wooly mammoth on the grounds that nature never allows a race of animals to become extinct.
_	Richardson, in a later interview, confirmed that at the time he wrote to Attorney-General Frank Walker and all other Cabinet Ministers in the Wran Government to ask that the case be dropped on the grounds that it was a Labor Party and not a police matter.
_	Fritz Schiesser, as the representative for Glarus in the Swiss parliament, called for Anna Göldi's exoneration, which was granted 226 years after her death, on 27 August 2008 on the grounds that she had been subjected to an "illegal trial".
_	Sixteen- and seventeen-year-old PEI residents were permitted to vote on the grounds that they will be aged eighteen (and therefore eligible to vote under normal election rules) in the next provincial election, which would potentially be held using the voting system that wins this plebiscite.
_	In response to John Rawls's "A Theory of Justice", Nozick's book supported a nightwatchman state on the grounds that it was an inevitable phenomenon which could arise without violating individual rights.
_	Heathrow Hub Ltd, a company owned by Arup, announced it has also started proceedings on the grounds that the UK Government could choose an alternative route which would provide an improved connection between HS2 and Crossrail via a transport hub built on land owned by the company.
_	In 1985, the leadership resumed disciplinary action against the editors of the magazine on the grounds that the magazine was 'prejudicial to interests of the Party.'
_	The request was presided over by Levi Eshkol and Avraham Herzfeld, and denied on the grounds that HaMagen's own regulations forbade competition with HaShomer.
_	However, an objection was raised in August 2008 on the grounds that the introduction of such a complex system into the field would result in such dramatic potential changes to the Division 2 build philosophy that it would prevent many students from producing successful K*bots.
_	For instance, in criminal sentencing, a state may not increase a penalty on the grounds that the convicted person is a non-resident.
_	McCain voted against a 1983 resolution allowing President Reagan to keep U.S. Marines deployed as part of the Multinational Force in Lebanon, on the grounds that he "[did] not foresee obtainable objectives in Lebanon."
_	The Emperor, however, took the position of champion of the "valvassores" and demanded that Aribert should make a defence against charges brought against him, but Aribert refused, on the grounds that he was the emperor's equal.
_	The station was later renamed Mong Kok on 31 December 1968 on the grounds that the station was actually in Mong Kok District.
_	However, he opposed the Baldwin government's Trades Disputes Bill which restricted union powers, on the grounds that it would hinder those trade unionists committed to reform from changing their unions, and also hinder employers who were committed to improving the liberty of their employees.
_	After full funding for Catholic Schools was introduced, the Public Board of Education offered the old Mimico High School to the Separate (Catholic) School Board which declined on the grounds that demographics changes in Etobicoke meant Mimico was no longer centrally located.
_	In 1869, the Social Democratic Alliance was refused entry to the First International, on the grounds that it was an international organisation in itself, and only national organisations were permitted membership in the International.
_	The proposal was rejected, on the grounds that they could not accept it without Ferdinand's approval.
_	Former 14 March Progressive Socialist Party leader Walid Jumblatt also criticised Rai's assessment on the grounds that "Lebanon cannot remain hostage to regional conflicts", and denied that regime change in Syria was posing a threat to Christians in the country.
_	In his famous "Psaní do Frankfurtu" ("A Letter to Frankfurt") he refused to take part in the preliminary parliament consisting of 500 former deputies to the all-German Diet, which met at Frankfurt, on the grounds that as a Czech he had no interest in German affairs.
_	At the 1922 general election both the local Conservative and Lloyd George Liberal Associations repudiated Hope as their candidate on the grounds that he had not made a single speech during his 24 years in Parliament.
_	Several states have tried to block health care sharing ministries on the grounds that they are selling unauthorized insurance.
_	In the 2016 Legislative Council election held on 4 September 2016, six localist candidates with different agendas striving for the "self-determination" of Hong Kong were elected with 19 percent of the total votes even though the Electoral Affairs Commission (EAC) had made the unprecedented move to disqualify six other localist nominees (including Hong Kong Indigenous' Edward Leung, who ran in the February's New Territories East by-election) as candidates of the election on the grounds that they supported Hong Kong independence.
_	As well as traffic concerns, there is also a call to build the bypass on the grounds that the current traffic arrangement cuts the central business district off from Hobart's waterfront.
_	He reigned for 93 days before being deposed on the grounds that he was supposedly mentally ill in 31 August 1876; however his opponents may simply have used those grounds to stop his implementation of democratic reforms.
_	Once uncontroversial, it has recently been the focus of campaigns on the grounds that campaigners consider it cruel and unnecessary.
_	A 1973 decision by the United States Supreme Court in "City of Burbank v. Lockheed Air Terminal, Inc." overturned an airport curfew imposed by the city of Burbank, California on flights between 11:00 PM and 7:00 AM under the U.S. Constitution's Supremacy Clause on the grounds that airports were subject to federal oversight by the Federal Aviation Administration and under the terms of the Noise Control Act of 1972.
_	Denied the hand of Porcia, Hortensius then suggested that he marry Cato's wife Marcia, on the grounds that she had already given Cato heirs.
_	Dirksen, a keen supporter of the "National Revolution" in Germany, often urged a German-Japanese rapprochement under the grounds that the Japanese plans for a "New Order in Asia" paralleled Germany's plans for a "New Order in Europe".
_	An attorney for Ryaguzov objected to this disclosure on the grounds that the alleged connections of Makmudov with the FSB represent a "state secret".
_	Homosexuality was decriminalized in 1998 after the case of "Modinos v. Cyprus" of the European Court of Human Rights, but the Cyprus military still bars homosexuals from serving on the grounds that homosexuality is a mental illness; gay sexual conduct remains a crime under military law; the term is 6 months in a military jail although this is rarely, if ever, enforced.
_	Despite the Board's interest in the case, a spokesman said on February 9 that their team of investigators was being denied entrance to the site of the explosion, on the grounds that the area was a crime scene.
_	On December 1, 2006 Hernandez was convicted for violation of civil rights of the injured person on the grounds that he should not have shot at the fleeing vehicle since his life was not in danger.
_	The court of first instance, the First Division of the Court of Session, limited the liability of the Post Office on the grounds that although the danger to children was foreseeable the accident itself was not foreseeable.
_	Without any proper study comparing existing judicial systems and without any effort to improve the system, it was claimed that the 8:1 acquittal of Kawas Nanavati in "K. M. Nanavati v. State of Maharashtra", which was overturned by higher courts on the grounds that the jury was misled by the presiding judge and were susceptible to media and public influence, was the reason.
_	Apparently concerned with Western media representations of atrocities committed in the conflict—which generally focused on those perpetrated by the Serbs—atrocities committed against Serbs were dubbed "silent" on the grounds that they did not receive adequate coverage.
_	A Portuguese television station stopped broadcasting of bullfights in January 2008, on the grounds that they were too violent for minors.
_	He opposed naturalism on the grounds that it emphasizes the dominance of external natural forces over the strength of character and individual conscience.
_	The treatment of the Native Americans was at first rationalized on the grounds that they were cannibals; any means of subjugation were acceptable.
_	In May 1999 legal action commenced against the redevelopment of Royal Park on the grounds that the development was inconsistent with the purpose of the Crown land reservation.
_	The case served as the foundation for the preservation of open space as a public good on the grounds that open space served an educational purpose.
_	As a young woman, Bisharat wanted to become a lawyer, but faced opposition from her father on the grounds that Jordanian women were not supposed to take up any professions besides teaching.
_	In 1776, settlers presented a petition for the establishment of "Westsylvania" to Congress, on the grounds that the mountains made an almost impassable barrier on the east.
_	Khrushchev objected on the grounds that not all Presidium members had been notified, an objection which would have been quickly dismissed had Khrushchev not held firm control over the military, through Minister of Defense Marshal Zhukov, and the security departments.
_	The South Carolina Supreme Court in June 2010 unanimously overturned one of the 15 ordinances, which had required all motorcyclists to wear helmets, on the grounds that the state law, requiring helmets only for riders under age 21, cannot be preempted by a city ordinance.
_	Cornelius advised Adorno to withdraw his application on the grounds that the manuscript was too close to his own way of thinking.
_	A day before its scheduled release on 25 November, the film was banned by the State Government of Tamil Nadu on the grounds that the release would disturb the cordial relations between Tamil Nadu and Kerala.
_	She adds that Mexican billionaire Carlos Slim purchased "The New York Times" to "buy pro-illegal immigration coverage", on the grounds that his business interest lies in remittance-fueled consumption.
_	This has been disputed however on the grounds that pre-Hipparchus texts do not mention precession and that "it is only by cunning interpretation of ancient myths and images, which are ostensibly about something else, that precession can be discerned in them, aided by some pretty esoteric numerological speculation involving the 72 years that mark one degree of shift in the zodiacal system and any number of permutations by multiplication, division, and addition."
_	One account suggests that left-leaning thinkers who advocate equality of outcome fault even formal equality of opportunity on the grounds that it "legitimates inequalities of wealth and income".
_	Serbian nationalists opposed the agreement on the grounds that it weakened the unity of Serbdom, asserting its importance to Yugoslavia with the slogan "Strong Serbdom, Strong Yugoslavia".
_	Non-revolutionary civil disobedience is a simple disobedience of laws on the grounds that they are judged "wrong" by an individual conscience, or as part of an effort to render certain laws ineffective, to cause their repeal, or to exert pressure to get one's political wishes on some other issue.
_	The Ministry of Defence chose not to install equivalent devices on "Vanguard" submarines on the grounds that an aggressor might be able to eliminate the British chain of command before a launch order could be sent.
_	Furthermore, under the legal system of the People's Republic of China, courts do not have the general power of judicial review and cannot invalidate a statute on the grounds that it violates the constitution.
_	The European Union declined to participate in the proceedings on the grounds that Ethiopia had ignored the recommendations it provided after the previous round of elections that were also won by a questionable landslide.
_	The law was received with criticism from the opposition on the grounds that it is a violation of freedom of speech protections stipulated in the Venezuelan constitution, and that it encourages censorship and self-censorship.
_	He was elected to represent university students in the National Front of Iran's central congress in 1962, but National Front member Shapur Bakhtiar (who later gained notoriety as the last prime minister of the Pahlavi regime) opposed his membership on the grounds that Zia-Zarifi's criticism of the Shah's government was too radical.
_	Manfred replied in writing, excusing himself on the grounds that it was for the sake of his nephew, and not in opposition to the Roman Church, that he had done what was charged.
_	In 2005 the management contract in the copper mining area was terminated on the grounds that the privatized management did not perform better than publicly owned utilities.
_	On 29 May 1514, Henry VIII, in the exercise of his royal prerogative, treated de Vere's marriage as technically invalid on the grounds that de Vere had been under the age of fourteen at the date of the marriage.
_	According to Lauren Adams, "Publishers Weekly" magazine was the only source to question the book's authenticity on the grounds that it "seem[ed] awfully well written".
_	A landing in a region southwest of Mare Crisium was also considered, but rejected on the grounds that a Soviet spacecraft could easily access the site; Luna 21 eventually did so shortly after the Apollo 17 site selection was made.
_	Complaints were made to the Broadcasting Complaints Commission but were rejected on the grounds that the broadcast gave a fair opportunity for both sides to have their say.
_	By 2015, their descendants had filed a lawsuit against the museum, on the grounds that it was stolen by the Nazis.
_	The second son and the seventh and last child of the celebrated tragic dramatist Jean Racine, he was interested in poetry from childhood but was dissuaded from trying to make it his career by the poet Boileau on the grounds that the gift never existed in two successive generations.
_	Some 19th-century critics attacked the book, on the grounds that it normalized vice and corrupt living.
_	Early in 1902 the UBRE applied to the American Federation of Labor (AF of L) for a charter, but was refused on the grounds that the UBRE would compete with the existing railway brotherhoods.
_	Anakin rejected his offer on the grounds that he was too valuable to the New Republic and the Jedi, as well as being too important and strong for the Yuuzhan Vong to consider taking alive.
_	He is notable as the judge who refused a new vote during the 2000 U.S. Presidential election on the grounds that the Constitution stated that an election must be held everywhere in the United States on the same day, not just in one area.
_	The Crown exercised its right to appeal the verdict on the grounds that the trial judge made a fundamental error prejudicing the Crown's right to a fair trial.
_	He justifies this on the grounds that in n-person games the main activity of the players is to select not only strategies, but partners.
_	He was deeply unsympathetic to the student activism at LSE during the late 1960s, on the grounds that it disrupted the work of the university.
_	Although Boutin was cleared by the investigation, Parenteau justified the dismissal on the grounds that "the link of trust between a mayor and his borough director is essential to work on any serious administrative reform."
_	In June 2011, Federal District Court Judge Roger L. Hunt ruled that Righthaven had no standing to sue for copyright infringement, on the grounds that the original parties retain the actual copyrights.
_	Duke, acting consistently with their anti-union stance, wanted the NLRB to dismiss the petition on the grounds that it excluded a multitude of clerical and technical workers, suggesting that if any petition were to pass, it should include these employees in addition to those in the service sector.
_	Following this an Islamist lawyer filed a lawsuit before the Giza Lower Personal Status Court demanding the divorce of Abu Zayd from his wife, Dr. Ibtihal Younis, on the grounds that a Muslim woman cannot be married to an apostate – notwithstanding the fact his wife wished to remain married to him.
_	Grand Ayatollah Abul-Qassim Khoei, the leading Shia ayatollah at the time the book was published rejected Khomeini's argument on the grounds that
_	Wyden was the first politician in Congress to stand against the controversial Stop Online Piracy Act (SOPA) (in the House) and the PROTECT IP Act (PIPA) (in the Senate) on the grounds that it would "step towards an Internet in which those with money and lawyers and access to power have a greater voice than those who don't."
_	The city has repeatedly been asked to commemorate the company it gave birth to, but it has always declined, on the grounds that mobile phones were never produced there.
_	On July 18, 2006, CW (then known as the Foundation for Taxpayer and Consumer Rights) along with the Public Patent Foundation (PUBPAT) filed formal requests with the USPTO to revoke the ‘780, ‘806, and ‘913 patents on the grounds that the patents are overreaching and “significantly undermine research and waste taxpayer money”.
_	Verdicts by administrative trial courts can additionally be challenged on the grounds that they violate the relevant party's constitutional rights in some other way.
_	Citibank responded to Smiley's original filing with a motion to dismiss on the grounds that late fees were interest covered by the National Banking Act. California's Superior Court in Los Angeles County denied the motion, but after Citibank appealed that denial, the Second District of the California Courts of Appeal ordered the lower court to either grant the motion or explain why it wasn't.
_	Virginia Minor, a leader of the women's suffrage movement in Missouri, attempted to register to vote on October 15, 1872, in St. Louis County, Missouri, but was refused on the grounds that she was a woman.
_	Nugent exonerated Advanced Planning on the grounds that it owed no such duty to the public; any omission on its part was therefore not actionable.
_	The Audience then requested that the Junta submitted to the Regency Counsel, but the Junta refused, on the grounds that Cisneros did not so submit and the Audience did not request him to.
_	Mikels rejected it on the grounds that a movie pitched as a "Dirty Dozen" follow-up was a decade late, and any insistence on preserving a title containing the word "bastard" would spell box office failure in the 1970s.
_	Cell phone bans in school have been based on the grounds that cell phones pose a distraction, extended use can negatively impact students' abilities to focus, and because schools do not want to be held responsible for valuable stolen or damaged items.
_	It objected to the film's portrayal of stammerers as objects of ridicule, on the grounds that this promoted discrimination and the teasing and bullying of people who stammer.
_	On 24 May 1337, it was agreed that the Duchy of Aquitaine, effectively Gascony, should be taken back into the king's hands on the grounds that Edward III was in breach of his obligations as vassal and had sheltered the king's 'mortal enemy' Robert d'Artois.
_	and there is a plaque in the grounds that shows the former location of the hall.
_	"The Green Book" states that freedom of speech is based upon public ownership of book publishers, newspapers, television, and radio stations, on the grounds that private ownership would be undemocratic.
_	As chairman of the Etubom Traditional Rulers Council, in February 2004 Bassey announced the dethronement of Nta Elijah Henshaw on the grounds that Henshaw had failed to observe traditions and had failed to preserve peace.
_	She maintained a home on the grounds that are now the Jeanes Hospital campus.
_	His paper published numerous articles by the future TD Arthur Clery (writing under the pen-name "Chanel"), who advocated partition on the grounds that Ulster unionists were a separate nation, but Moran himself disagreed and: "refused to concede the legitimacy of a northern Protestant identity."
_	Having found for the plaintiff for a violation of the first law, the court then has the discretion to exercise judicial economy and refuse to make a decision on the remaining two claims, on the grounds that the finding of one violation should be sufficient to satisfy the plaintiff.
_	Similarly, affiliation to the Labour Party was opposed on the grounds that communists should not work with 'reformist' Social Democratic parties.
_	Decaux, the company holding licenses for ads on public transport in Genoa, refused to give authorization to the atheist bus campaign on the grounds that it may "offend the moral, civic and religious convictions of the public".
_	In August 2016, Justice Department officials announced that the FBOP would be phasing out its use of contracted facilities, on the grounds that private prisons provided less safe and less effective services with no substantial cost savings.
_	The term "illegal", when applied to "migration" and "migrant", has been replaced in recent years by "irregular" and "undocumented" on the grounds that "illegal" is inaccurate, degrading, and prejudicial.
_	This effectively permitted the police to stop and search, and even arrest, anyone found in a public place on the grounds that they suspected that they might intend to commit an offence.
_	The act disincorporated both the church and its Perpetual Emigration Fund on the grounds that they fostered polygamy.
_	In early July 2018, Mayor Goff announced that the Auckland Council would not allow the far right Canadian activists Lauren Southern and Stefan Molyneux to use council premises on the grounds that they stirred up ethnic or religious tensions and promoted divisive views.
_	They asked it on the grounds that it would be anomalous that married Anglican priests can be received into the Catholic Church and ordained as priests, by means of either the Pastoral Provision of 20 June 1980 or the 2009 Anglican ordinariate, but married Catholic men cannot do the same.
_	The Ohio house impeached Judge Tod on the grounds that he was usurping the power of the legislature.
_	On February 28, 2017, Australian Liberal Senator Eric Abetz objected to the rainbow flag being displayed in the Department of Finance on the grounds that government departments should take a neutral stand on political debates.
_	Robert then set about recovering property of the Lordship of Mez that Aubry had sold to the Ferrières Abbey in order to fund their journey, contesting the sale on the grounds that he, as the heir to the title, had never ratified it.
_	In 2006, American lawyers representing the UAE raised a motion to dismiss the lawsuit on the grounds that none of the involved parties resided in the U.S., arguing that the UN program best served the interests of the children.
_	Caelestius again appears to have gone beyond this and denied that Christian goodness is due to grace, on the grounds that this would imply that if any Christian sinned, it was because God's grace had failed; once again at the Synod of Lydda Pelagius anathematized this position (although he stated that he did not mean to indicate whether they were Caelestius' opinions or not).
_	The defense tried to have charges dismissed on the grounds that the statute of limitations had expired.
_	He has been involved in a refugee crisis, has served as bishop in the Central District of the Methodist Church, and was suspended in 2010 on the grounds that he had exceeded his authority.
_	Old Court supporter John Upshaw Waring printed handbills that not only accused Sharp of fathering Cooke's child, but said that Sharp had denied paternity of the child on the grounds that it was a mulatto and the son of a Cooke family slave.
_	The Church's application for charity status in England and Wales was rejected in 1999, on the grounds that there is no "public benefit arising out of the practice of Scientology", and the Church has not exercised its right of appeal.
_	The federal judge declined to rule on the grounds that the Cherokee Nation would be required to relinquish total sovereignty before federal troops could be sent into the Nation to confiscate weapons.
_	The Catholic Church opposes all kinds of assisted reproductive technology and artificial contraception, on the grounds that they separate the procreative goal of marital sex from the goal of uniting married couples.
_	This was on the grounds that making cannabis possession a non-arrestable offence would reduce the number of "otherwise law-abiding, mainly young people" being criminalised and potentially receiving a custodial sentence to the detriment of their futures (p 7).
_	In 1857 Stone refused to pay taxes on the grounds that women were taxed without being able to vote on tax laws.
_	"Whigs", originally a reference to Scottish cattle-drovers (stereotypically radical anti-Catholic Covenanters), was the abusive term directed at those who wanted to exclude James on the grounds that he was a Roman Catholic.
_	The CPR refused to allow its clerks to be unionized on the grounds that they had access to confidential information.
_	Her tech spec indicates that she frequently takes advantage of her looks, counting on the fact that Autobots won't blast her on the grounds that she's female, using her charms to beguile them then destroy them.
_	Of these four sites, two have now closed (Barking, and Preston), on the grounds that they are not financially sustainable.
_	Cardiff North MP Julie Morgan appealed for government funding for the school, but was rejected on the grounds that it did not teach the National Curriculum for England, Wales and Northern Ireland.
_	De Vere refused on the grounds that he "would not give pleasure to Frenchmen".
_	Chief Judge Robert F. Quinn dissented on the grounds that the prosecution's expert witnesses testified in accordance with Army regulations rather than their knowledge and medical experience, feeling bound by the restrictive terms of the joint Air Force (AFM 160-42) and Army (TM 8–240) manual, "Psychiatry in Military Law".
_	In 1930, the United States House of Representatives voted not to grant her the equivalent of a year of her husband's salary, on the grounds that it was not shown that she was dependent on him.
_	In January 1931 the Free State government tested its proposed procedure; it applied the Free State seal to the instrument of ratification for a 1929 treaty between the Free State and Portugal, and sent it to commissioner John W. Dulanty to transmit to King George V. Dulanty was refused an audience, the British objecting on the grounds that the change in procedure had not been agreed.
_	The Nazis subsequently denied Leipart any of his pension on the grounds that he had "abused his office as chairman of the ADGB to promote Marxist aspirations".
_	In some cases, he attacked prominent religious figures such as Mary Baker Eddy on the grounds that their claims are unsupportable.
_	On January 27, 2012, the Seenos filed suit against Whittemore in Las Vegas on the grounds that Whittemore inappropriately used tens of millions of Wingfield's money to live luxuriously and to lobby politically, giving illegal campaign funds.
_	This preference has caused Anne great sorrow: eight years before, Lady Russell persuaded her to break off an engagement with an ambitious, promising young naval officer named Frederick Wentworth—a man whom Anne loved passionately—on the grounds that his poverty, lack of social rank and connections made him an unsuitable choice.
_	With the Dirksens under local scrutiny because of their German heritage -- Dirksen's mother refused to take down a living room photo of Kaiser Wilhelm II, as demanded by a self-appointed Pekin "loyalty commission", on the grounds that "it's a free country" -- it fell to Everett Dirksen to demonstrate the family's patriotism by serving in uniform.
_	According to "The New York Times", the drawings were published in Paris during the war, but the government intervened to block their distribution on the grounds that they "reflected damagingly upon an ally" (Russia).
_	Laws attempting to prohibit minors from purchasing "M" rated games were established in California, Illinois, Michigan, Minnesota, and Louisiana, but all were overturned on the grounds that these laws violated the First Amendment.
_	On 11 October 2011, the Valjevo Municipal Assembly denied the Serbian Radical Party's request to use the great hall of the local parliament building as a space to promote Lukić's book on the grounds that it was revealed that the book's author was in fact Rajko Đurđević and not Milan Lukić.
_	"The Accumulation of Capital" was harshly criticized by both Marxist and non-Marxist economists, on the grounds that her logic was circular in proclaiming the impossibility of realizing profits in a close-capitalist system, and that her "underconsumptionist" theory was too crude.
_	Others objected on the grounds that adopting the Episcopal / Anglican view on priestly orders and hierarchical structure was contrary to the Evangelical Lutheran concept of the "priesthood of all believers", which holds that all Christians stand on equal footing before God.
_	Fenn claimed in "Thirty-five years in the divorce court" (1910) that Inderwick was always passed over for a judgeship on the grounds that it was not the practice in England to promote to the bench any lawyer whose practice had been mainly in the divorce courts.
_	It was dissolved in March 1928 on the decree of the Vatican's Congregation of the Holy Office on the grounds that its perspectives were not in keeping with the spirit of the Church.
_	Siddique stated that at one point America, alongside other countries offered to intervene, "We offered some assistance but it was rejected on the grounds that Fiji would like to resolve its problem its own way.
_	According to the police,the bail granted by High Court judge Godfrey Mwase was not valid on the grounds that the courts in Malawi are currently on wage strikes albeit all the paper work were processed under due process through court.
_	The report has been criticized on the grounds that it makes the same mistake that the media makes in aggregating all Latinos into a single group, thereby missing both the diversity of the situations the different groups are in and the varying perceptions of those groups by the non-Latino population.
_	However, the Constitutional Court viewed the constitutional amendment calling for one-off early elections as a retroactive decision in violation of the existing constitutional procedures regulating early elections, and struck down the act on the grounds that it violated the procedure for constitutional amendments, the right to vote, and the inalienable principle of a law-abiding state.
_	But this defense was rejected on the grounds that the diagnosis failed to explain Schoenwetter's actions.
_	The director re-worked the film's script to suit being shot in black and white after being denied color film stock on the grounds that color film was reserved for films about socialist realism .
_	In 2009, Atwood was one of the authors of a journal article that called for the termination of an ongoing clinical trial of chelation therapy, on the grounds that it was "unethical, dangerous, pointless, and wasteful".
_	The league commissioner at the time, Maurice Podoloff, refused on the grounds that Oregon was too far.
_	Grace pleaded with her father to go to the rescue but he initially refused on the grounds that the sea was too rough and the two of them could not possibly manage their only boat in such conditions.
_	He asked President Roosevelt to lift the ban on publishing photographs of dead GIs on the battlefield on the grounds that the American people needed to appreciate the sacrifices made by their young men.
_	Several physicists, including Clifford M. Will and Steve Carlip, have criticized these claims on the grounds that they have allegedly misinterpreted the results of their measurements.
_	The De-Ba'athification Commission annulled his election on the grounds that he had previously been a member of the Baath Party.
_	One was rejected by Sir Francis Humphrys on the grounds that it was submitted by a person not qualified to represent the Assyrians.
_	Part 4 of the Act provided for the indefinite detention without charge of foreign nationals certified by the Home Secretary as "suspected international terrorists" where such persons could not be deported on the grounds that they faced a real risk of torture, inhuman or degrading treatment if removed to their home country.
_	His attorneys unsuccessfully sought to have the indictment dismissed on the grounds that his answers were literally truthful.
_	This was subsequently reduced to 90 years after the defense successfully filed a motion to merge some of the 20 counts that Manning was being charged with on the grounds that they overlapped.
_	In particular, Duncan refused to offer his parishioners holy communion on the grounds that it would whet their appetite for recently abandoned "cannibalistic" practices.
_	Luton, a non-custodial parent challenged the scheme on the grounds that the payment was a form of tax because it was collected by the government, and section 55 of the constitution mandates that tax legislation must deal with matters of taxation only.
_	A motion for summary judgement seeking dismissal was filed by Google and was granted in 2010 on the grounds that the Digital Millennium Copyright Act's "safe harbor" provisions shielded Google from Viacom’s copyright infringement claims.
_	Although a newly formed company Zennorin Developments Ltd applied to reopen the pits in 1970, this was rejected on the grounds that it would spoil an area of outstanding natural beauty.
_	In October 2007, the National Coalition of Latino Clergy filed a federal lawsuit, seeking to overturn the bill on the grounds that it was unconstitutional and violated rights to due process, but this was finally dismissed in December 2007 because the plaintiffs named in the suit didn't have standing to challenge the law.
_	He won, but the election was voided by on the grounds that he had not been a U.S. citizen for the nine years required by the United States Constitution; having been naturalized October 21, 1840, and elected on January 13, 1849.
_	On October 9, 2014 Sierra Pacific and other defendants filed a motion in Federal Court to terminate the settlement on the grounds that the investigation and prosecution were flawed and corrupt.
_	He has turned down numerous invitations to train with the top sprinters like Justin Gatlin in America, and prefers to stay living in England on the grounds that he would get 'home-sick.'
_	Gleeson CJ found against NEAT on the grounds that the policy in question was legal, and that no material had been put to AWB that could persuade it to deviate from its policy.
_	The appeal was heard on 28 July, but rejected on the grounds that the Marine Offences Act, would, in any case, have forced the station to close on or before 14 August, 18 days later.
_	Today, many Calvinist socialists in Wales support same-sex marriage on the grounds that it delivers marriage equality in the eyes of the state while still allowing churches to follow their own conscience, thus upholding the traditional Protestant belief in separation of church and state.
_	Alongside Islamic Republican Party, the communist Tudeh Party of Iran urged people to vote yes, expressing its support for "Imam's line"; while Freedom Movement of Iran requested a yes vote on the grounds that the alternative was an anarchy.
_	Coca-Cola dismissed the allegations as "ridiculous," on the grounds that "no consumer could reasonably be misled into thinking Vitaminwater was a healthy beverage" and an attempt by the group to increase its readership.
_	Tshekedi opposed the marriage on the grounds that under Tswana custom a chief could not marry simply as he pleased.
_	The court held that even though the ship and cargo was in physical safety, the services rendered still amounted to salvage service on the grounds that the master of a damaged ship must do his best to preserve the ship and cargo and bring them to their destination as cheaply and efficiently as possible.
_	Mehserle's attorney Michael Rains sought a change of venue of the trial, on the grounds that there would not be an impartial jury in Alameda County.
_	As a result, AWB sued for breach of contract, whilst the government denied liability on the grounds that there was no legally binding contract between the parties.
_	Ranjitsinhji had his name taken out of the claim on the grounds that he was a ruling sovereign, a view which was supported by the India Office.
_	On being sent a copy of this statement, the Council reacted by refusing to comply on the grounds that Scotland's royal burghs "had possessed the privilege of using seals and armorial bearings from a remote period which far outdated the Acts of 1592 and 1672, from which the Lord Lyon derived his jurisdiction, and that since neither of these Acts specifically mentioned the Burghs, they did not apply to them" (presumably the same position that had been adopted in 1732).
_	Calculations of electron affinities using this statement of Koopmans' theorem have been criticized on the grounds that virtual (unoccupied) orbitals do not have well-founded physical interpretations, and that their orbital energies are very sensitive to the choice of basis set used in the calculation.
_	Jews violated their religious observance of the Sabbath by cooking and baking on the grounds that saving lives overrides religious principle.
_	In 1961, the Nobel Prize-winner Peter Medawar, a British immunologist, wrote a scornful review of "The Phenomenon Of Man" for the journal "Mind": "the greater part of it, I shall show, is nonsense, tricked out with a variety of metaphysical conceits, and its author can be excused of dishonesty only on the grounds that before deceiving others he has taken great pains to deceive himself";
_	When it was his turn to die, Blessed John rejected an invitation from the Sheriff to request the Queen's forgiveness on the grounds that he was guilty of no offence.
_	When, in 1647, he was commanded to disband his army and surrender Pembroke Castle, he refused to do so on the grounds that he was owed money.
_	HOLMES IV ("High-Optional, Logical, Multi-Evaluating Supervisor, Mark IV") is the Lunar Authority's master computer, having almost total control of Luna's machinery on the grounds that a single computer is cheaper than (though not as safe as) multiple independent systems.
_	"United States v. Lopez" (1995) was the first decision in six decades to invalidate a federal statute on the grounds that it exceeded the power of the Congress under the Commerce Clause.
_	The suit was dismissed in Federal district court in 1981 on the grounds that the article was not defamatory or an invasion of Falwell's privacy (the Virginia courts had not recognized this privacy tort, which is recognized in other states).
_	In 2014 Moddi announced that he would be cancelling his scheduled concert in Tel Aviv, Israel, on the grounds that he would not be taken to support the Israeli expansion of settlements in the West Bank.
_	Next Diodotus attacks Cleon's claim that harshness would deter future revolts, on the grounds that no state revolts in the expectation of failure, and that the more useful countermeasure, therefore, is a mild punishment that will allow for reconsideration when the revolt appears likely to fail.
_	No court ever made a determination whether Boland covered the NSC and on the grounds that it was a prohibition rather than a criminal statute, no one was indicted for violating it.
_	Murray also refused to sign the required anticommunist affidavit on the grounds that it was demeaning.
_	"The Green Book" states that freedom of speech is based upon public ownership of book publishers, newspapers, television and radio stations on the grounds that private ownership would be undemocratic.
_	The Roman Catholic Church initially prohibited the publication of some of Teilhard's writings on the grounds that they contradicted orthodoxy.
_	Matters had not been helped when Columbia Records offered Waters smaller publishing rights on the grounds that "The Wall" was a double album, a position he did not accept.
_	They decided to rebrand the group on the grounds that the previous name was associated to evening dancing performances.
_	The permission was refused on the grounds that the establishment of telephones was a Government monopoly and that the Government itself would undertake the work.
_	Although he came to Sri Lanka with the aim of becoming a Buddhist monk, he was discouraged to do so by Anagarika Dharmapala on the grounds that it would be difficult to travel as a Buddhist monk.
_	The university appealed the ban in October on the grounds that it violates NCAA bylaws and violated institutional autonomy.
_	In the 1999 decision "R. v. Cuerrier", the Supreme Court of Canada ruled that people who knowingly exposed/infected others to HIV through unprotected sex could be charged with a crime on the grounds that failure to disclose one's HIV status to a sex partner constitutes fraud.
_	There were two small parterres in front of this side of the house where the grass is now, along with other features of the grounds that can be viewed by walking along the paths (wilderness, mill bridge, weirs, etc.)
_	The group was denied an application to form a political party by the Maaouya Ould Sid'Ahmed Taya government on the grounds that the party tried was seeking a monopoly on religion.
_	Verizon was suing over increased regulation on internet service providers on the grounds that "even though the Commission has general authority to regulate in this arena, it may not impose requirements that contravene express statutory mandates.
_	Alternatively Claude Vandersleyen has tentatively dated Rahotep to the 13th Dynasty on the grounds that he believes Rahotep to be related to Sobekemsaf I, which Vandersleyen also dates to the 13th Dynasty because of the quality and number of statues attributable to him.
_	In "Gratz", the Court invalidated Michigan's undergraduate admissions policy, on the grounds that unlike the law school's policy, which treated race as one of many factors in an admissions process that looked to the individual applicant, the undergraduate policy used a point system that was excessively mechanistic.
_	According to Airey Neave, Jackson was also the one behind the prosecution's decision to include membership in any of the six criminal organizations in the indictments at the trial, though the IMT rejected this on the grounds that it was wholly without precedent in either international law or the domestic laws of any of the Allies.
_	Landrieu personally supports same-sex marriage, but defends the state's constitutional ban on the grounds that a majority of Louisianans voted for it.
_	But relief is refused on the grounds that he is not Swiss.
_	On the grounds that the oracle referred to the nearby island of Salamis as "holy", he claimed that those slain would be Greece's enemies, not the Athenians.
_	Although it is important to establish a child's relative reliability and credibility for their testimony, a judge cannot bar a witness from testifying on the grounds that he or she is competent but not credible.
_	Gathering the other league owners together to contribute to the unprecedented amount on the grounds that inking such a major star would give instant credibility to the new rival league that was competing directly against the entrenched NHL, Jets' owner Ben Hatskin agreed to the sum and signed Hull for a contract worth $1,000,000 over ten years.
_	Celeste Koeleveld, the city's executive assistant corporation counsel for public safety, justified the subpoena on the grounds that the film had "crossed the line from journalism to advocacy" for the wrongly convicted men.
_	This statement maintained the ban on homosexual behaviour among service personnel, on the grounds that it would erode command relationships and morale, raise risks of blackmail, create health problems and endanger minors.
_	Although a small minority within the Church of Scotland attempted to defend Blantyre Mission's actions on the grounds that there was no civil authority to protect it, the prevailing view was that the mission had no legal or moral right to inflict these punishments.
_	Originally, Rivlin wanted to attend graduate school in public administration but was rejected on the grounds that she was a woman of marriageable age.
_	Falleni's lawyer, Maddocks Cohen, objected to his evidence about being taken to dig holes in the scrub but the magistrate allowed it on the grounds that it indicated Falleni's frame of mind.
_	Although Stephen King fans were critical of the novel's adaptation on the grounds that Kubrick altered and reduced the novel's themes, a defense of Kubrick's approach was made in Steve Biodrowski's review of the film.
_	The planning committee rejected opposition from Beit Hanina on the grounds that direct access to Begin Boulevard would benefit them and found an engineering solution in the form of a bridge to limit the footprint on West Bank land from the extension to the interchange.
_	She refused on the grounds that it was an antireligious organization.
_	Ariovistus refused the summons on the grounds that if Caesar wanted to speak to him, he should come to him; besides, he was not prepared to enter Caesar's territory without his army, which it would be impractical and expensive to gather.
_	The offences against free expression documented in that first issue's "Index Index" listing included censorship in Greece and Spain, then dictatorships, and Brazil, which had just banned the film "Zabriskie Point" on the grounds that it "insulted a friendly power" – the United States, where it had been made and freely shown.
_	Malone, who had competed in the 800 m event at the Athens Paralympics was ruled as ineligible to compete by Games classification authorities on the grounds that his disability was not severe enough.
_	The bar association initiated disbarment proceedings against Karst on the grounds that his slurs against Judge Humphries constituted misconduct.
_	By 2015, their descendants had filed a lawsuit against the museum, on the grounds that it was stolen by the Nazis.
_	Picton appealed the decision using the services of a London attorney, who challenged the conviction on the grounds that the magistrate's record of the year of the offence was incorrectly recorded.
_	One of his creditors, George Samuel Ford, a bill discounter and solicitor, attempted to have the fiat annulled on the grounds that Huntingtower had never been a trader so could not be declared a bankrupt.
_	However, American archeologist Jenifer Neils suggests nine, on the grounds that this would be the least number necessary to produce the work in the time given.
_	They were land hungry and revoked Davidson's grant on the grounds that he had not brought out the settlers he promised.
_	At a council held in London on 6 April 1152, Stephen induced a small number of barons to pay homage to Eustace as their future king; but the Archbishop of Canterbury, Theobald of Bec, and the other bishops declined to perform the coronation ceremony on the grounds that the Roman curia had declared against the claim of Eustace.
_	Maria Minna, the president of COSTI-IIAS Immigrant Services, opposed the grant on the grounds that the new organization would duplicate the work of her organization.
_	On June 9, 1995, the charges were stayed by Justice Anderson on the grounds that prosecutors had deliberately failed to disclose key evidence to the defence.
_	Frank Hahn defends general equilibrium modeling on the grounds that it provides a negative function.
_	Despite the fact that the vast majority of Diels–Alder reactions exhibit stereospecific, syn addition of the two components, a diradical intermediate has been postulated (and supported with computational evidence) on the grounds that the observed stereospecificity does not rule out a two-step addition involving an intermediate that collapses to product faster than it can rotate to allow for inversion of stereochemistry.
_	The suit was dismissed in March 2006, on the grounds that Wallace had failed to state a valid anti-trust claim; the court noted that "the GPL encourages, rather than discourages, free competition and the distribution of computer operating systems, the benefits of which directly pass to consumers".
_	He later opposed a 2010 resolution by the Serbian Assembly apologizing for the Srebrenica massacre, on the grounds that it inappropriately placed blame on Serbs as a people.
_	In 1952, the station was the subject of controversy when Ricard refused to permit Local 598 of the International Union of Mine, Mill and Smelter Workers to purchase airtime on the station for a labour-oriented news program, on the grounds that the program represented "Communist propaganda".
_	Peters was criticized for relying on different sources for establishing the Jewish and non-Jewish population in 1893, but Isaac defended this on the grounds that the Ottoman census would have excluded most Jews as non-citizens, while the figures cited from French geographer Vital Cuinet were likely close to the truth.
_	When the Frankfurt Parliament offered Frederick William the crown of a united Germany, he refused on the grounds that he would not accept a crown from a revolutionary assembly without the sanction of Germany's other monarchs.
_	In that case, a Brahmin woman in Madras challenged the state's Communal General Order, which established caste quotas in government-supported medical and engineering schools, on the grounds that it denied her equality under the law; both courts had upheld her petition.
_	In 1959, First Secretary of the Communist Party Nikita Khrushchev reportedly cancelled an official visit to Denmark, on the grounds that "Jyllands-Posten" had published a number of articles highly critical of the Soviet Union.
_	This was rejected by President Tassos Papadopoulos on the grounds that no side should be expected to present their demands in advance of negotiations.
_	On 31 May 1933 he was excluded from the CPU(b) on the grounds that he had "infiltrated" its ranks "with the aim of creating a counter-revolutionary fascist organization that had the goal of overthrowing the Soviet government".
_	Alexander Grant MacKay criticized his failure to take advantage of the recent conference of premiers to press for the transfer of rights over Alberta's natural resources from the federal to the provincial government (Sifton had made this a priority during the pre-war years, but had largely ceased his advocacy on the breakout of hostilities), and James Gray Turgeon attacked the government's policy of levying taxes for the support of soldiers' dependants on the grounds that he considered it a federal responsibility.
_	The Church is opposed to same-gender sexual practices and relationships on the grounds that "sexual intimacy belongs only within the marital relationship of a man and a woman."
_	On Dec. 31, 1969, several weeks after the paper printed the article encouraging shoplifting, Don Elder was busted on 10 counts of conspiracy to solicit burglary and contributing to the delinquency of a minor, solely on the grounds that he was the editor of the paper and copies had allegedly fallen into the hands of minors.
_	Reporting in 1938, the Commission rejected the Peel plan primarily on the grounds that it could not be implemented without a massive forced transfer of Arabs (an option that the British government had already ruled out).
_	The patent examiner rejected all 11 of the claims on the grounds that "the invention is not implemented on a specific apparatus and merely manipulates [an] abstract idea and solves a purely mathematical problem without any limitation to a practical application, therefore, the invention is not directed to the technological arts."
_	The Tribunal del Consulado, the organization with jurisdiction over commercial matters opposed his reception on the grounds that his nomination had not been confirmed by the U.S. Senate.
_	After Baartman's death, Geoffroy Saint Hilaire applied on behalf of the Muséum d' Histoire Naturelle to retain her corpse on the grounds that it was of singular specimen of humanity and therefore of special scientific interest.
_	NMA presidents like Drs. E. L. Robinson, C. Austin Whitter and J. G. Gathings opposed the AMA's proposals on the grounds that the AMA had previously excluded African American patients from their care as well as African American physicians from their ranks.
_	Lawyer Malimali called for clemency to be shown, on the grounds that the mutineers had merely been following orders and had not been involved in the planning of the mutiny.
_	In September 2003, 70-year-old widow Harlene Stein filed suit against Eminem and Dr. Dre on the grounds that "Guilty Conscience" contains an unauthorized sample of "Pigs Go Home" composed for the film "Getting Straight" by her husband, Ronald Stein, who died in 1988.
_	However, the United States refused to sign the Treaty on the grounds that Russia was not represented at the conference.
_	In June 1907, after the departure of Arthur's friend and supporter, the Prince, Minos Kalokairinos sued Arthur Evans on the grounds that the latter had taken a field of his without payment, had excavated without permission, and had illegally removed antiquities found there from the country.
_	The case was dismissed by the High Court on 25 February 2008 on the grounds that "the devotees had no standing to make the application".
_	In Italy, he opposed every government that came to office, on the grounds that there was nothing to lose, and perhaps something to gain, especially on the international scene.
_	he lost was thrown out on the grounds that he would have ruined himself via another bookmaker.
_	The song was released as the lead single from "The Original Soundtrack" on the grounds that the band had reservations regarding the 6:00+ ballad "I'm Not in Love" as the lead single.
_	He added a further 11 species to "Dryandra", but transferred "D. falcata" into a new, monospecific genus as "Hemiclidia Baxteri", on the grounds that its follicles always contained only a single seed.
_	An appeal to the County Court was dismissed, and a further appeal to the Court of Appeal was dismissed on the grounds that there was insufficient evidence to maintain the defence.
_	Peters also refused to negotiate with the Greens directly on the grounds that they had campaigned on a partnership with Labour.
_	Despite the fact that all tests were successful, Pirotsky's proposal was dismissed on the grounds that equipping existing tram tracks for electric traction and purchasing or building compatible tram vehicles would be too expensive.
_	The Federal Constitutional Court of Germany can even review and reject constitutional amendments on the grounds that they are contradictory to the rest of the Federal Republic Constitution ("Verfassungswidriges Verfassungsrecht").
_	"A Season in Hell" is ultimately rejected by Satin Records on the grounds that it is "dark and strange".
_	He argues for this on the grounds that an adequate account of truth in mathematics implies the existence of abstract mathematical objects, but that such objects are epistemologically inaccessible because they are causally inert and beyond the reach of sense perception.
_	The title of "archēgetēs", "founding magistrate," was explicitly denied to Eurysthenes and Procles by the later Spartan government on the grounds that they were not founders of a state, but were maintained in their offices by parties of foreigners.
_	The school justified the ban on the grounds that the niqab "hindered eye contact, which testifies to mutual respect".
_	The Amsterdam CDA subsequently called for a national ban on chador, burqa and niqab in schools, partly on the grounds that they conflicted with common national values.
_	The petition sought to remove marijuana and its cannabinoids from Schedules I and II of the Controlled Substance Act on the grounds that the drug lacks the potential for abuse that warrants inclusion there.
_	On December 20, 2005, the US District Court ruled that intelligent design is not science and is essentially religious in nature, and the board's requirement endorsing intelligent design as an alternative to evolution in science classes, unconstitutional on the grounds that its inclusion violates the Establishment Clause of the First Amendment.
_	Maude considered postponing the operation but was advised by General Alexander Cobbe to go ahead on the grounds that the weather was unlikely to get cooler and that all possible precautions were being taken to minimise the impact of the heat.
_	It then declares itself supreme over all other puranas, on the grounds that it was Vyasa's crowning achievement.
_	Maurizi filed a grievance against Callaghan with United States Figure Skating Association (USFSA), but the grievance was dismissed in June 1999 without a hearing on the grounds that he had waited too long to file it.
_	The last change happened in 2017, as citizens' groups were lobbying for another name change on the grounds that Josip Broz Tito is a negative historical personality, due to his involvement in the many deaths during the rule of his communist regime.
_	Most Egyptologists accept Shishaq as an alternative name for Shoshenq I. Rohl disputes that Shoshenq's military activity fits the biblical account of Shishaq on the grounds that the two kings' campaigns are completely different and Jerusalem does not appear in the Shoshenq inscription as a subjected town.
_	Peternell appealed on the grounds that Hart had placed 278 places below Peternell in the FEI rankings.
_	James M. Buchanan criticized Keynesian economics on the grounds that governments would in practice be unlikely to implement theoretically optimal policies.
_	Shaw and Albert also suggest that separation will never happen, on the grounds that nationalist francophone Quebecers have used the threat of separation to extract concessions from the federal government but recognize actual independence would harm their community.
_	A woman named Jean Kay filed suit against the state Board of Higher Education to block Russell's appointment on the grounds that his views on marriage and sex would adversely affect her daughter's virtue, although her daughter was not a CCNY student.
_	Bill Cash MP sought a judicial review in the UK High Court on 17 June 2008 on the grounds that the Irish referendum vote had made the Lisbon Treaty “incapable of ratification”.
_	The judge rejected the claim on the grounds that it was for parliament rather than the courts to decide whether the bill should be passed, and that Cash was trying to a “pursue a political agenda through the court”.
_	They then filed suit with a local court on January 21, 1981 seeking to annul Nikken's appointment on the grounds that he had never been named successor by High Priest Nittatsu.
_	On 3 October 2007, the TV station NTV reported that the police file on Erhan Tuncel, a prime suspect in the murder case, had been destroyed on the grounds that the file was a "state secret" before the court had a chance to see the document.
_	Although the district court granted a partial judgment to Dodd, the appellate court ruled in favor of Pearson on the grounds that Dodd's property had not been physically abused.
_	However, Sim Euigyeom, the brother of Queen Insun, opposed Kim's promotion on the grounds that Kim had often given bribes to the corrupt official Yun Wonhyeong.
_	Japanese scientist Hantaro Nagaoka rejected Thomson's model on the grounds that opposing charges cannot penetrate each other.
_	In 2004, a proposal was submitted by Kenya to have it listed in CITES Appendix II on the grounds that the species has a very limited geographic range and suffers from rapid habitat loss.
_	The tribe sued for an injunction on the grounds that the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers had failed to conduct a proper environmental and cultural impact study.
_	When the English translations were being prepared, Toren Smith considered returning the name to "Verthandi", (which Smith had determined to be the correct translation of the Old Norse), but chose to stick with Belldandy on the grounds that Fujishima was already "playing fast and loose with the mythos" and thus felt that no further harm was likely to come from employing Fujishima's transliteration.
_	After the trial concerts, the orchestra voted unanimously for his appointment in 1947 to lead the newly reformed Bournemouth Municipal Orchestra, despite objections from the Musicians' Union which tried to prevent his appointment on the grounds that there were already too many non-British musicians in the country.
_	On February 2, 2017, following an investigation by Québec City Police and the Director of Criminal and Penal Prosecutions, the decision was made not to charge Sklavounos on the grounds that "no criminal act had been committed".
_	The 2003 conspiracy fiction novel "The Da Vinci Code" by Dan Brown makes reference to this book, also liberally using most of the above claims as key plot elements; indeed, in 2005 Baigent and Leigh unsuccessfully sued Brown's publisher, Random House, for plagiarism, on the grounds that Brown's book makes extensive use of their research and that one of the characters is named Leigh, has a surname (Teabing) which is an anagram of Baigent, and has a physical description strongly resembling Henry Lincoln.
_	The minister defended his decision on the grounds that the constitution granted freedom of association and freedom of religion.
_	Jobs in the government were offered to the French-educated elite; those who were educated in monasteries were denied jobs in the government on the grounds that their religious education was irrelevant for government jobs.
_	The government asked for summary judgment on the grounds that VSP did not qualify for tax exemption under 501(c)(4).
_	Locals hope this paves the way to the removal of the fence, on the grounds that it interferes with the public's enjoyment of the public space.
_	Critics have complained of the government's over-reliance on advisory committees and consultations in managing cultural affairs on the grounds that it is inefficient and contrary to global trends in arts administration.
_	Phillips defended the two-party format on the grounds that competition can produce excellence and questioned how competitive general elections would be "dangerous" because white voters had for years been divided in contentious Democratic primary runoff elections.
_	When they arrive, the Russian female soldiers show hostility to the prisoners on the grounds that they have killed their husbands, families and friends; only Dr. Natalia (Vera Farmiga) and the cook treat the prisoners with dignity.
_	However, his license was later revoked by the government on the grounds that the company had not paid its dues.
_	They also gave the grounds that the issues of economic justice are separate from those of Iraq War, and STWC participation in Edinburgh on July 2 would confuse the message.
_	However, the renovation plans of Garcés are being contested in the courts by the Association des Vieux amis de Strasbourg, on the grounds that they involve the destruction of three courtrooms that are designated as monuments historiques.
_	When British troops entered Bloemfontein on 13 March 1900 Reitz and others urged Kruger to destroy the gold mines, but he refused on the grounds that this would obstruct rehabilitation after the war.
_	The Oklahoma Supreme Court dismissed the lawsuit on the grounds that the two residents lacked standing to sue.
_	Because the school board refused to change its policy, several families brought suit on the grounds that the schools' practice conflicted with the Wisconsin Constitution, which forbade sectarian instruction in the public schools.
_	On April 30, 2015, the Government of Maharashtra banned the use of "Horn OK Please" on the rear side of commercial vehicles, on the grounds that it encourages motorists to honk unnecessarily and leads to noise pollution.
_	The bill was promoted by London Underground and British Rail, and supported by the government; it was rejected by the Private Bill Committee in 1994 on the grounds that a case had not been made, though the government issued "Safeguarding Directions", protecting the route from any development that would jeopardise future schemes.
_	In 1891, German botanist Otto Kuntze challenged the generic name "Banksia" L.f., on the grounds that the name "Banksia" had previously been published in 1775 as "Banksia" J.R.Forst & G.Forst, referring to the genus now known as "Pimelea".
_	The plaintiffs wanted these claims declared invalid on the grounds that they are not patentable subject matter under §101 of Title 35 of the United States Code—that the isolated genes are unpatentable products of nature, and that the diagnostic method claims are mere thought processes that do not yield any real world transformations, and that the drug screening claims were just describing the basic processes of doing science.
_	Rhino, a brutish and dimwitted enemy of Spider-Man, suffers a mid-life crisis after he attempts to rescue Stella, the beautiful daughter of a mob boss, who coldly informs him after he is hired as a full-time bodyguard on the grounds that he's too stupid to be a serious romantic or business threat.
_	Parliamentary debates between the two sometimes turned acrimonious, with Cakobau questioning her right to speak on matters pertaining to indigenous Fijians on the grounds that she was not indigenous.
_	The United States did not send a women's swim team to the Games on the grounds that it was obscene, the first American women's swim team appeared in the 1920 Brussels Games.
_	As an anti-Communist Romanian émigré living in France, Ionesco was often offended by the way in which so many French intellectuals embraced Stalinism and would either justify or deny all of the crimes of the Stalin regime under the grounds that the Soviet Union was a "progressive" nation leading humanity to a better future.
_	He sought a part as a college professor but was turned down on the grounds that he did not fit the part.
_	Planned Parenthood and other opponents rejected it on the grounds that the communication was religious indoctrination, the science was inconclusive, and the legislation amounted to interference in the doctor and patient relationship.
_	The NhRP, while acknowledging that the orcas might be considered slaves according to common usage of the term, vehemently opposed the lawsuit on the grounds that it was strategically misguided and counter-productive; the NhRP's critique highlighted the existence of differing strategies for achieving rights and protections for nonhuman animals.
_	The dichotomy between the popularity and institutional funding of this approach versus the negative findings of most RCTs has been excused on the grounds that RCTs may not be suitable for neurorehabilitation.
_	The court held that Step-Saver's motion for a declaratory judgment was 'unripe', on the grounds that cases involving customer suits had not yet been decided.
_	However, his application for amnesty is rejected on the grounds that his actions were "disproportionate to the objective sought."
_	For example, eight state attorneys general, the City of New York and three land trusts brought suit in 2005 against the five largest electric utilities in the U.S., on the grounds that they were substantial contributors to the "public nuisance" of global warming.
_	The plaintiff moved, on November 23, for reconsideration and re-argument, on the grounds that the court's assessment of the copyrightability of the works was in error.
_	But after seeing how the humans had polluted Earth, Gao God takes the Power Animals from the Gaorangers on the grounds that humanity does not deserve being saved.
_	For example, in December 2011 the government suspended plans to expand a coal-fired power plant in the city of Haimen after 30,000 local residents staged a violent protest against it, on the grounds that "the coal-fired power plant was behind a rise in the number of local cancer patients, environmental pollution and a drop in the local fishermen's catch."
_	The ban on associating with persons with felony convictions has been criticized on the grounds that some releasees may have family members who have criminal records or may live in a neighborhood where most of the residents have criminal records.
_	The junta exiled thousands on the grounds that they were communists and/or "enemies of the country".
_	On 21 June 2012, Basketball Wales confirmed their intent to reject the proposed merger on the grounds that the arrangement was always intended to be temporary in the build-up to the London Olympics, and that it would not be in the best interests for the sport in Wales for the country to forfeit its national team, when the GB team contained no Welsh players.
_	On June 8, 2010 the South Carolina Supreme Court overturned a Myrtle Beach city ordinance requiring all motorcyclists to wear helmets, on the grounds that the state law, requiring helmets only for riders under age 21, cannot be preempted by a city ordinance.
_	In November 1962, President Kennedy suggested cancelling Centaur entirely, but was talked out of it on the grounds that the experience gained with liquid hydrogen rocket engines was vital to the success of the Apollo program.
_	It states that the African Commission on Human and Peoples' Rights "ordered Sudan to amend Article 152 on the grounds that flogging amounted to state-sanctioned torture" in 2003.
_	The "Journal of Personality and Social Psychology", "Science Brevia" and "Psychological Science" each rejected the paper on the grounds that it was a replication.
_	Avram Davidson, who had grown disappointed with de Camp's short stories on the grounds that they played great ideas for laughs, found this tale of "an embittered scientist who--with good reason--hates the whole human race" the "sole exception ... it is so authentic-sounding that one could scream."
_	When Campus Crusade produced a shorter version "The Story of Jesus for Children", which included new footage, Heyman sued Crusade on the grounds that the new version damaged his reputation.
_	The series was initially nominated for the Pulitzer Prize for general reporting, but the Pulitzer board decided not to award the "Sun-Times" when editor Ben Bradlee of the "Washington Post" led an attack on the grounds that the reporters used undercover reporting, a form of deception, to report the story.
_	His mother Maharani Chand Kaur became the Empress of Sikh Empire, from (1840–41) she challenged Sher Singh, the second son of Maharaja Ranjit Singh Sher-e-Panjab, the stepbrother of her husband Kharak Singh, on the grounds that her co-daughter Nau Nihal, Singh's widow, Sahib Kaur, was pregnant saying that she should assume regency on behalf of the unborn legal successor to her husband's throne.
_	The case dismissed an attempt to set aside R (Bancoult) v Secretary of State for Foreign and Commonwealth Affairs (No 2) [2008] UKHL 61 on the grounds that the British government had failed to disclose a feasibility study relating to the Chagos Islands.
_	As Yi Seong-gye took full control of the military, King Chang was driven to Ganghwado and replaced on the throne by King Gongyang of Goryeo on the grounds that Gongyang was of true royal blood.
_	Home rejected the proposal on the grounds that: "You'll get a sort of Top of the Pops contest.
_	In 1979, Jim Callaghan became the first incumbent Prime Minister to agree to a debate but the idea was rejected by Margaret Thatcher on the grounds that presidential-style debates were alien to Britain.
_	It was reported that AKP MPs opposed the creation of 'reserve MPs' on the grounds that it threatened the security of sitting MPs by incentivising reserves to incapacitate them in order to take their seat.
_	President George W. Bush publicly opposed ratification of the Kyoto Protocols on the grounds that they unfairly targeted Western industrialized nations such as the United States while favoring major polluters such as China and India.
_	"Diligente" withdrew and later Lemaresquier justified his action on the grounds that other British naval vessels were approaching, which they were not, and the weight of "Recruit"s broadside, which was heavier.
_	Otto's right to inherit his father's lordship on the grounds that the marriage between his parents had been morganatic.
_	After assurances of legality on Allende's part, the murder of the Army Commander-in-Chief, General René Schneider and Frei's refusal to form an alliance with Alessandri to oppose Allende – on the grounds that the Christian Democrats were a workers' party and could not make common cause with the oligarchs – Allende was chosen by a vote of 153 to 35.
_	In the early 2010s, Canada's federal government rejected a proposal to formally designate Hanley as a Person of National Historic Significance, on the grounds that simply being the first of something was not necessarily a sufficient condition by itself for being named to the registry.
_	Cromwell did not put him on trial, on the grounds that the sentence would have been death.
_	This law was used to prosecute women for cross-dressing, on the grounds that their dressing outside of gender norms constituted a "disguise".
_	They had had their first son in 1911, but Yanjmaa's parents objected to the relationship on the grounds that Sükhbaatar was too poor.
_	Because there was no acknowledgement of the sovereignty of Christ in terms of the Solemn League and Covenant, however, a party of dissenters refused to enter into this national arrangement (the “Revolution Settlement”), on the grounds that it was forced upon the Church and did not adhere to the nation's previous covenanted settlement.
_	Ruddiman's work has, in turn, been challenged on the grounds that comparison with an earlier interglaciation ("Stage 11", approximately 400,000 years ago) suggests that 16,000 more years must elapse before the current Holocene interglaciation comes to an end, and that thus the early anthropogenic hypothesis is invalid.
_	On June 12, Judge Charles R. Barrett granted Sears' motion to dismiss the suit filed by the three Chicago suburbs on the grounds that interference with television reception caused by construction of the Sears building did not violate constitutional rights and that the suburbs involved in the suit do not have any right to undistorted television reception.
_	This was approved on the grounds that money raised from private equity had been insufficient to bring the project to completion.
_	Furthermore, the judge denied Jayne the opportunity to revise his complaint before dismissal on the grounds that the civil rights statute under which the action had been filed () applies only to state actors, which Google is not.
_	(Charges against Lundy were dropped on the grounds that he had been traveling and not in control of the newspaper when the story was printed.)
_	Pelletier considered reopening a 2002 settlement with the Innu on the grounds that the agreement did not properly address concerns about Quebec's land and laws.
_	Pevere reacted negatively when CBC Television announced in 1992 that it was folding "The National" and "The Journal" into the new "Prime Time News", on the grounds that the new program's title was too similar to "Prime Time".
_	The magazine then refused Lomborg's request to print a lengthy point-by-point rebuttal in his own defence, on the grounds that the 32 pages would have taken a disproportionate share of the month's installment.
_	The Svea Court of Appeals later overturned the verdict on the grounds that the prosecutor had failed to disprove that Ekeroth acted in self-defence.
_	The "alter-globalisation" French movement was thus opposed to the "Treaty establishing a Constitution for Europe" on the grounds that it only advanced neoliberalism and an Anglo-Saxon economic model.
_	An application for judicial review may be made on the grounds that the magistrates' court has exceeded its powers by making an error of law, acting outside of its jurisdiction or breached natural justice.
_	The United States Customs Service intercepted two shipments of these cameras, and sought to prevent their entry into the United States on the grounds that they infringed Fuji's patents.
_	Gibbens submitted that Davies's testimony should be rejected, on the grounds that he "never appreciated what in fact was the import of his words".
_	However, on 23 March 2011, the Spanish Supreme Court banned Sortu from registering as a political party on the grounds that it was linked to ETA.
_	This agreement was rejected by UCU's membership on the grounds that it failed to address members' concerns.
_	The medical committee rejected the protest on the grounds that all classifications had been determined at the start of the competition.
_	A dispute of a similar nature has arisen over the status of the state of Goguryeo in ancient history, with China claiming it as Chinese on the grounds that much of it existed within the current borders of China as well as the ancient borders of China.
_	The broadcasters declined to show the video, on the grounds that it could have been offensive or disturbing to a large number of viewers.
_	Less than a month after the bill was signed into law, the Hispanic Interest Coalition of Alabama (HICA) filed the case "Hispanic Interest Coalition of Alabama v. Bentley" challenging HB 56 on the grounds that various provisions of the act, and the entire law as a whole, are preempted by federal law, and are therefore illegal.
_	The House of Lords dismissed the claimant's final appeal, holding that she was not owed any duty under the Occupiers' Liability (Scotland) Act 1960 on the grounds that she had voluntarily decided to run the risk of walking on the railway line.
_	These were on the grounds that the law was not beneficial to the majority of Filipinos, due to the increase in prices of oil products and commodities, a family has incurred an additional expense of ₱2,644 monthly for farmers and ₱3,640 for workers.
_	Eliot Grossman and Marlene Kamish, attorneys for Abu-Jamal, criticized the ruling on the grounds that it denied the possibility of a "trial de novo," at which they could introduce evidence that their client had been framed.
_	BJP leaders Sushma Swaraj and Arun Jaitley strongly objected to the proposal on the grounds that it was "unconstitutional" with the purpose of campaigning to wooing Muslim voters in the election.
_	However, he resigned the captaincy in the middle of the match against Northamptonshire in August 2004, handing over to Steve Rhodes for the remainder of the season on the grounds that he wanted to concentrate on his form with the bat.
_	In 1891, German botanist Otto Kuntze challenged the generic name "Banksia" L.f., on the grounds that the name "Banksia" had previously been published in 1775 as "Banksia" J.R.Forst & G.Forst, referring to the genus now known as "Pimelea".
_	League intervened in the case, "Estes v. Rutherford County Regional Planning Commission", to support the mosque on the grounds that the plaintiffs were seeking to interfere with the builders' religious freedoms.
_	Goldberg refused this demand on the grounds that the ROC—which at the time had no practicing research astronomers—would have to apply and be considered in the usual way.
_	Not long after purchasing the Foxboro Park, Kraft moved to evict Sarkis on the grounds that he did not have a valid lease.
_	The report considered that the journalists acted reasonably in using the statement, despite Asquez's refusal to sign it, on the grounds that Asquez had given two separate, near-identical statements (including one to a lawyer), and that they considered it unlikely that somebody would invent such a dramatic account.
_	Although in favor of equal access to government institutions such as court houses, city halls, and libraries, Williams opposes anti-discrimination laws directed at the private sector on the grounds that such laws infringe upon the people's right of freedom of association.
_	He rejects a binary division of the world into "dar al-Islam" (the abode of Islam) and "dar al-harb" (the abode of war), on the grounds that such a division is not mentioned in the Qur'an.
_	He took this oath so that his father, Shantanu could marry a fisherwoman Satyavati — Satyavati's father had refused to give his daughter's hand to Shantanu on the grounds that his daughter's children would never be rulers.
_	Park conservation managers and scientists opposed a general cull on the grounds that coyotes have the ability to reproduce quickly, and culling would be likely to have no impact, or the opposite of the desired effect.
_	She later, however, refuses a loan on the grounds that the IMF tends not to act in people's best interests anyway.
_	The Americans initially rejected Mohammad Reza's suggestion that they join him in supporting the Iraqi Kurdish "peshmerga" fighting for independence on the grounds that an independent Kurdistan would inspire the Turkish Kurds to rebel, and they had no interest in antagonising the NATO member Turkey.
_	The Hasmonean King Alexander Jannaeus, besieged the city of Gaza around 100 BC, on the grounds that the Gazans had favoured the Ptolemies over the Judaeans in their recent battles.
_	Malone wrote a contribution for "Healing Priesthood: Women's Voices Worldwide", in which he argued that women should be allowed to hear confessions and absolve penitents, on the grounds that some Catholics might prefer to confess their sins to a woman.
_	However, this proposal was rejected on the grounds that the biometric system had eliminated fraudulent claims amounting to R2 billion annually; that further work to remove duplicate entries could save another R2 billion annually; and that SAPO did not have a banking licence, nor enough post offices to properly distribute grants.
_	The prosecution was canceled on the grounds that the defendants' right of due process had been violated.
_	R.W. Dixon in his "History of the Church of England" justified the Dissolution of the monasteries on the grounds that they were under "the condemnation of Sodom and Gomorrah", i.e., some monks and nuns were homosexual.
_	Agnew also filed a motion to block any indictment on the grounds that he had been prejudiced by improper leaks from the Justice Department, and tried to rally public opinion, giving a speech before a friendly audience in Los Angeles asserting his innocence and attacking the prosecution.
_	Other readers, however, reject the inclusion of this novel in the "magic realism" genre, which includes explicitly supernatural works by Murakami, Calvino, Kundera and Marquez, on the grounds that the "magic" in "The Brief Wondrous Life of Oscar Wao" is family folklore, and not a necessary plot element.
_	The Board refused to view or rate "Not a Love Story" on the grounds that OFVAS did not own the film or have any distribution rights.
_	She continued to be manned by an Army crew and made several further trips between Tasmania and the mainland, but in April 1947 it was reported that the ship was to be scrapped on the grounds that she was considered unseaworthy.
_	The Shipping Control Board rejected Duthrie's representations on the grounds that "Crusader" would need extensive alterations before she could be permanently used for commercial trade, and it would take at least a year to complete the necessary works.
_	The legislature approved the bill, but it was vetoed by Governor Buddy Roemer on the grounds that it went beyond the scope of the 1973 United States Supreme Court decision "Roe v. Wade".
_	The European Commission cleared the joint venture in October 2007 on the grounds that the activities of Areva and MHI are geographically complementary and Atmea was unlikely to strengthen the competitiveness of each parent company.
_	Sitwell resisted on the grounds that he could not be forced to make a criminally libellous statement.
_	In October 2009, a suit was filed by the Natural Resources Defense Council that challenged the pipeline on the grounds that its permit was based on a deficient environmental impact statement.
_	He also briefly aroused controversy by proposing reversing the slow and fast lanes on provincial highways, on the grounds that this would equalize the rate at which the lanes broke down and therefore save on maintenance costs; nothing came of the proposal.
_	A major disruption to "Banksia"<nowiki>'</nowiki>s taxonomic nomenclature occurred in 1890, when Otto Kuntze challenged "Banksia" L.f. on the grounds that "Banksia" J.R.Forst & G.Forst had precedence.
_	However, due to a number of major controversies, she was barred from Miss Universe 2000 on the grounds that as the first runner-up to Miss World, she was contracted to the organization and would have to succeed to that title if Yukta Mookhey, the winner that year, did not complete her reign.
_	Commodification is often criticised on the grounds that some things ought not to be treated as commodities—for example water, education, data, information and knowledge in the digital age.
_	The Dominicans attacked it, on the grounds that Molina and all the Jesuits denied efficacious grace.
_	He was denied a disciplinary tribunal on the grounds that he had less than two years' continuous membership of the party at the time of his alleged offence(s).
_	After the 2008 Kosovo declaration of independence, Venezuelan President Hugo Chávez announced that Venezuela does not recognise Kosovo's independence on the grounds that it has been achieved through U.S. pressure and criticised a recent political movement calling out for a more autonomous Zulia state.
_	The Provisional Government of Alexander Kerensky wants to continue the war, but the radical Bolsheviks urge an end to the war at all costs while others in the Party – including Stalin – urge continuation of the fighting on the grounds that Russia's defeat will lead to the re-establishment of the Czar.
_	When Albert demurred on the grounds that they might be jostled by crowds, the King replied, "When I lived here I was quite as unpopular as you are and they never bothered me."
_	People have also resisted the council tax on the grounds that the government was not properly discouraging travellers from setting up camp nearby, or had failed to properly clean up hazardous waste on their property.
_	In the late 1970s, a proposed incorporation of Extremadura into the Andalusian Autonomous Community was rejected by Andalusia on the grounds that Extremadura was too poor, and Extremadura itself felt that its other option, New Castile, was also too poor.
_	When the uncle returns he tells Jack that the boy has to be killed, on the grounds that it will be more humane than what the gangsters will do to him, Jack offers to kill the boy.
_	They had discussed this with Death and had turned down his offer to extend the duration of their existence, by letting them stay in his domain, on the grounds that it wouldn't be the same as actually lengthening their lives.
_	In "The Last Step," a children's teacher in a future Martian colony takes various petty measures to interrupt a children's game on the grounds that they take it too seriously, unaware that the "game" is in fact using sympathetic magic to save the colony from an upcoming hostile invasion.
_	Chen Shou declined the appointment on the grounds that he had to look after his elderly mother.
_	When the Guardian Insurance Office was established in 1821, he was a candidate for the actuaryship, but the directors objected to him on the grounds that he was a Jew.
_	The court of Bhopal refused to grant him the title of Nawab on the grounds that he was an illegitimate son.
_	The court voided the seizure on the grounds that the law was passed after "Kitty" had left the United States and her captain could not have known of its passage.
_	The fable concerns a trumpeter who is taken by the enemy in battle and pleads to be spared on the grounds that he bears no weapons.
_	The export of live animals from Australia has generated some controversy, with animal rights organisations such as Animals Australia asking it to be banned on the grounds that certain countries where animals are shipped have no laws to protect them from cruelty.
_	Moreover, the IHC had barred him from performing his duties on the grounds that the process of his election was not transparent.
_	On July 20, 2015, within five days of West's announcement as the headlining artist of the closing ceremonies of the 2015 Pan American Games, Change.org user XYZ collected over 50,000 signatures for West's removal as headliner, on the grounds that the headlining artist should be Canadian.
_	District Court subsequently blocked the annexation of three of the seven parcels on the grounds that they were outside of Keene's extraterritorial jurisdiction.
_	However, Salandra soon fell out with Giolitti over the question of Italian participation in World War I. Giolitti opposed Italy's entry into the war on the grounds that Italy was militarily unprepared.
_	He is almost shot by Guile in order to end his suffering, but Dhalsim stops him on the grounds that Blanka is essentially still himself.
_	In a meeting in Dean Caudwell's office, Marcus objects to the chapel attendance requirement on the grounds that he is an atheist.
_	e-gold filed a motion to dismiss the case on the grounds that they did not fit the definition of a money transmitter.
_	Since Selzer had, in Jones' opinion, consistently proven himself to be wrong about absolutely everything (having once barred Jones from doing any cartoons featuring Pepé Le Pew, on the grounds that he perceived them as not being funny, which led to Jones and Maltese to do "For Scent-imental Reasons", which won an Oscar, which Selzer accepted), the only possible option was to make the cartoon.
_	The Hawk system was approved on the grounds that it was a "purely defensive" weapon.
_	He refused to attend the synod, and Archbishop Serlo of Apamea questioned its authority to proceed in the absence of the defendant, perhaps on the grounds that he had not been duly summoned.
_	Macedonians have been refused the right to register political parties (see United Macedonian Organization Ilinden and UMO Ilinden - PIRIN) on the grounds that the party was an "ethnic separatist organization funded by a foreign government", something that is against the Bulgarian constitution.
_	Democrats, initially reluctant to support the Bill on the grounds that the payments were necessary to keep the West Bank from political upheaval, became more inclined to support the bill in 2017.
_	Another rule lasted much longer – a 1947 Cabinet Office minute barred ministers from appearing on the programme for many years on the grounds that a minister should not be expected to answer questions beyond their ministerial brief.
_	She determines to follow him, but Peter threatens to have the Terran authorities lock her up on the grounds that she is pregnant.
_	In May 2013 Republicans in the House of Representatives defended the Northern Route Approval Act, which would allow for congressional approval of the pipeline, on the grounds that the pipeline created jobs and energy independence.
_	The Finnish Medical Association opposed this on the grounds that doctors were already overburdened with work, and Basic Services Minister Paula Risikko suggested that more medical workers could be employed by police departments instead.
_	The defense moved to dismiss the indictments on the grounds that federal obscenity statutes violated the constitutional guarantees of privacy and liberty that were protected by the due process clause.
_	Minneapolis ordinance was struck down on the grounds that it was ambiguous and vague, however, despite of its failure the proposal influenced other communities across the United States.
_	The court did not concur with the auditor’s conclusions, on the grounds that the wording of the complaint contained an element that was not entirely clear, which meant it did not comply with formal requirements for a complaint to be considered by the Council of State on its merits as regards content.
_	Blanquet protested the order on the grounds that there were not enough men aboard the French ships to both sail the ships and man the guns.
_	This model has faced criticism on the grounds that it has failed to sufficiently promote social integration, although some commentators have questioned the dichotomy between diversity and integration that this critique presumes.
_	The plan gained the approval of all three governments, but caused considerable controversy within the Jewish community of Poland, on the grounds that it played into the hands of anti-Semites.
_	In 2002, it was changed to two heart-shaped lollipops (one pink with a blue heart and stick, the other blue with a pink heart and stick), on the grounds that sharing milkshakes and smoothies can spread germs according to Play-Along-Toys.
_	An association between tobacco and heart attacks was first mentioned in the 1930; a large case–control study found a significant association in 1940, but avoided saying anything about cause, on the grounds that such a conclusion would cause controversy and doctors were not yet ready for it.
_	In 1981, Telugu writer V. R. Narla was given the Sahitya Akademi Award for his play, "Sita Josyam", but returned it on the grounds that the Akademi had allowed an adverse review of the play to be published in their journal, "Indian Literature."
_	In 1982, Deshbandhu Dogra Natan was given the Sahitya Akademi award for his Dogri novel, "Qaidi" ('Prisoner') but returned it on the grounds that he should have received the Award much earlier.
_	In 1983, Gujarati writer Suresh Joshi also returned the Award on the grounds that his book, "Chintayami Manasa", did not, in his opinion, deserve the Award, and also expressed the opinion that the Award was generally granted to authors who were "spent forces".
_	Some speculate that the failure was partly due to MTV choosing not to air the video for "Be Chrool to Your Scuel" on the grounds that it was graphically offensive.
_	Modern scholars generally prefer Ebn Kalbī’s version, on the grounds that it is less colorful and therefore more plausible.
_	In the aftermath of the Sheikh Said rebellion, the Syriac Orthodox Church and Assyrian Church of the East were subjected to harassment by Turkish authorities, on the grounds that some Assyrians allegedly collaborated with the rebelling Kurds.
_	Further complicating matters for Cámara, the British government, which controlled Egypt at the time, informed him on 29 June that his squadron was not permitted to coal in Egyptian waters, on the grounds that it had enough coal to return to Spain and that any coaling activity it undertook in Egypt would violate Egyptian and British neutrality, and that he would have to return to sea within 24 hours.
_	In 1982, Sanford voters approved the repeal of its 1963 village charter and became part of Jerome Township, but a Michigan court overturned the election results on the grounds that it should have been presented as one proposal instead of two.
_	Bakan argues that condemning academic sanctions on the grounds that it politicizes a free and objective learning space is futile because institutions are inherently political.
_	Hayes filed a complaint against the Appellate Judge who ruled against him, Justice Francis Murphy, on the grounds that Murphy had a relationship with the lawyer for the Foundation that he should have disclosed.
_	All of James II's Catholic judges were the object of violent attacks on the grounds that they were lacking in integrity and learning, that they were entirely subject to the will of the Lord Deputy of Ireland, Richard Talbot, 1st Earl of Tyrconnell, and that they were "wretchedly poor and indigent".
_	Geddes viewed the pre-war competition as wasteful, but was opposed to nationalisation on the grounds that it led to poor management, as well as a mutually corrupting influence between railway and political interests.
_	Their name may come from the English "double" in the sense of "duplicate", on the grounds that the boats appeared to be smaller versions of larger ships.
_	Hee tried to join the Royal Navy, but was prevented on the grounds that he knew too much to risk his being captured.
_	He also opposed it on the grounds that the tax would likely be passed onto consumers in the form of higher service and ATM fees.
_	She argues that the altar was dedicated to Olympian Zeus, on the grounds that Zeus Eleutherios was associated with the overthrow of autocrats and Hieron II was a monarch himself and is not otherwise known to have cultivated Zeus Eleutherios, but is known to have carried out several other public works honouring Olympian Zeus.
_	On April 14, 2016, a two-person panel of the California Parole Board recommended granting Van Houten's parole request, but California Governor Jerry Brown vetoed the release on the grounds that:
_	There are approximately 10 buildings on the grounds that were associated with the hospital.
_	A constitution was agreed upon by the Rhodesian and British governments in November 1971, but when the British gauged Rhodesian public opinion in early 1972 they abandoned the deal on the grounds that they perceived most blacks to be against it.
_	However, despite biting being an offense that can warrant a suspension, Burrows did not receive one from the NHL on the grounds that no conclusive evidence that Burrows intentionally bit Bergeron could be found.
_	Commentators mainly praised Hutton's concentration and stamina; his slow scoring, particularly when compared to Bradman's innings of 334, was excused on the grounds that the Oval match was played without a time limit, and run accumulation was more important than fast scoring.
_	Whiteside was convicted, and subsequently applied for a federal writ of habeas corpus, on the grounds that his conviction was tainted under the Sixth Amendment in that his attorney's threat to disclose the perjury had deprived Whiteside of effective assistance of counsel.
_	In that 10th chapter, Quintillian declined to give examples for employing the abundant style, on the grounds that each individual case requires a unique solution.
_	In 2001, the NAIA opposed the Puppy Protection Act (S. 1478 and H.R. 3058) on the grounds that its definitions were too broad, classifying family breeders on the same lines as large commercial operations.
_	Tanya’s mother, June, filed a lawsuit for $100,000 in damages, on the grounds that Sgt. LeBlanc fired negligently into the apartment.
_	The negotiations failed and the Entente powers rejected the German offer on the grounds that Germany had not put forward any specific proposals.
_	The Hofkapellmeister Joseph Eybler denied Schubert's request for a court performance of the mass, on the grounds that it was not in the Kaiser's preferred style; Eybler may have invented this excuse as he favoured the court composer Josef Weigl, and did not wish to pay Schubert the honorarium the performance would incur.
_	Euryptolemus, a cousin of Alcibiades, and several others opposed the motion on the grounds that it was unconstitutional, but they withdrew their opposition after another politician moved that the same penalty applied to the generals be applied to them.
_	Bond also talks about his early involvement with the Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee (SNCC), his nomination at the age of 28 for vice president of the United States, and the Georgia legislature's efforts to prevent him from being seated as a representative on the grounds that he had not supported the Vietnam War.
_	Before the Federal Court, Loh's counsel argued against the amendment and its retrospective effect on the grounds that it was not permissible for the Constitution to be amended in such a way that its "basic structure" was destroyed.
_	He began to hold prayer meetings of his own, without informing or consulting the minister or elders; he began to absent himself from Holy Communion, on the grounds that he could not conscientiously commune along with the unconverted, and also persuaded others to follow this example; and became less regular in his attendance at the ordinary services of the Church.
_	In 1505, the king offered Machado the office of Garter King of Arms, but he declined on the grounds that he was too old and weak.
_	Hite dismissed fourteen of the charges, with leave to amend, on the grounds that they were legally insufficient because they did not include details such as the names of the alleged victims and the locations and dates of the videoed events.
_	The Chamber rejected a proposition to declare themselves a national or constituent assembly on the grounds that such a measure would be an usurpation of authority and destroy the constitution under which they were acting.
_	Polybius is the most euhemerist source to this date: he justifies the description of Aeolus in the "Odyssey" as "king of the winds" on the grounds that Aeolus "taught navigators how to steer a course in the regions of the Strait of Messina, whose waters are ... difficult to navigate", and insists that the mythical elements in the wanderings are insignificant in comparison to the historical core.
_	While "Jyllands-Posten" has published satirical cartoons depicting Christian figures, it rejected unsolicited cartoons in 2003 which depicted Jesus on the grounds that they were offensive, opening it to accusations of a double standard.
_	In response, Cinemark's representation filed a motion to dismiss on September 27, 2012, on the grounds that there was no liability under Colorado law for failure to prevent an unforeseeable criminal act.
_	It is named for Pollux, the twin of Castor on the grounds that it is often found associated with petalite (previously known as "castorite").
_	The self-esteem of the main character, a returning Korean War veteran, is contrasted with the white voter registrar, who refuses to allow the veteran to register on the grounds that he lied about being a member of the Army Reserve.
_	In the same year, he submitted a postdoctoral dissertation that argued that homosexuality was innate, but it was rejected by the University of Amsterdam on the grounds that it was "in conflict with morality and offensive to others".
_	Chester refuses on the grounds that every time Duke gets a "great idea", Chester is the one that gets the runaround.
_	Horn recalled pleading to the band to record it on the grounds that they needed a hit single, despite the group's reluctance.
_	In 2004, the United States announced that it opposed the inclusion of a verification mechanism in the treaty on the grounds that the treaty could not be effectively verified.
_	They argue that only patrilineal descent can transmit Jewish identity on the grounds that all descent in the Torah went according to the male line.
_	However, the criteria used to support the rating were challenged on the grounds that Brazil was the only country in where "Aquarius" had or was going to distributed to give the film such a high rating and that other more graphic films in Brazil had received less restrictive ratings.
_	Bulfin refused the appointment on the grounds that as a Catholic and an Irishman it would be distasteful to him to do any work which was not of a purely military character.
_	However, the request was denied on the grounds that Wright is a Portuguese citizen.
_	Around 2009, TTC and Tetris Holding LLC brought legal action against BioSocia, Inc., on the grounds that BioSocia's "Blockles" game infringed on proprietary rights that were held by TTC and Tetris Holding LLC.
_	Nevertheless, the Chattanooga court refused to reopen the case and the Tennessee Supreme Court refused to authorize a stay of execution that would have allowed for a new trial, on the grounds that there had been no specific error in the trial to warrant it.
_	Evans also argued against miscegenation and Catholic and Jewish immigration, on the grounds that they were threats to genetic "good stock", a racial division which was then widely supported among white Americans.
_	Stephan Kinsella has objected to "intellectual property" on the grounds that the word "property" implies scarcity, which may not be applicable to ideas.
_	When a question about cousin marriage was eventually considered in 1871 for the census, according to George Darwin, it was rejected on the grounds that the idle curiosity of philosophers was not to be satisfied.
_	In 2008 the Oxford Consistory Court (presided over by the same judge) declined to follow that case as a precedent, on the grounds that "that decision had failed to take account of the commemoration of English saints and martyrs of the Reformation era in the Church of England's calendar of festivals.
_	Dr Pita Sharples, co-leader of the Māori Party, criticized the appointment on the grounds that the government had not consulted his party.
_	The post-1959 Cuban government has repudiated the agreement on the grounds that it was forced upon them by the United States and therefore was a not valid legal agreement.
_	The head of the Pattani Dutch trading post, Victor Sprinckel, refused on the grounds that he was too busy dealing with Portuguese opposition in Southeast Asia.
_	They appealed on the grounds that the trial had excluded the expert testimony provided.
_	The fullest edition of "CH" is that by Cenderelli (1965: 143–81), who lists references only where the source is "CJ" but otherwise gives the full text, as did Haenel (1837: 57–80), though he included only texts explicitly attributed to "CH" by ancient authorities and so did not cite the "CJ" material, on the grounds that it was only implicitly attributed.
_	CEZ planned to modernize unit 2, a plan which was challenged in 2010 by Micronesia in the framework of the Espoo Convention on the grounds that the expansion of the power station would impact global warming and through this the environment of Micronesia.
_	On September 25, 2014, McGuire appeared in court with her new attorney Lois DeJulio, a public defender, to try to get a hearing that could overturn her 2007 murder conviction, on the grounds that her previous legal representation (by Joe Tacopina) was inadequate or ineffective.
_	When some refused to move on the grounds that it was a public street and no other individuals were asked to move, they allege they were assaulted.
_	Hirabayashi and his attorney first petitioned Judge Black to dismiss the charges "on the grounds that [General DeWitt's] orders and proclamations involved are unconstitutional by virtue of being in violation of the Fifth Amendment."
_	Therefore, according to Straus, "[s]enior officers opposed the taking of prisoners[,] on the grounds that it needlessly exposed American troops to risks..."
_	On the 50th anniversary of Verwoerd's assassination in 2016, the major debate within the South Africa media was whatever Tsafandas should be regarded as a hero or not, with some arguing that Tsafandas should be seen as an anti-apartheid hero while arguing against such an interpretation under the grounds that Tsfandas assassinated Verwoerd because he was mentally ill, not because he was opposed to Verwoerd's politics.
_	Prime Minister Brown (who had replaced Blair on 27 June, 2007) rejected calls for an election on the grounds that the treaty had significant differences from the constitution.
_	However, they acquiesced to the enactment of the 1868 constitution on the grounds that the U.S. Army's occupation of Mississippi, which prevented a violent Democratic takeover of the state, would end following a Democrat ascending to the U.S. presidency later in the year.
_	He owned "L'Autre Journal", a newspaper that was published bimonthly and included articles criticizing the government, but it was suspended by the National Communications Council in December 2003 on the grounds that some of its content could "disturb public order".
_	Buell was urged by his officers to counterattack the next day, but he refused on the grounds that he did not know exactly how many Confederates he was facing.
_	"Landing on Water" came after Young settled out of court a lawsuit from Geffen Records, who had sued Young for $3.3 million, on the grounds that Young's mid-'80s records were non-commercial and musically uncharacteristic.
_	She was dismissed on 25 April 1921 on the grounds that "acts of revolutionary propaganda carried out by Mlle Marie Guillot are incompatible with the functions of a public teacher."
_	It was also raised in the case of "Washam" that the Federal Analogue Act was unconstitutionally vague, but in this case the court rejected this argument on the grounds that the defendant’s actions in concealing her activities and lying to DEA agents showed that she knew her actions were illegal, and furthermore that “…a person of common intelligence has sufficient notice under the statute that 1,4-Butanediol is a controlled substance analogue.”
_	The declaration of incompatibility was quashed by the Court of Appeal on the grounds that "a broad margin of appreciation must be accorded to the state [and] a fair balance has been struck by the law as it presently stands until the legislature decides otherwise".
_	The complaint was dismissed in July 1961 on the grounds that Article 29 had made the new delimitation of the federal territory an exclusively federal matter.
_	De Lamourous refused the offer on the grounds that she could not be the cause of another risking their life.
_	His claim was denied on the grounds that he was precluded by the terms of the contract from disputing the judgment and determinations of the Overseer of Works.
_	The University would provide and pay two professors; one of mathematics and natural philosophy and the other of applied mechanics, on the grounds that their service would be useful to both institutions.
_	England's Laura Turner and Australia's Sally Pearson had a simultaneous false start, but only Turner was initially disqualified, "on the grounds that her reaction time was the quicker".
_	The by-election result was immediately denounced by the agent of the Liberal Party candidate, on the grounds that Aspinall was ineleigible due to bribery in the previous contest, and bribery had taken place again.
_	Her committee's report on violence, entitled "The War Against Women", was supported by the prime minister and opposition parties, but opposed by some Progressive Conservative backbenchers on the grounds that its title was "confrontational and inflammatory".
_	Philosopher Barry Dainton modifies Bostrom's trilemma by substituting "neural ancestor simulations" (ranging from literal brains in a vat, to far-future humans with induced high-fidelity hallucinations that they are their own distant ancestors) for Bostrom's "ancestor simulations", on the grounds that every philosophical school of thought can agree that sufficiently high-tech neural ancestor simulation experiences would be indistinguishable from non-simulated experiences.
_	After a lengthy inquiry in which the Judge and the jockeys were interviewed, the Stewards disqualified Craganour on the grounds that he had failed to keep a straight course and had thereby “jostled”, “bumped and bored” and “interfered” with other runners.
_	The transfer of the share to Thomas may have been related to the fact that after the end of the lease two of Evans' old partners engaged in a protraced lawsuit to recover money from him on the grounds that he had breached the agreement with them.
_	In Leicestershire, "scab" was chanted at the working majority against the few who went on strike, on the grounds that they had betrayed their area's union.
_	Pashupatas disapprove of the Vaishnava theology, known for its doctrine servitude of souls to the Supreme Being, on the grounds that dependence upon anything cannot be the means of cessation of pain and other desired ends.
_	The Orthodox Ohrid Archbishopric has been refused registration by the Macedonian State Religion Commission on the grounds that one group may be registered for each confession and that the name was not sufficiently distinct from that of the Macedonian Orthodox Church (MOC).
_	Malvy gave a subsidy to Almereyda and "Le Bonnet Rouge" on the grounds that although they would criticize the war they would discourage violent opposition to the war, a tactic he called co-opting the left.
_	In an administrative resolution dated May 12, 1997, the SCT denied the concession, on the grounds that the applicant "did not guarantee the social interest" by proceeding to install and operate the radio station.
_	In 2016, the awarding of a Knighthood to Swire by the outgoing Prime Minister, David Cameron, was criticised by various newspapers, such as "The Sun" and "Daily Telegraph", on the grounds that Cameron was 'rewarding his mates', rather than using the honours system to promote the public interest.
_	Ishii had proposed the creation of a Japanese biological and chemical research unit in 1930, after a two-year study trip abroad, on the grounds that Western powers were developing their own programs.
_	The following month, President Hassan Sheikh Mohamud asked Shirdon to resign from office on the grounds that Shirdon was allegedly ineffective in the job.
_	Between 1999 and 2010, each party appealed to the BIA to support its view and to intervene on the grounds that the other had not involved the "whole tribal community" of both enrolled citizens and potentially enrolled citizens.
_	Four candidacies were rejected: those of Poungui, Marcel Guitoukoulou, Rigobert Ngouolali, on the grounds that they had failed to establish their continuous residency in Congo-Brazzaville for at least two years, and that of UPADS dissident Christophe Moukoueke, on the grounds that he exceeded the 70-year age limit for candidates.
_	On July 3, 2006, to mark the strip's first anniversary, Martin relaunched the site with a new URL, design and title, Wally and Osborne, on the grounds that On the Rocks was too generic a phrase.
_	This was objected to on the grounds that it would lose moral capital for Saigon as they promoted their cause as just and compatible with the physical safety of fellow Vietnamese, as well as fears that it would provoke a communist land invasion from the north.
_	Certainly one could reject the method on the grounds that there is no "a priori" reason for its adoption.
_	He appealed on the grounds that no such offence existed.
_	Another key piece of legislation was the Naturalization Act of 1870, which extended citizenship rights to African Americans but barred Chinese from naturalization on the grounds that they and other Asians could not be assimilated into American society.
_	However, Gallagher and Kaufman criticized Benbow's and others' reports, which found that males were over-represented in the highest percentages, on the grounds that they had not ensured representative sampling.
_	The offer was rejected by the British on the grounds that it was not "compatible with our status as a first class power to depend on others for weapons of this supreme importance."
_	But this prestigious post, the highest honour available to an English musician, was quickly revoked on the grounds that it had been promised to Ferrabosco's son.
_	In August 1917, as the British cabinet discussed the Balfour Declaration, Edwin Samuel Montagu, the only Jew in the British Cabinet and a staunch anti-Zionist, "was passionately opposed to the declaration on the grounds that (a) it was a capitulation to anti-Semitic bigotry, with its suggestion that Palestine was the natural destination of the Jews, and that (b) it would be a grave cause of alarm to the Muslim world".
_	In 2011, Riley, now aged 56 and suffering from physical disabilities, appealed his most recent denial on the grounds that there was no evidence he continued to be a danger to the community, that the parole board did not consider his age, and that his sentence had been unconstitutionally excessive.
_	On January 17, 2001, the American Library Association (ALA) voted to challenge CIPA, on the grounds that the law required libraries to unconstitutionally block access to constitutionally protected information on the Internet.
_	In 1849, he signed a petition that urged the then New South Wales Governor, Sir Charles Augustus Fitzroy, not to introduce more than a fair proportion of Crown prisoners to the Ipswich and Moreton Bay region on the grounds that their presence in the area would reduce the future prosperity of the district.
_	Elliott had served as vice-president of the San Francisco chapter of the lesbian group Daughters of Bilitis, and edited the chapter's newsletter, "Sisters", but was expelled from the group in 1973 on the grounds that she was not really a woman.
_	Heinlein calls for a society where all lawyers and politicians are women, essentially on the grounds that they possess a mysterious feminine practicality that men cannot duplicate."
_	At the Kefauver Committee hearings, he pleaded the Fifth Amendment on the grounds that any response to the questions might "discriminate against me."
_	The BBC received intense criticism in January 2009 for its decision not to broadcast a television appeal by aid agencies on behalf of the people of Gaza during the 2008–2009 Israel–Gaza conflict, on the grounds that it could compromise the BBC's journalistic impartiality.
_	Given that, Yankee manager Billy Martin decided to sit out Reggie Jackson on the grounds that he was 1-for-15 so far in the series and, in his own words, "can't hit Splittorff."
_	However, in November 2017 the Tel Aviv District Court issued a permanent injunction against Uber's utilizing private cars in Israel on the grounds that these lacked the insurance coverage of regulated taxis.
_	Instead, the Court overturned the grant of leave to appeal on the grounds that leave should be granted only in cases involving a matter of public importance or a significant amount of money (defined in 1901 as GBP 300).
_	In effect this has led the Government to intervene in the activities of minority religious groups, particularly Protestants, on the grounds that their practices did not promote national interests or demonstrated disloyalty to the Government.
_	On 21 June 2017, fourteen of these charges were dismissed, with leave to amend, on the grounds that they were legally insufficient.
_	On a second appeal, the Supreme Court in 1946 vacated the fraud conviction, on the grounds that women were improperly excluded from the jury panel.
_	Winterbottom sought to extend the "ratio" of the court in "Langridge v Levy" but the court rejected this on the grounds that that case involved a gun whose safety had been misrepresented by the vendor.
_	The pay increases were justified by the Government on the grounds that the salaries had to keep pace with those in the private sector to attract the best talent and to avoid corruption.
_	Chief on the agenda was the question of the level of support to be given by the state organization to the European revolutionary movement in general and the Russian revolution in particular, with radical resolutions by John Keracher and Alexander Rovin "to support the Soviet Government in every possible way and to the last dollar and man" defeated by the convention's moderate majority, on the grounds that such declarations might be illegal under the Espionage Act.
_	The scene in which Kesslee tortures Tank Girl was cut heavily on the grounds that she appeared "too ugly" while being tortured.
_	KKC's most famous client was Linda Tripp, one of the most famous whistleblowers in history, for whom they successfully sued the federal government Executive Branch on the grounds that the Clinton Administration violated the Privacy Act while retaliating against her for blowing the whistle on Monica Lewinsky's own brand of executively privileged whistleblowing, which nearly derailed both the presidency of Bill Clinton and the political ambitions of his First Lady, Hillary.
_	Under the reign of the Caliph ‘Umar, the Christian community of Najrān was deported to Mesopotamia, on the grounds that no non-Muslims were to live in the Arabian Peninsula.
_	Their relationship had been opposed by his parents on the grounds that she was a divorced dancer, six years older than he was.
_	According to Long's mother, the VA then sent him a letter denying him further treatment on the grounds that his disorder was not related to his military service.
_	This arrangement, as well as the continued state financing, has been subject to criticism by non-governmental organizations on the grounds that the channel may be too closely connected to the government to be fully independent and unbiased.
_	After 18 months of negotiations, the talks were called off on the grounds that the deal would not be "financially attractive" to either company's shareholders.
_	On 29 March 2014, the Black Sea Fleet was reported to have refused to add the submarine to its ranks on the grounds that it was obsolete and suffered from a number of technical issues.
_	This claim is made on the grounds that literate people can be trained less expensively than illiterate people, generally have a higher socio-economic status and enjoy better health and employment prospects.
_	They set up home together, and have a daughter, but she is taken from them by the local authority under a "Place of Safety" order on the grounds that she is an unreliable mother with "low intellect".
_	However, this consensus has recently been challenged on the grounds that Daniel prays to God following the defeat of the Babylonian kingdom precisely because Jeremiah's seventy years of exile have been completed and God promised through the prophet that he would respond to such prayers at this time, in which case the seventy weeks prophecy is not a reinterpretation of Jeremiah's prophecy but a separate prophecy altogether.
_	Chamberlain received invitations to lecture on his racial theories at Yale and Johns Hopkins universities, but turned them down on the grounds that he had no wish to visit what he viewed as a culturally and spiritually debased nation like the United States.
_	However, on the grounds that very little was actually known about these islands, Chase and Joy disagreed, proposing instead to sail south far enough to pick up a band of variable breezes that would take them to South America.
_	In October 2007, Edmondson indicted term limits and initiative rights activist Paul Jacob and two others on the grounds that they had illegally used out-of-state petitioners to collect signatures on a ballot initiative.
_	The court martial board dismissed Bissel from the Navy on the grounds that he had sailed southward for too long, had neglected to use the lead and to keep a reckoning, and not insisted that his officers do likewise.
_	Although the ballboy wasn't injured, Broady approached the chair umpire to enquire why Ostapenko had not been defaulted, on the grounds that the racket had been thrown in frustration and not in an accidental fashion.
_	Eight months after his hiring, the Board of Selectmen voted to remove him from office on the grounds that they believed that his job performance had been unsatisfactory, that he had failed to demonstrate a clear pattern of leadership for the town, failed to communicate effectively with the Board of Selectmen and Town Meeting, and consistently proven to be uninformed or misinformed on the status of projects.
_	The opera was later denounced in the Conseil général of the Commune de Paris on the grounds that it espoused anti-revolutionary ideas.
_	The trade was also criticized on the grounds that the Buccaneers did not require Chambers to undergo a team physical, despite his injury history.
_	On 28 January 2015 the government of Sri Lanka, having removed all obstacles for Bandaranayake to hold her position as the 43rd Chief Justice by the President Maithripala Sirisena, on the grounds that her 2013 impeachment was unlawful and as such the appointment of Mohan Peiris, her successor, was void "Ab initio".
_	Routzohn announced that he would start a movement in behalf of Herbert Hoover in the Third Ohio District on the grounds that the State Committee usurped authority in endorsing Willis to the exclusion of all others.
_	Jeffrey Pfeffer and Robert I. Sutton have criticized the practice on the grounds that there is limited empirical evidence of its overall usefulness to organizations.
_	During the American Revolution, the movement to create a state beyond the Alleghenies was revived and a petition for the establishment of "Westsylvania" was presented to Congress, on the grounds that the mountains presented an almost impassable barrier to the east.
_	Some research journals have banned the phrase "more research is needed" on the grounds that it is redundant; it is almost always true and fits almost any article, and so can be taken as understood.
_	While he supported the 1991 Gulf War on the grounds of both humanitarianism and strategic necessity (preventing Saddam Hussein from gaining control of the Persian Gulf and its resources), he opposed American intervention in the Yugoslav Wars on the grounds that America should not be committing the lives of its soldiers to purely humanitarian missions in which there is no American national interest at stake.
_	The state of Oregon objected to the lower voting age, and filed suit on the grounds that the act was unconstitutional.
_	The commission did not help matters by aggressively opposing paralleling road projects, on the grounds that it would spoil the views from the highway.
_	It is also active through making its voice heard in cyberspace, and is known to campaign for votes on the grounds that as a "regional" (as contrasted to the national-level parties that dominate Goa's politics, such as the Indian National Congress and the Bharatiya Janata Party) it would be better able to serve the needs of the electorate.
_	His actual existence has been contested on the grounds that embellishing stories related to Gothic ancestry were rather popular during the Caliphate of Cordova.
_	Indeed, when the 'Constitution Amendment (Legislative Council Abolition) Bill' came before the Legislative Council on 2 December 1959, the council resolved 33 votes to 25 to send it back to the Legislative Assembly on the grounds that such a bill should have originated in the council.
_	Along with this finding, the heavy metal status of some metals is occasionally challenged on the grounds that they are too light, or are involved in biological processes, or rarely constitute environmental hazards.
_	After learning of his book, London County Council dismissed him on the grounds that he was unfit to practice in charge of a mental hospital, but he was reinstated after bringing action for wrongful dismissal.
_	Adam Green argues that Barnard implicitly rejects the queer theoretical conceptions of sexuality on the grounds that such work fails to account for particularity of racialized sexualities.
_	Wilson's widow blamed the government for his death – when Conservative leader Austen Chamberlain called on the evening of his death to offer his condolences, he was by one account greeted by her with the word "murderer" and by another simply asked to leave by Wilson's niece – and she was only persuaded to allow government representation at the funeral on the grounds that not to do so would be disrespectful to the King.
_	On January 31, 2007, the Sixth Circuit Court of Appeals reversed the District Court ruling on the grounds that the plaintiffs could not show that they had been or would be subjected to surveillance personally, and therefore they lacked standing before the Court.
_	Reporting in 1938, the Commission rejected the Peel plan primarily on the grounds that it could not be implemented without a massive forced transfer of Arabs (an option that the British government had already ruled out).
_	In court the Rev. Wagner gives a declaration that he must withhold any information on the grounds that it had been received under the seal of "sacramental confession".
_	During his university years, Baldry was actively involved in student politics and, whilst attending Sussex, took the Students' Union to the High Court on the grounds that the Students' Union was making "ultra vires" payments out of Student Union funds to various political organisations.
_	A defendant convicted of obstructing a court's order related to antiabortion protests was ordered not to "harass, intimidate or picket in front of any gynecological or abortion family planning services center," and this ruling was upheld as not violating the First Amendment to the United States Constitution on the grounds that incidental restrictions of First Amendment rights to freedom of speech and association are permissible if reasonably necessary to accomplish the essential needs of the state and public order.
_	In 2009, "Wired" published "Wired News' Vaporware Awards 2009": "Duke Nukem Forever" was excluded from consideration on the grounds that the project was finally dead.
_	That day it was also blocked from making loans in New Hampshire, on the grounds that it hadn't informed the state of its financial difficulties.
_	The MNP was banned after the 1971 Turkish military memorandum on the grounds that it violated the articles of the Constitution of Turkey dealing with secularism.
_	Whether Antiochus's policy was directed at extermination of Judaism as a culture and a religion, though, is debatable on the grounds that his persecution was limited to Judea and Samaria (Jews in the diaspora were exempt), and that Antiochus was hardly an ideologically motivated Hellenizer.
_	In 1932, Ozaki covered the First Battle of Shanghai, and was shocked to see Japanese soldiers execute Chinese POWs on the streets of Shanghai under the grounds that Chinese were mere "ants", not human beings, an event that deeply traumatized him.
_	The ADA has been criticized on the grounds that it decreases the employment rate for people with disabilities and raises the cost of doing business for employers, in large part due to the additional legal risks, which employers avoid by quietly avoiding hiring people with disabilities.
_	Since the decision of Reed v Town of Gilbert the courts have largely struck down panhandling bans on the grounds that they inappropriately limit the content of the speech of individuals that are panhandling.
_	This study was quickly rebutted on the grounds that it had misinterpreted the findings of earlier studies that it relied upon, nor did it provide a definition for a number of the terms that it used, such as "ecotype".
_	The constitution of the initial Texas order, drafted in 1882, denied membership to blacks on the grounds that the Alliance was a social organization "where we meet with out wives and daughters."
_	The measures were strongly opposed by affected population, community groups, civil society organizations and NGOs on the grounds that at least 200,000 families would have to be displaced from the development sites in addition to the economic and environmental costs.
_	Alone among the many witnesses after the 1950 conviction and imprisonment of the Hollywood Ten for contempt of Congress, Seeger refused to plead the Fifth Amendment (which would have asserted that his testimony might be self incriminating) and instead, as the Hollywood Ten had done, refused to name personal and political associations on the grounds that this would violate his First Amendment rights: "I am not going to answer any questions as to my association, my philosophical or religious beliefs or my political beliefs, or how I voted in any election, or any of these private affairs.
_	Although the UK Independence Party (UKIP) also favoured Scotland remaining within the United Kingdom, Better Together has refused to work with them on the grounds that "they are not a Scottish party".
_	Hurdler Ross Nichols appealed on the grounds that he had hit a misplaced hurdle in the final; his appeal was turned down as meeting officials denied the hurdle had been misplaced, and footage of the race failed to support Nichols.
_	Before the electoral campaign of 2012, he opposed shale drilling, and today he supports it with any risks, on the grounds that Romania's energy independence is a national project.
_	Henry, at the time a Roman Catholic, sought the Pope's approval for an annulment on the grounds that his marriage was invalid because Catherine had first been his brother's wife, using a passage from the Old Testament (Leviticus Chapter 20 Verse 21) to justify his stance:
_	In early April, her brother Martin Galvez filed a motion for an election petition to overturn King's candidacy on the grounds that he had not disclosed certain contracts held by his private security company; Benjamin allowed the case to move forward.
_	From 1981 to 1982, Zündel had his mailing privileges suspended by the Canadian government on the grounds that he had been using the mail to send hate propaganda, a criminal offence in Canada.
_	Humphries ruled Cran guilty of manslaughter and sentenced him to six years in prison, but acquitted Rao on the grounds that inconsistent and conflicting testimony made his role in the attack unclear.
_	In 1865 he was elected for Banbury again, but his defeated opponent Charles Bell petitioned against his return on the grounds that he was an alien.
_	Primarily, the CVRA makes it easier for minority groups to sue governments that use at-large elections on the grounds that they dilute the strength of minority votes.
_	Yang Xingmi was shocked by this proposal, and when Xu and Zhang heard of it, they opposed as well on the grounds that Yang Xingmi built his domain and should transfer it to a son; Yang Xingmi agreed.
_	Within six months of his appointment as Archbishop, Sin was criticising the authorities after the military raided a Manila seminary on the grounds that it was harbouring insurgents.
_	Focusing on survival until rescued by presumed searchers, the Boy Scouts of America especially discourages foraging for wild foods on the grounds that the knowledge and skills needed are unlikely to be possessed by those finding themselves in a wilderness survival situation, making the risks (including use of energy) outweigh the benefits.
_	In May 2013, the firm’s SOMAÏR uranium mine was damaged and one civilian was killed in an Al-Qaeda-linked suicide bomb attack, targeting the firm on the grounds that it was a French-owned company.
_	The European Council for Doctoral Candidates and Junior Researchers opposes the proposal on the grounds that Article 13's exemption for non-commercial groups does not cover all scientific repositories, and cites the Horizon 2020 project as an example of commercial work in the sector.
_	When the King ordered the destruction of the fortifications that surrounded the monastery of Saint-Paul in Verdun, Adalberon refused on the grounds that his hungry soldiers no longer were able to keep the city.
_	On April 6, 2018 it was announced in "Forbes" "magazine" that the United States Department of Justice had seized and shutdown the website of frequent nemesis of NCMEC, Backpage.com, on the grounds that it had frequently facilitated human trafficking.
_	The precedent was overturned by the Ontario Court of Appeal in a 2011 case, "R. v. Petruzzo", on the grounds that the "French Language Services Act" specifically states that municipalities are not required to offer services in French, even in provincially regulated areas such as traffic signage, if the municipality has not specifically passed its own bylaw governing its own provision of bilingual services.
_	Bishops assessed that priests were permitted to denounce conscription on the grounds that the question was not political but moral.
_	On 20 November 1979, the United States requested the cancellation of Koziy's certificate of naturalization on the grounds that Koziy had illegally procured his citizenship by concealment of a material fact or by willful misrepresentation by failing to disclose his involvement in the occupational police in Ukraine.
_	In the end, Iago chooses to depart Agrabah with Cassim instead of staying with Aladdin and Jasmine on the grounds that he could not handle the "lovey-dovey" stuff.
_	However, he defends his proposal on the grounds that 25% of homosexuals attempt suicide and that "a great number of males and females with inborn sexual deviations are suffering from psychosexual pressure."
_	Mirza refused to attend an appointment with a consultant immuno-pathologist at Bart's Hospital in 2000 on the grounds that she did not want to take 'conventional medicine'.
_	The EIC rejected her on the grounds that she was too small for their purposes, they wanting a vessel of at least 400 tons (bm).
_	This conviction was quashed in July 2004 by the Court of Criminal Appeal on the grounds that had new evidence of bank accounts been available to the trial jury they might have had raised doubts therefore rendering the conviction unsafe.
_	A retrial was not ordered on the grounds that Redmond had served virtually all his sentence.
_	This was criticised on the grounds that the judges might do so ineffectively or slowly.
_	When the first volunteer armies were organised, the Chinese Communist Party was completely hostile to them on the grounds that their leaders were bound to capitulate, claiming that the leaders of the volunteer armies were paid by the Japanese and merely pretending to resist.
_	Sinclaire had refused to join the EFD on the grounds that it was a grouping with "extreme views" and consequently had not sat with her UKIP colleagues in the European parliament.
_	The 40-degree elevation was justified on the grounds that destroyers would be screening the battle-fleet during aerial attack, and 40 degrees elevation was adequate to engage aircraft that were concentrating their attack on other ships.
_	The Allies did not intend to conquer the entire island, and the invasion area was mainly selected on the grounds that it was lightly defended and distant from the main Japanese bases at the northern and southern ends of Bougainville.
_	on the grounds that since there is no generally accepted definition of a word, there can never be a definitive count.
_	His split with the Church of England was not amicable and involved (according to one version of events; see Johnson in bibliography) sending a canoe-load of Tsimshians, including Peter Simpson, back to Old Metlakatla to destroy the old church there, on the grounds that ownership of it should not revert to the CMS.
_	A pre-trial motion by the defense resulted in a federal district court eleasing the 21 men on the grounds that no federal laws had been violated.
_	The church was listed as Grade II*, number 1149449, on 18 July 1949 on the grounds that the tower and chancel constitute a medieval element of the dressed and coursed sandstone structure.
_	With the passing of the third Home Rule Act 1914 in the House of Commons in May 1914, it “was of great sadness to him” that William O'Brien's independent All-for-Ireland League party withheld voting for the act (on the grounds that it was a ‘partition deal’).
_	Metabolite's brief to the court suggested that overturning the patent might lead to invalidation of all drug patents on the grounds that the inventors ""merely discovered that certain chemicals interact with the human body in ways directed by chemistry.""
_	Application was made on the grounds that His Honour Judge Platts had erred in law on the grounds he had found the resolution of a technical defect to be inherent and in suggesting it was irrelevant how the problem was identified.
_	George, Williams and Johnson, the three Nigerian council members, all objected on the grounds that the ordinance would inhibit freedom of the press.
_	The United States insisted that such prohibition was indispensable on the grounds that pelagic sealing involved the destruction of breeding stock, because it was practically impossible to distinguish between the male and female seal when in the water; and that it was unnecessarily wasteful, inasmuch as a large proportion of the seals so killed were lost.
_	La Barre was determined to remove La Salle, and in the summer of 1683 sent Aubert and Le Ber to seize Fort Frontenac and La Salle's merchandise on the grounds that La Salle had failed to meet the conditions under which he became owner of the fort.
_	The suit was dismissed on the grounds that removing a monument of the Ten Commandments does not constitute an establishment of religion.
_	John Knox had prohibited funeral sermons "on the grounds that they glorified the deceased and displayed distinctions between rich and poor", however the ban was lifted on this occasion.
_	However, Cobh's protest, on the grounds that their former player Billy Daly had signed for Newcastle West too late to be eligible to play in the match, was upheld by the Football Association of Ireland (FAI), and they were awarded the tie.
_	Respondents appealed to the Seventh Court of Appeals on the grounds that "Mathews v. Eldridge" requires a hearing before the seizure of real property.
_	The book has been criticised on the grounds that since words are so cheap, Dunbar's "vocal grooming" would fall short in amounting to an honest signal.
_	The plaintiffs appealed to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, which dismissed their claims on the grounds that the case raised a nonjusticiable political question.
_	These five architects [Guirgola et al.], known as the "Greys", attacked the "Whites" [Eisenmann et al.] on the grounds that this pursuit of the pure modernist aesthetic resulted in unworkable buildings that were indifferent to site, indifferent to users, and divorced from daily life.
_	The movie was bought for release in the UK by Universal for £1,000 and was retitled "Down on the Farm" on the grounds that the British would not know what a "selection" was.
_	Toomey intervened to have Sarah Murnaghan, a 10-year-old girl dying of cystic fibrosis at the Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, moved ahead of other recipients in obtaining a lung transplant, on the grounds that the existing policy reduced access for children.
_	According to one source in the faculty of the University of Michigan, the campaign against KMS Fusion culminated with a massive incursion into the KMS Fusion facilities by federal agents, who effectively put an end to its operations by confiscating essential materials on the grounds that, inter alia, all information concerning the production of nuclear energy is classified information which belongs exclusively to the federal government.
_	The applicant sought an order setting aside the respondent's combined summons as an irregular proceeding on the grounds that the relief sought (an order setting aside the Master's decision to reject the respondent's objection to an account lodged by the liquidator of a company being wound up) should have been sought in motion proceedings, not by way of combined summons.
_	Some of the historians followed Evelyn Rawski calling the Qing "Early Modern," rather than "late imperial," on the grounds that the Manchus created a centralized empire that the Ming could not have created.
_	When Curtiss-Wright Export Corp. was indicted for violating the embargo through the sale of machine guns to Bolivia, it defended itself on the grounds that the embargo and the proclamation were void, as Congress had improperly delegated legislative power to the executive branch by leaving what was essentially a legislative determination to the President's "unfettered discretion."
_	Following the takeover, Egypt and Israel largely sealed their border crossings with Gaza, on the grounds that Fatah had fled and was no longer providing security on the Palestinian side.
_	This lawsuit, and the one initiated by his production company Voltage Pictures for the prior film "Far Cry", are now being contested by the ACLU and the Electronic Frontier Foundation on the grounds that it violates personal jurisdiction laws, lack of evidence, and improper joinder.
_	The initiative was brought forward by the Progressive Conservative government of Mike Harris, and the Liberal Party opposed it on the grounds that it would divert money from public schools.
_	Mậu and Thảo took over but their initial coup plans for July 15 were shelved when American CIA agent Lucien Conein instructed Thảo's superior, General Trần Thiện Khiêm, the head of the army, to stop the coup on the grounds that it was premature.
_	Dissatisfied with these plans, Glover filed a lawsuit against the producers, including Steven Spielberg, on the grounds that they neither owned his likeness nor had permission to use it.
_	In court, the case was argued by Kapil Sibal and the order for re-examination was squashed on the grounds that it had been issued in a haste and "had not applied his mind".
_	Some claim that he also envied to be the leader of the Navatu people who settled at Navatu island, however, Malodali the Navatu chief refused to cede his position on the grounds that the Gonesau have tasked him in keeping watch of Verata's colony in the Natewa Bay area, a role he intend to retain.
_	The German historian Hans-Ulrich Wehler supported Irving's imprisonment under the grounds that "The denial of such an unimaginable murder of millions, one third of whom were children under the age of 14, cannot simply be accepted as something protected by the freedom of speech".
_	The first Managing Partner of Hyperion, Benjamin Hermans, in the period between announcement and release of AmigaOS 4, ignited a great deal of community controversy by repeatedly claiming that MorphOS, an AmigaOS-like competitor (which had been released in complete form in 2003), was illegal, and had on several occasions threatened to take legal action against it either on the grounds that it was parasitic competition to AmigaOS 4, or even that it was actually based on stolen AmigaOS source code.
_	Opponents, such as the Communications Workers of America (the largest communications labor union in the United States), have argued against One Touch Make Ready proposals on the grounds that the new proposals have the potential to create unsafe working conditions, as well as violate existing labor contracts.
_	This caused an MP to complain in South Australian parliament during production on the grounds that tax payer dollars were being invested in a semi-pornographic film.
_	In "United States v. Klintock" (1820), the Court distinguished "Palmer"—in a case involving piracy by a U.S. citizen, claiming to act under the authority of the Mexican Republic, committed against a Danish ship and citizens, under the fraudulent claim that the Danes were Spanish (Spain being at war with the Mexican Republic)—on the grounds that the victims in "Palmer" were not subjects of a nation recognized by the United States.
_	Skeptics have claimed that Lin's decision to flee to the Soviet Union was illogical, on the grounds that the United States or Taiwan would have been safer destinations.
_	However, the absolutist party of the landowners and the Church, were not satisfied with this compromise, and they continued to regard Miguel as the legitimate successor to the throne on the grounds that according to the Portuguese succession rules (approved by the Cortes after the 1640 Restoration), Pedro had lost the right to the Portuguese crown, when he took possession of a foreign crown (Brazil).
_	The Federal Transport Minister Anthony Albanese rejected Canberra International Airport's draft master plan in November 2008, on the grounds that it did not provide enough detail on the proposal to develop the airport into a freight hub; and that the airport's community consultation had been insufficient.
_	His first wife, Hungarian-born Maria Malvina Gertler was under suspicion by MI5 - and in fact was interned for three months in 1941 on the grounds that she was involved in the "preparation of acts prejudicial to the public safety or the defence of the realm" and held in Holloway prison.
_	He is particularly well known for his fierce opposition, along with 12 other far-right LDP Diet members, to Japan's ratification of the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty during the 1974–1976 session of the Diet, on the grounds that Japan might one day need to acquire its own nuclear arsenal.
_	The University of Toronto (U of T, UToronto, or Toronto) is a public research university in Toronto, Ontario, Canada on the grounds that surround Queen's Park.
_	However, many libraries refused to carry his works on the grounds that they were indecent.
_	Permission was denied by prison authorities on the grounds that the books contained material "potentially detrimental to national security".
_	One of Lee's books, The Confession of a Defector (叛徒的告白), was banned by the authorities on the grounds that it "sabotaged the credibility of the government," "instigated dissension between the government and the people," "violated the basic national policy," "confused public opinion" and "damaged popular sentiments."
_	For example, AMA style dispenses with periods in abbreviations, on the grounds that they are unnecessary for meaning's or clarity's sake in all but very few contexts.
_	While the station's Federal Communications Commission license renewal was pending, George Washington University law professor John F. Banzhaf III filed a petition with the FCC to deny renewal on the grounds that the team's name is a "derogatory racist word," and that its repeated use on the air "is akin to broadcasting obscenity" in violation of federal law.
_	Pullo is assigned by Octavian to kill Caesarion on the grounds that "there cannot be two sons of Caesar."
_	At the end of May, De Beers, the international diamond mining company, suspended its operations in Angola, ostensibly on the grounds that negotiations with the national government reached an impasse.
_	Furthermore, the genus of Grote and Pitt was seemingly based solely on outlines and shape, which promted some researchers, such as the prominent English geologist Henry Woodward, to regard the genus as lacking generic characters and as such being invalid, referring "E. scorpionis" to "Eurypterus" on the grounds that several British species of "Eurypterus", notably "E. scorpiodes" and "E. punctatus" (today recognized as species of "Carcinosoma"), were similar in shape.
_	Digital planetarium manufacturers claim reduced maintenance costs and increased reliability from such systems compared with traditional "star balls" on the grounds that they employ few moving parts and do not generally require synchronisation of movement across the dome between several separate systems.
_	He accepted peace on the grounds that he would gain Muttrah as well as the other places he had taken, and a monthly subsidy.
_	According to the Pacific Legal Foundation (PLF), this could be accomplished in one of three different ways: (1) a rule could be submitted to Congress now by the Trump administration and then repealed by a joint resolution under the CRA, (2) the Trump administration could publish notice that a rule not in effect is being withdrawn or abandoned, or (3) a rule could be thrown out by a court on the grounds that it was never in effect.
_	However, the US government dismissed the case on the grounds that the request had been made by foreign citizens without the support of their government.
_	Eventually, it was justified on the grounds that, during the 1891 insurrection, this was the colour present on the revolutionary flag that "sparked the redeeming lightning" of republicanism.
_	Justin ignores this on the grounds that who she was on Earth isn't who she was in Hell.
_	Despite being more popular than some men's football events (one match saw a 53,000 strong crowd), women's football in England suffered a blow in 1921 when The Football Association outlawed the playing of the game on Association members' pitches, on the grounds that the game (as played by women) was distasteful.
_	Governor Theodore Orji's election was annulled on 25 February 2008, on the grounds that he was ineligible to contest for the office.
_	A group of fifteen competitive female ski jumpers later filed a suit against the Vancouver Organizing Committee for the 2010 Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games on the grounds that it violated the Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms since men were competing.
_	Capparella, Gary H. Rosenberg & Steven W. Cardiff in Ornithological Monographs 48, Studies in Neotropical Ornithology honoring Ted Parker, 1997, p. 165-170 but most authorities still maintain it as a sub-species of Black-headed Antbird P. rufifrons on the grounds that the voices and plumage are practically identical.
_	Her application was refused on the grounds that appeals against registration refusals must take place within three days of the refusal.
_	He was immediately detained by police officers who wanted to fingerprint and photograph him; Panahi refused both requests on the grounds that he was not a criminal.
_	She began work on a master's degree in History, but was unable to continue because the Department of Veterans' Affairs refused to provide financial support on the grounds that they found no women teaching in history departments in Canada.
_	Those responsible for the coup justified their actions on the grounds that Zelaya's interest in potentially convening a constituent assembly to draft a new constitution was illegal, and alleged that his real motive was to increase his time in office.
_	Two years later, Katherine, who had not wanted to marry her eight-year-old cousin John Le Poer, appealed to the Archbishop to grant her an annulment on the grounds that she had not freely consented to the marriage.
_	In 1972, Te Awekotuku was denied a visitors permit to the USA on the grounds that she was a homosexual.
_	Leopold had only been appointed deputy Kapellmeister in January 1763; nevertheless the archbishop's consent to an extended leave of absence was granted, on the grounds that the Mozarts' successes would bring glory to Salzburg, its ruler, and to God.
_	The claim was dismissed on the grounds that Artmentum was a Swiss company, with few commercial activities in the US, and therefore the case was outside the jurisdiction of the court.
_	The Wahhabis did not restrain themselves to proselytism only, but resorted to warmongering against whoever disagreed with them on the grounds that they were fighting innovation ("bid`a"), and innovations are an evil that must be fought...
_	An appeal was made to the full bench of the Federal Court on the grounds that "the trial judge erroneously adopted a ‘frozen in time’ approach" and "failed to give sufficient recognition to the capacity of traditional laws and customs to adapt to changed circumstances".
_	Democrats blocked the confirmation of 10 nominees, on the grounds that they were too "out of the mainstream" for a lifetime appointment.
_	Characters within the superhero community in the Marvel Universe split into two groups: one advocating the registration as a responsible obligation, and the other opposing the law on the grounds that it violates civil liberties and the protection that secret identities provide.
_	During his studied in Belgrade in 1899 he was deported from Serbia with a group of Montenegrins on the grounds that they had prepared a terrorist act.
_	On 23 February 2016, the Referendum Review Committee rejected a proposal put forward by the Faith and Hope League on the grounds that it failed to meet requirements.
_	Stone persuaded him to keep quiet about the incident, on the grounds that Devlin deserved what he got and Smith was too good a policeman to lose, but Devlin made a complaint of assault against Smith, and a witness was found to corroborate it.
_	In March 1963 the Defence Committee, the highest decision-making body of the Department of Defence, recommended to Cabinet that No. 79 Squadron be withdrawn from Thailand on the grounds that the British and New Zealand contingents had left the country.
_	Rattigan was at one point warned by the Minister against providing a public explanation of the proposed changes on the grounds that he would be in breach of his authority in expressing a view that may not be consistent with government policy.
_	In particular the conservative party Højre opposed it on the grounds that the treaty did not ensure the local population a vote on the matter, and that it did not grant them US citizenship or freedom from customs duty on the export of sugar to the United States.
_	Eventually Kildare was chosen, partly on the grounds that the straightness of the roads would be a safety benefit.
_	King contemplated but ultimately decided against the proposal on the grounds that he felt uneasy with politics and considered himself better suited for his morally unambiguous role as an activist.
_	Pullin would have hanged had it not been for the intervention of more than 7,000 individuals petitioning for mercy on his behalf, on the grounds that he was a young man of good nature who had come to this terrible act due to circumstance.
_	Blamey refused on the grounds that the brigade was not yet fully equipped, but eventually compromised, sending it on the understanding that it would soon be joined by the rest of the 6th Division.
_	Following the violence the Ukrainian parliament on 22 February voted to remove Yanukovych from power (on the grounds that his whereabouts were unknown and he thus could not fulfil his duties), and to free Yulia Tymoshenko from prison.
_	Originally, the CRTC denied RAI's application, on the grounds that RAI had improperly denied supply of programming to TLN's Canadian viewers and that RAI's attempt to enter Canada on an unrestricted basis without any Canadian programming and financial obligations would be unfair competition.
_	They moved to the Supreme Court to seek these reports, but in October 2013, the Court rejected their plea on the grounds that such reports are inadmissible in evidence.
_	Judge Marilyn Hall Patel of the United States District Court for the Northern District of California granted the preliminary injunction, on the grounds that the plaintiffs demonstrated a reasonable likelihood of success.
_	John Crichton-Stuart was a private man who eschewed publicity and grand gestures and refused to take part in the activities of the House of Lords on the grounds that "the scene" was uncongenial.
_	In 2004, the City of London Corporation, which holds the Heath in trust since the abolition of the Greater London Council in 1986, tried to close the ponds on the grounds that they were an unsustainable drain on their expenses and posed a health risk to swimmers.
_	There was some opposition to this on the grounds that swimming there had been free since at least the 1920s, and some ticket machines were vandalised.
_	Alice sued for partial ownership of the land on the grounds that she was the illegitimate daughter of Mollie Jackson and was therefore entitled to a portion of the estate.
_	In a leader during the summer of 1940, Carr defended the Soviet annexation of the Baltic States under the grounds that this was "not merely pressure from Moscow, but sincere recognition that this was a better alternative than absorption into a new Nazi Europe".
_	Accolade appealed the decision to the Ninth Circuit on the grounds that their reverse engineering of the Genesis was protected under fair use.
_	The main arguments used in opposition to legalizing abortion were that it would have a harmful effect on population growth or on the grounds that it was too medically harmful to the woman.
_	The U.K. and France took no part in the final vote, on the grounds that the whole thing was illegal.
_	In 1938, the Nazis razed the manor house and publicly burned one of his early paintings ("A Boyish Act") on the grounds that it was immoral.
_	Creationists commonly argue against evolution on the grounds that "evolution is a religion; it is not a science," in order to undermine the higher ground biologists claim in debating creationists, and to reframe the debate from being between science (evolution) and religion (creationism) to being between two equally religious beliefs—or even to argue that evolution is religious while intelligent design is not.
_	He supported the programme of Independent sector treatment centres, which a number of other Provider Chief Executives said was unnecessary, on the grounds that it was necessary to increase local choice.
_	It was cosponsored by other state representatives and senators, and drew criticism on the grounds that it would violate the First Amendment rights of protestors.
_	In August 2016, a federal judge overturned Dassey's conviction on the grounds that his confession had been coerced.
_	On August 4, 2010, the U.S District Court in Columbus dismissed the lawsuit on the grounds that the privacy violation did not amount to a constitutional violation to the right to privacy.
_	Also in 2012, Princess Sikhanyiso Dlamini held a political debate with PUDEMO over Twitter, while her father, King Mswati III, continued his refusal to negotiate with PUDEMO on the grounds that they were terrorists.
_	Mees unsuccessfully contested the building of a marshalling yard and a new tram "superstop" in front of the main entrance to the University of Melbourne's Parkville campus on Swanston Street, and opposed the building of the proposed Melbourne Metro Rail Project tunnel under the centre of Melbourne, on the grounds that much less expensive options are available to boost capacity on the Melbourne suburban rail network.
_	Because she was a woman, four of her uncles disputed her claim on the grounds that she could not inherit property, and sought to split the land between themselves.
_	Additionally, Raphael Sealey challenges the speech on the grounds that it contradicts other sources on Aristogeiton at a number of points.
_	He was imprisoned on the grounds that he had accepted the bishopric from The Pope, although there was no record of a papal provision.
_	When his older half-brother King Ferdinand VI died without issue in 1759, Luis claimed the throne on the grounds that, he was the only surviving son of Philip V still residing in Spain (his older brothers were Charles, King of Naples and Sicily, and Philip, Duke of Parma, both reigning in Italy).
_	However, the Lord Lieutenants' advisors were against the establishment of the school on the grounds that there was unlikely to be enough children requiring such an institution in the area and the existing schools were adequate for the educational needs of the area.
_	The U.S. Supreme Court ruled against Georgia's encroachment on other Indian land in "Worcester v. Georgia" in 1832, on the grounds that Indian natives were entitled to federal protection.
_	On January 11, 1995, Scientology lawyer Helena Kobrin attempted to shut down the Usenet discussion group "alt.religion.scientology" by sending a control message instructing Usenet servers to delete the group on the grounds that:
_	The British were quick to ban it in India and Samuel Hoare, the Secretary of State for India, justified this action to the House of Commons on the grounds that it encouraged terrorism and direct action among the masses.
_	Essek sought to prevent the inauguration of Barack Obama on the grounds that Obama was not a natural born citizen based on allegations that Obama was born in Kenya.
_	Some organizations, such as the Representative Council of France's Black Associations (, CRAN), have argued in favor of the introduction of data collection on minority groups but this has been resisted by other organizations and ruling politicians, often on the grounds that collecting such statistics goes against France's secular principles and harks back to Vichy-era identity documents.
_	Opponents have objected to the government's use of the term 'living wage' on the grounds that the National Living Wage will be calculated from median UK earnings rather than the cost of living.
_	However, the ambulance paramedic crew decided not to take Farah to the hospital on the grounds that he seemed to be intoxicated and urinated, with the urine hitting first the trouser leg of one of the paramedics and then the ambulance car.
_	In 1995, in the "AEU case", the High Court struck down a Commonwealth law on the grounds that it impaired the capacity of a State to function as an independent government.
_	Further compounding the problem was that unlike other areas where the British had a trade deficit, such as India, the Baltic trade could not be justified on the grounds that Great Britain gained in the end from re-export to the continent, Baltic goods were overwhelmingly used in Britain.
_	Dirksen was a firm opponent of the doctrine of one man, one vote on the grounds that large cities (such as Chicago in Dirksen's home state of Illinois) could render rural residents of a state powerless in their state governments; after the Warren Court imposed one-man-one-vote on all state legislative houses in "Reynolds v. Sims", he led an effort to convene an Article V convention for an amendment to the Constitution that would allow for legislative districts of unequal population.
_	In August 2005, U.S. District Judge Rosemary M. Collyer blocked the plan on the grounds that it did not ensure collective-bargaining rights for DHS employees.
_	In April 2006, Margaret Witt, a major in the United States Air Force who was being investigated for homosexuality, filed suit in the United States District Court for the Western District of Washington seeking declaratory and injunctive relief on the grounds that DADT violates substantive due process, the Equal Protection Clause, and procedural due process.
_	On 3 June 1812 he ruled upholding the seizure of "Donna Marianna" on the grounds that she was a "British vessel, and that this Portuguese disguise has been assumed for the mere purpose of protecting the property of British merchants in a traffic which it was not lawful for them to engage in."
_	For over a century, back to the days of Adam Smith in 1776, economists had been hostile to imperialism on the grounds that it is a violation of the principles of free trade; they never formed a popular movement.
_	A daughter died and was refused burial by the local clergy on the grounds that she was not baptised, although one at last offered to allow her to be buried in the churchyard, but not to read the burial service.
_	The defendant, Harris, was charged with violating the statute, and he sued under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 to get an injunction preventing District Attorney Evelle J. Younger from enforcing the law on the grounds that it violated the free speech guarantee.
_	In January 2012, Bahmanzadeh applied to the Criminal Cases Review Commission (C.R.C.C.) for the right to lodge a further appeal against his conviction and sentence, on the grounds that new evidence had come to light which cast doubt on the reliability of a key prosecution witness at the original trial.
_	His primary opponent, James G. Branaum, sued Patrick under Texas campaign finance law to recover civil penalties on the grounds that Patrick had paid his filing fee in 1980 without first appointing a campaign treasurer.
_	Cleveland Shire Council objected to the sale of the land ""on the grounds that several people have been buried therein and that it was once used for a cemetery.
_	In the late 1520s, João led the opposition to the marriage of King John III's brother, Infante Ferdinand, to Dona Guiomar Coutinho, a prominent noble heiress to the great feudal estates of Marialva and Loulé, on the grounds that he had already secretly married her.
_	The administration of President Bill Clinton justified the attacks, dubbed Operation Infinite Reach, on the grounds that the al-Shifa plant was involved with processing the deadly nerve agent VX, and had ties with the Islamist al-Qaeda group of Osama bin Laden, which was believed to be behind the embassy bombings and Operation Bojinka, an alleged large-scale terrorist plot.
_	The charge of Jesuitism was also brought against Simon, on the grounds that his friend's brother, Father Antoine Verjus, was a prominent member of the Society of Jesus.
_	This conviction was later quashed by the House of Lords on the grounds that knowledge of the use of the premises was essential to the offence.
_	The Surfer and the Fantastic Four unite with the armed forces to kill all the High Evolutionary's creations on the grounds that they consider harmonic life without greed and bloodthirst as "unworthy of existence".
_	This doctrine is sometimes dismissed as semipelagian by theologians of the classical Protestant traditions on the grounds that it suggests that man contributes to his own salvation.
_	In September 1944, Helen Duncan was jailed under the Witchcraft Act on the grounds that she had claimed to summon spirits.
_	The judge in "R&B Customs Brokers Co Ltd v United Dominions Trust Ltd" refused to allow an exemption clause, of which did cover the nature of the implied term, on the grounds that it did not make specific and explicit reference to that term.
_	On 1 August, Kaitani's defence lawyers Iqbal Khan and Rabo Matebalavu called for the charges against Kaitani and his fellow-accused to be dismissed on the grounds that twelve state witnesses who testified, including New Zealand Police handwriting expert David Boot, had failed to conclusively link the accused to their alleged crime.
_	As leader of the opposition against Kwame Nkrumah, he fled the country on the grounds that his life was under threat.
_	In 2009, because of financial constraints, Transport for London (TfL) decided to stop work on a project to provide step-free access at Amersham and five other stations, on the grounds that these are relatively quiet stations and some are already one or two stops away from an existing step-free station.
_	The PopOffsets program received some criticism on the grounds that populations of developing countries, although bearing high birth rates, are not responsible for creating high levels of CO.
_	The Secretary of State may also challenge by order under section 35 of the 1998 Act. Section 35 provides that such challenges must be on the grounds that the Bill: is incompatible with international obligations; is incompatible with the interests of defence or national security; or deals with reserved matters and will have "an adverse effect on the operation of the law."
_	Frum opposed the nomination of Harriet Miers for the Supreme Court of the United States, on the grounds that she was insufficiently qualified for the post, as well as insufficiently conservative.
_	Before the end of the war, the club approached Matt Busby, who had just turned down the opportunity to join the coaching staff at Liverpool, on the grounds that he wanted more responsibility over the playing side of the club than merely the selection of the team.
_	"Southern Burlington County N.A.A.C.P. v. Mount Laurel Township" (commonly called "Mount Laurel I"), in which the plaintiffs challenged the zoning ordinance of Mount Laurel Township, New Jersey, on the grounds that it operated to exclude low and moderate income persons from obtaining housing in the municipality.
_	Funding for the Lookout ceased in the third year of the Project on the grounds that the Project performed overlapping functions as other hospice services provided by public hospitals.
_	In 50 BC, the censor Appius Claudius Pulcher, regarded as an authority on the procedures of the augural college, expelled Ateius from the senate on the grounds that he had falsified the "auspicia".
_	On March 17, 2015, President Koroma sacked Sam-Sumana as Vice President on the grounds that he had abandoned his position and sought asylum in the United States Embassy in Freetown, and for not belonging to a political party although it was reported by several local and international media that Sam-Sumana fled his residence fearing for his life, before soldiers had surrounded his house and disarmed his security team.
_	The claim was based on a Charter of the reign of King John and the case was lost on the grounds that the extent of the land was not specified and, more seriously, that the Charter contained erasures.
_	Madero once again traveled south to urge Zapata to disband his supporters peacefully, but Zapata refused on the grounds that Huerta's troops were advancing on Yautepec de Zaragoza.
_	The original idea was to paint the picture from edge to edge, with no bleeding or title, but the studio vetoed it, on the grounds that the Beatles were not yet famous enough to carry a nameless cover.
_	On May 23, 1966, the authorities closed Khalq on the grounds that it was anti-Islamic, anticonstitutional, and antimonarchical.
_	"Newsweek" reported that many of the Republican legislators who publicly argued that the stimulus would not create jobs were writing letters seeking stimulus programs for their districts on the grounds that the spending would create jobs.
_	The Jacksonians opposed other elements of Clay’s ideology, including support for internal infrastructural improvements, on the grounds that they represented governmental overstretch as well.
_	Reporting in 1938, the Commission rejected the Peel plan primarily on the grounds that it could not be implemented without a massive forced transfer of Arabs (an option that the British government had already ruled out).
_	The second element, that Hitler was a "weak dictator" is less influential on the grounds that although Hitler did not involve himself much in daily administration, this apparent neglect stemmed not from an inability to do so (as Broszat suggested) but a lack of interest in the quotidian.
_	The British government decided not to offer him a contract on the grounds that they could not see how he could be integrated into a research project or design group.
_	However, Ena Begović refused to accept her award on the grounds that her part was in fact a leading role.
_	He also argues against including other French vowels on the grounds that very few British speakers succeed in distinguishing the vowels in "bon" and "banc", or in "rue" and "roue".
_	The design was criticised but the administration overruled the objections on the grounds that the design was economic and the construction period would be shorter than using a conventional design.
_	In this unusual development, the Ohio State Faculty Council voted 28 to 25 against the 1962 Rose Bowl trip, prompted by the head of a university alumni group, on the grounds that the school's academic reputation was suffering because of over-emphasis on the football team.
_	However, George Jeremiah and Dwight Bacheller, two of the bill's opponents, argued that the state had no right to stop canal traffic on the grounds that the Erie Canal and its tributaries had ceased to be wards of the state.
_	Some modern "poskim" refuse to take its arguments into consideration, on the grounds that a work so long unknown (in their opinion) has ceased to be part of the process of halachic development.
_	Rowling refused on the grounds that such a self interested move would not be befitting of a party president.
_	Alfredson won the Gothenburg Film Festival's Nordic Film Prize as director of "Let the Right One In" on the grounds that he "succeeds to transform a vampire movie to a truly original, touching, amusing and heart-warming story about friendship and marginalisation".
_	Others oppose their existence on the grounds that the police should respect citizens' freedom and dignity, and enforce the law, not "sharia".
_	The marriage and Murray's sobriety proved to be short lived; Sayers was granted a divorced in November 1933 on the grounds that Murray drank excessively and forced Sayers to work to support him.
_	After reaching the Final they had to withdraw on the grounds that they could not agree a kick-off time with their opponents Luton Town, in which there would be police at the ground, providing protection for the fans, as fans' safety concerns had been expressed earlier in the tournament.
_	He consistently favored repeal of the 1964 Civil Rights Act, including Title VII regarded employment discrimination and called for overturning the "Brown v. Board of Education" decision on the grounds that forced integration of schools was aggressive.
_	In November 1793, François Chabot was denounced by several members of the Convention, notably Fabre d'Eglantine, Jacques-René Hébert, Louis Pierre Dufourny de Villiers, on the grounds that he had attempted to falsify the finances of the French East India Company, offering bribes to various elected representatives in the process.
_	In August 2005 he denounced a statement of the Church of England's House of Bishops on civil partnerships and called for the disciplining of the Church of England and ECUSA on the grounds that the Church has not changed its position on same-sex partnerships.
_	Vanderhallen, acting on orders from Wauters, initially refused to accept attempts to surrender, on the grounds that Balot's remains, and in particular his skull, had not been recovered.
_	George's marriage to Sophia Dorothea was dissolved, not on the grounds that either of them had committed adultery, but on the grounds that Sophia Dorothea had abandoned her husband.
_	The decision was reversed on the grounds that a change in ownership had taken place.
_	Turner justified his failure to interview one of the accused on the grounds that the individual was "too dangerous".
_	Islamic scholars such as Muhammad Rashid Rida in Tafsir al-Minar, argue that the "freedom to apostatize", is different from freedom of religion on the grounds that apostasy from Islam infringes on the freedom of others and the respect due the religion of Islamic states.
_	According to U.S. Senate testimony by Arlie Willems, retired reviewer for the Iowa Department of Education, the Iowa Department of Education denied Ashford University's request in 2006 to offer an online Master of Arts in Teaching (MAT) on the grounds that the program "was more a collection of discrete courses than a cohesive program, was understaffed for appropriate interaction with students and supervision of both courses and clinical experiences, including student teaching.
_	But this too was rejected on the grounds that it would be impossible for there to be any practical difference between the rights of citizens by State.
_	Since 2013, a group of residents from the nearby Bennelong Apartments (better known as 'The Toaster'), calling themselves the Sydney Opera House Concerned Citizens Group, have been campaigning against Forecourt Concerts on the grounds that they exceed noise levels outlined in the development approval (DA).
_	All proposed health claims were rejected on the grounds that the science was not sufficient, and no health claims are permitted.
_	This was not acted upon on the grounds that the codicil had not been legally witnessed.
_	In 1987, Harmon filed for custody of his nephew Sam on the grounds that his sister, Kristin Nelson, was incapable of good parenting.
_	Pascal, with his wager, attempted to use the newly developing probability theory to argue for a life devoted to religion, on the grounds that even if the probability of success was small, the rewards were infinite.
_	He was acquitted of that charge "on the grounds that he was of unsound mind," but the next day he was placed on trial in an attempt to send him back to the asylum.
_	During the Cambodian Civil War, North Korea approved the Chinese plan to create a "united front of the five revolutionary Asian countries" (China, North Korea, Vietnam, Laos, and Cambodia), whereas North Vietnam rejected it on the grounds that such a front would exclude the Soviet Union and challenge Vietnamese dominance in Indochina.
_	The site made the claim on the grounds that she had been "invited" in an email.
_	When Japan sought compensation from Qing China, the court rejected the demand on the grounds that the "wild"/"unsubjugated" aboriginals () were outside its jurisdiction.
_	Itamar residents and its out post settlers on Hill777, themselves reportedly illegal squatters who had hitherto never expressed any criticisms when Ran took over Palestinian land, raised a complaint to the Samaria Regional Council to intervene and stop him, on the grounds that he has no title to that tract.
_	Guðmundsdóttir nevertheless dismisses a number of other proposed images of Gunnar, however, on the grounds that they are not clear.
_	Graham and the club elected to challenge that decision however, taking the case to the AFL's Tribunal on the grounds that the hit was careless and not intentional.
_	Within the process of the linguistic reorganisation of states, the claim that Dasuya should be incorporated into Himachal Pradesh on the grounds that it was the home of Dogras was rejected because that point was irrelevant to the linguistic issue.
_	Luo refused on the grounds that provisions were scarce and pointed out that Zhu Quanzhong's men should not have to pass through his province to the north to strike at Li Keyong to the west.
_	Steiner developed his biodynamic philosophy through meditation and clairvoyance, and rejected scientific inquiry on the grounds that his methods were “true and correct unto themselves.”
_	Although he lost the election, he petitioned the election court on the grounds that supporters of the winner, George Henry Williamson, had engaged in widespread bribery.
_	Antonescu's anti-Semitism and sexism went so far that he tacitly condoned the rape of Jewish women and girls in Bessarabia and northern Bukovinia by his forces under the grounds that he was going take away all of the property that the Jews had "stolen" from the Romanians, and as far he was concerned, Jewish females were just another piece of property.
_	In 2009, because of financial constraints, Transport for London decided to stop work on a project to provide step-free access at Osterley on the grounds that it was a relatively quiet station and within one or two stops of an existing step-free station, Hounslow East where step-free access has been available since 2005.
_	This was on the grounds that an important class of user was the 'Mariner', and that 'apparent Time' was "the same which he will obtain by the Altitudes of the Sun or Stars in the Manner hereafter prescribed".
_	Russell protested his film being given such a rating when "Pretty Woman" got an R, on the grounds that his film showed the real hardships of being a prostitute, and the other glorified it.
_	The defendant company, charged with breaking the law, at trial filed a motion to dismiss on the grounds that the law was unconstitutional.
_	On April 30, 1923, the German Ambassador asked for Witzke's release on the grounds that other countries, including Germany, had released all prisoners of war, including spies.
_	In 1956, it was proposed that the bridge be widened, but the Fine Art Commission protested on the grounds that it would upset the architecture of the bridge.
_	His request was turned down by the Commanding General of the U.S. Army Air Forces, General Henry H. Arnold on the grounds that he was over the age limit and not performing flying duties.
_	It was the first sculpture to be considered for public enquiry and was supported by the Corporation of London, London Borough of Southwark, English Heritage and the Royal Fine Arts Commission along with lawyers from Amnesty International, but was refused planning permission by the Planning Inspector on the grounds that it might incite demonstrations against human rights abuses.
_	However, the Ba'ath Party supported Qasim on the grounds that he would join Nasser's UAR.
_	His convictions were overturned on the grounds that he should have been tried as a juvenile.
_	Thọ refused to accept the prize, on the grounds that such "bourgeois sentimentalities" were not for him and that peace had not actually been achieved in Vietnam.
_	In places such as Kokkarne, Koraga people have stopped their practice of drum beating during Kambala fairs on the grounds that they were forced to keep a watch on slush paddy fields for the entire night.
_	In August 1954, the Pleven plan died when an alliance of conservatives and Communists in the National Assembly joined forces to reject the EDC treaty under the grounds that West German rearmament in any form was an unacceptable danger to France.
_	Whilst refusing to fight in the First World War, Godfrey instead joined the Royal Army Medical Corps as a stretcher bearer, and was responsible, during the Battle of the Somme, for a tremendous act of heroism in rescuing several wounded soldiers from no man's land under heavy fire (which, with characteristic modesty, he downplays, and he refuses to wear his medal on the grounds that it feels ostentatious).
_	Lastly, Lamer rejects the argument that the federal government is precluded from regulating labour relations on the grounds that the provincial government has been exercising jurisdiction for a long period of time.
_	She was a Member of Parliament for Makokoba constituency before being recalled by her party in 2018 on the grounds that she no longer represented the party’s interests.
_	A villager objects to the affair on the grounds that even though her mother was Russian, her father's Frisian blood "outweighs" foreign blood, and therefore she must not throw herself at a foreigner.
_	Residents of some communities also opposed restoration of service on the Greenbush branch on the grounds that it would increase noise levels and aesthetically mar the neighborhoods through which the new rail service was to run.
_	In August 1877, New York Governor Robinson pardoned Frank Walworth on the grounds that the prisoner was not legally responsible for the crime due to insanity.
_	He has been criticised by political rivals for not standing down as a county councillor following his election to Parliament on the grounds that he had missed key local votes while working in London.
_	Luciano Benetton was cleared of similar charges, on the grounds that he had not been involved at an operational level during his time (September 1985 - September 1987) on the board of Fiorucci.
_	On February 4, 2004, the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit panel rejected the appeal brought by the United States Army Corps of Engineers and the Umatilla, Colville, Yakama, Nez Perce, and other tribes on the grounds that they were unable to show any evidence of kinship.
_	The court does not accept the testimony of witnesses as an evidence, on the grounds that they are the friends of the inhabitants.
_	On appeal, the United States Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit upheld the conviction but overturned the sentence on the grounds that the prior Court had deviated from federal sentencing guidelines which call for life in prison.
_	His employer denied him leave under the collective agreement on the grounds that Popert was not "immediate family".
_	On February 1, 2011, Guandique's attorneys requested a new trial on the grounds that the verdict had been improperly attained.
_	Where the ban prevented teams from running engine maps that simulated throttle conditions of more than 10%, Renault had applied for a special exemption to the rule on the grounds that running at 10% of full throttle conditions adversely affected the reliability of their engines.
_	By Graham's own admission, though, he was not an absolutist in the application of the rule that now bears his name: his autobiography relates a lunch meeting with Hillary Clinton that he initially refused on the grounds that he does not eat alone with women other than his wife, but she persuaded him that they could have a private conversation in a public dining room.
_	Larson strongly disagreed on the grounds that the city did not offer the same honor to fallen soldiers.
_	Consequently, the story was rejected on the grounds that 'it was not Latin American enough'.
_	Benson wanted the Four Tops to record his song, but they refused on the grounds that it was a protest song.
_	It was a speech in opposition to awarding money to a Navy widow on the grounds that Congress had no Constitutional mandate to give charity.
_	Both the emperor, who wanted to marry Zoe Karbonopsina and the Patriarch of Constantinople, Nicholas Mystikos, appealed to Sergius; the pope sent papal legates to Constantinople, who confirmed the pope’s ruling in favour of the emperor, on the grounds that fourth marriages had not been condemned by the Church as a whole.
_	On appeal, her conviction was reversed on the grounds that contraceptive devices could legally be promoted for the cure and prevention of disease.
_	His final appearances are in the prison/labyrinth area, where he confesses to killing the man in the apartment and another victim on the grounds that they were mocking him, and apparently has no moral issues with killing.
_	This proposition was based on the grounds that the names were synonyms published simultaneously, and, therefore, the ICZN Principle of the First Reviser should apply.
_	Assurance sued her for reimbursement of the benefits paid to him on the grounds that a provision in the federal insurance plan required paid benefits to be reimbursed when the beneficiary is compensated for an injury by a third party.
_	The former Director Hasanah lodged a police report on the grounds that the letter should not have been leaked for national security reasons.
_	Hospital officials have defended their actions on the grounds that injured koalas found near busy roads or in urban developments cannot safely be released to the same areas.
_	Initially, the courts held that an action for trover would lie for blacks, as if they were chattels, but this was reasoned on the grounds that they were infidels rather than slaves, and lacked the rights enjoyed by Christians; (reasoning which would later find echoes in the U.S. case of "Dred Scott v. Sandford" 60 U.S. (19 How.) 393 (1857)) but Judge Holt was to later reject this analysis, and also denied the possibility of bringing an "assumpsit" on the sale of a negro in England: "as soon as a negro comes to England he is free; one may be a villein in England, but not a slave."
_	The commanding officer decided to send three sections of three Beaufighters on this daylight mission, a course of action potentially open to criticism on the grounds that it might have compromised the intelligence source.
_	In his 1891 work "Revisio Generum Plantarum", German botanist Otto Kuntze challenged the generic name "Banksia" L.f., on the grounds that the name "Banksia" had previously been published in 1775 as "Banksia" J.R.Forst & G.Forst, referring to the genus now known as "Pimelea".
_	These were added on the grounds that they sounded good and felt right and use of a dictionary word would not have been an improvement.
_	At Farran's trial, Fergusson refused to testify on the grounds that he might incriminate himself.
_	Members of the Cherryhurst community opposed on the grounds that the closure of Wharton could imperil a baseball field on the Wharton property serving an area little league.
_	However, on the other hand, the city commune of Antioch supported Bohemond IV of Antioch, on the grounds that he was the closest blood relative to the last ruling prince, Bohemond III.
_	Clodius then passed two laws which banished Cicero, on the grounds that he had deprived several of Catiline's conspirators of their due process ("provocatio") rights when he had them executed upon a mere decree of the senate.
_	In a decision taken by the International Handball Federation on 8 July 2014 the spot allocated for a nation from Oceania was revoked on the grounds that Oceania has no continental confederation.
_	Waldegrave declined the offer (on the grounds that as a son of an earl, he already held a higher station), and was appointed the Governor of Newfoundland, Saint-Pierre and Miquelon, on 16 May 1797.
_	No official reason was given for his exit, but a few weeks before his departure, Arbroath Town Council had refused to allocate him a house on the grounds that his job was not considered to be that of a ‘key worker’.
_	In December 1814 Captain W. Mackay, a recent immigrant to Orkney who owned farmland in the vicinity of the stones, decided to remove them on the grounds that local people were trespassing and disturbing his land by using the stones in rituals.
_	Filaret stated that he was retracting his resignation on the grounds that his resignation "would not bring peace to the Church, would contradict the will of the believers, and would be uncanonical."
_	Advocates for legal gaming also object to the parlors on the grounds that they are unregulated.
_	The Dharmaguptaka sect are known to have rejected the authority of the Sarvāstivāda pratimokṣa rules on the grounds that the original teachings of the Buddha had been lost.
_	Moore sought to file a complaint against a police officer for groping her, and secretly recorded an interview with investigators on her smartphone, on the grounds that they were trying to intimidate her.
_	Coming during the height of McCarthyism, the effect was pronounced on the security hearings in early 1954, which revoked former Los Alamos director Robert Oppenheimer's security clearance on the grounds that he was unreliable, had not supported the American hydrogen bomb program, and had made long-standing left-wing ties in the 1930s.
_	Torrey has been a long-time critic of the Center for Mental Health Services that provides support and advocacy, on the grounds that they support anti-psychiatry groups and those opposed to outpatient commitment, claiming they neglect the seriously mentally ill due to a hippie '60s attitude, distribute funds on the basis of other factors such as "community cohesion" and ethnic minority involvement, and are more dysfunctional than the individuals they are supposed to help.
_	In Germany approximately 200 of his works were removed from public museums by the Nazis on the grounds that they were degenerate art.
_	Cumberland, by his own choice, resigned his military offices, and George revoked the peace deal on the grounds that the French had infringed it by disarming Hessian troops after the ceasefire.
_	The British Governor-General in Bengal, Warren Hastings, rejected the treaty on the grounds that the Bombay officials had no legal power to sign it, and ordered Goddard to secure British interests in the area.
_	They tried to get the French courts to deny the extradition again on the grounds that the law would be inapplicable.
_	On 5 July, he proclaimed the suspension of the constitution, on the grounds that his consent had not been asked and that it did not meet the kingdom's needs.
_	He wrote to the Smith Commission: "The argument some use to justify our exclusion on the grounds that we currently have no 'parliamentary representation' fails to appreciate that the referendum was not a parliamentary process but an unprecedented public debate that resulted in an extraordinary level of engagement from all sections of society.
_	Spain claims "de jure" sovereignty over Olivenza on the grounds that the Treaty of Badajoz still stands and has never been revoked, thus making the case that the border between the two countries in the region of Olivenza should be demarcated as said by the treaty.
_	Scott opposed same-sex marriage for most of his life, on the grounds that it reflected the values of a society which for years treated homosexuals as pariahs.
_	In 1959, the Supreme Court ruled that the New York State censors' ban on the 1955 French film "Lady Chatterley's Lover" based on the grounds that it promoted adultery was unconstitutional, as the New York statute violated the freedom to advocate ideas, a right guaranteed by the First and Fourteenth Amendments.
_	However, later in the 1970s Whisenhunt terminated Taylor's links with Columbia on the grounds that they were not releasing enough of her records, a decision that Taylor later regretted, saying "The worst thing he could have done was take me off CBS".
_	Others criticized her for maintaining anonymity on the grounds that the identities, and thereby the biases, of participants in public debates on education ought to be known.
_	In this case Dusky presented a petition of writ of certiorari to the Supreme Court requesting that his conviction be reversed on the grounds that he was not competent to stand trial at the time of the proceeding.
_	South Carolina Senator Strom Thurmond urged the director of the OEO, Dick Cheney, to cancel the funding to FCD on the grounds that, "funding known militants like Fuller would destroy public confidence in government programs".
_	Jos. W. Stern & Co. sued for $10,000 in damages on the grounds that, at the time, it had Solman under an exclusive contract.
_	The Coalition of Australian Governments agreed to this restricted use on the grounds that these highly specialised target pistols are large, visually distinctive and not readily concealable due to their overall size.
_	In the episode, to earn money for her husband Homer's snoring problem, Marge agrees to stay with her old prom date, Artie Ziff, for one weekend (on the grounds that he try not to grope her like he did in "The Way We Was"), but when Homer thinks Marge broke her promise, he runs away with Lenny to work on an oil rig.
_	In November 1965 Yao Wenyuan, later one of the Gang of Four, fired one of the opening shots of the Cultural Revolution when he attacked Wu and his play on the grounds that Hai Rui was metaphorically equated with Peng Dehuai, and therefore Mao himself with the un-approachable Ming emperor.
_	It was broken up on the grounds that coalitions were forbidden by the constitution.
_	Despite being reticent for fear of reprisals from his non-Jewish subjects he was eventually persuaded to do it by a Galileean Jew named Eleazar on the grounds that it was one thing to read the Law and another thing to practice it.
_	In April 2011, Dunsfold Park claimed that the use of the site for aviation was entirely unrestricted on the grounds that the use predated the introduction of the planning acts or alternatively that a 60-year-old planning consent dating from 1951 allowed the unrestricted use of the aerodrome for aviation.
_	But this has been questioned on the grounds that there is no evidence that the Dorset had dogs.
_	The book contains an especially polemical critique of Frederic Jameson's argument in 'Third World Literature in the Era of Multinational Capitalism" where Ahmad attacks Jameson on the grounds that Jameson's argument is insufficiently theorized in its use of terms like "Third World" which appears to be defined purely in terms of its experience of colonialism.
_	In January 2016, his military lawyer requested the Army award Bergdahl the Purple Heart and the Prisoner of War Medal on the grounds that withholding the medals might prejudice and "cast a semblance of guilt" on Bergdahl as he awaited trial.
_	Home Secretary Charles Clarke banned Omar Bakri Muhammad from the United Kingdom on 12 August 2005 on the grounds that his presence was "not conducive to the public good."
_	Rob Hoveman, on behalf of Tower Hamlets Respect, wrote to the "East London Advertiser" on 24 February 2011 urging a 'No' vote on the grounds that the AV system created an even greater imbalance between votes and seats, and urging a proportional system instead.
_	In 2009, a group of US state attorneys general began active investigations of companies which produced and sold caffeinated alcohol beverages, on the grounds that they were being inappropriately marketed to a teenage audience and that they had possible health risks (blackouts).
_	The plan was criticised by the Australian government, on the grounds that it would either be prohibitively expensive or inadequate to the task.
_	Hoskins justifies this on the grounds that understanding towns brings pleasure.
_	The Scottish Party differed from the existing National Party of Scotland (NPS) on the grounds that the NPS and the form of Scottish independence it advocated was ambiguous about the Empire, and they also disagreed with the left-of-centre platform of the NPS.
_	In 1931 the architect Alfredo Lenzi of the Office of Fine Arts of the Comune of Florence banished the statue to piazzale Galileo, on the grounds that limited the enjoyment of the ancient architecture, then decided in 1937 to install the bronze statue of Hercules strangling the Nemean Lion by Romano Romanelli.
_	Following the rise of the Traditionalist Catholic movement in the 1970s, Pope Paul VI reportedly declined to liberalise its use further on the grounds that it had become a politically charged symbol associated with opposition to his policies.
_	However, the appeal failed on October 9, 1889 and the U.S. Supreme Court turned down the case on the grounds that there was no cruel and unusual punishment in death by electrocution.
_	Kellogg's (owner of the Toucan Sam logo) objected on the grounds that the two logos are too similar.
_	Thompson disputed Seung-Hui's roommate's claim that Seung-Hui only used his computer to write fiction, on the grounds that "Cho was able to go room to room calmly, efficiently, coolly killing people."
_	The Grand Council of the Crees initially opposed this legislation on the grounds that it denied aboriginal people the same right of self-determination that was claimed for Quebec.
_	However, some member-states opposed the addition of these powers to the Community on the grounds that they were too sensitive to national sovereignty for the community method to be used, and that these matters were better handled intergovernmentally.
_	Francis strongly objected to the idea on the grounds that selling the youth audience on an almost 35-year-old song was "ridiculous", but she finally agreed to it as a favor to her father.
_	In 2006, the Chinese education official Cao Guoxing advocated lowering tuition fees for mainland students in Hong Kong on the grounds that it would reduce barriers between Chinese and Hong Kong students.
_	The release of this song prevented the Super Furry Animals from releasing their song "Wherever I Lay My Phone (That's My Home)", on the grounds that it was "based on the same Nokia ringtone".
_	In 1921, Lord Birkenhead, the Lord Chancellor of Great Britain, had opposed a bill that would have criminalised lesbianism on the grounds that "of every thousand women ... 999 have never even heard a whisper of these practices".
_	This is demonstrated by "Nash v Inman", where a tailor's claim that a child's purchase of 11 waistcoats was for necessaries failed, on the grounds that he already owned adequate clothing.
_	Chelsea soon appealed to FIFA's actions in "the strongest possible way" under the grounds that it was Kakuta's mother who had signed the pre-contract, not her son; UEFA had assured Chelsea that they could sign the Frenchman as he wasn't a registered player at Lens and also because the London club believed there may was a statute of limitations on such 'illegal transfers'.
_	Albert Lejeune, editor of the Riviera newspaper "Petit Nicois" published by Patenotre, was executed for collaboration despite a last minute plea for reprieve on the grounds that he had evidence against Patenotre.
_	Patenotre's mother was accused of having lied about giving her majority share in the newspaper to her son so that it could be sold 'extraterritorially' thus avoiding the tax liability on the grounds that he was a French national.
_	In March 1616, the Church's Congregation of the Index issued a decree suspending "De revolutionibus" until it could be "corrected", on the grounds that the supposedly Pythagorean doctrine that the Earth moves and the Sun does not was "false and altogether opposed to "Holy Scripture.""
_	Upon the collapse of the general rising, Hope refused to avail of the terms of an amnesty offered by Lord Cornwallis on the grounds that to do so would be ""not only a recantation of one’s principles, but a tacit acquiescence in the justice of the punishment which had been inflicted on thousands of my unfortunate associates"".
_	Other Liberals - including Gary Dickson, Debby Carlson, Bettie Hewes, Mike Percy, Percy Wickman, Ken Nicol, Nicholas Taylor, and Colleen Soetaert - opposed the bill on the grounds that it didn't go far enough in taking measures to recover payments, promoted animosity in an already adversarial process, and was written with insufficient consultation with the recently privatized registries centres.
_	This was successfully disputed by SONAREM on the grounds that only it could represent the nationalized company.
_	Condor's proposal for "Diablo", then a turn-based role-playing video game, was turned down by other publishers on the grounds that "RPGs are dead" before Blizzard took an interest after pitching the idea to them in January 1995.
_	There has been a limited attempt to rebrand Holborn (and perhaps other nearby areas such as Bloomsbury) as "Midtown", on the grounds that it is notionally in the very middle of London, between the West End and the City (often considered, such as for postcode purposes, to be on the east side of central London).
_	Soon after his conviction, Masters appealed to the Colorado Court of Appeals on the grounds that his drawings were inadmissible under rules of the court, as was testimony concerning a confrontation between Masters and a teacher before the murder occurred.
_	The suit by Preserve South Bay was dismissed in March 2001, on the grounds that the legislature did not need to review the annexation of state parkland for the highway because it was done under eminent domain.
_	In 1992 a request for promotion to the Tier I category was rejected by the WTA on the grounds that the tournament's centre court, with a 3,000-seat capacity, was too small.
_	However, APO has also been criticised on the grounds that it “could perhaps do more to engage with the formal political workings of government through providing access to formal government policy information.
_	A 3-2 decision in 1989 by the Shariat Appellate Bench ruled against setting a ceiling on size of landholdings (as the Bhutto land reform had done) on the grounds that "Islam does not countenance compulsory redistribution of wealth or land for the purpose of alleviating poverty, however laudable the goal of poverty relief may be."
_	Although this historical incident of coercive diplomacy may have taken place long before the drafting of the UNCLOS, the dispute ended with the signing of an agreement on 10 December 1964, which granted to twenty-six French ships the right of fishing for a period no longer than five years, on the grounds that they delivered to Brazilian fishermen a certain amount of profit over their fishing activities in the so-called "designated areas".
_	Manual keigo are opposed by language purists on the grounds that their use frequently leads to non-grammatical and illogical constructions.
_	In practice the labour movement opposed all migration, on the grounds that immigrants competed with Australian workers and drove down wages.
_	A subsequent appeal to the NSW Court of Appeals quashed Murphy's conviction on the grounds that the trial judge had misdirected the jury.
_	He informs his insurance company, which reviews and then subsequently declines his claim on the grounds that it is not liable as his fishing boat was destroyed due to an "Act of God".
_	Around mid-1803 "Spider" captured a vessel that she then had to give up, presumably on the grounds that it was allied or neutral.
_	Later, she was to become a founder-member of the SDP, and as late as the 1997 election she encouraged her friends to vote Lib-Dem rather than Labour on the grounds that this could end the Conservative stranglehold on Suffolk South; however, it did the opposite.
_	Malays oppose this on the grounds that their group needs such protections in order to retain their patrimony.
_	Ailill decided to forgive Medb on the grounds that she was probably trying to ensure Fergus' loyalty, and kept Fergus's sword safe but hidden.
_	In Meiggs' case, he promoted the possibility of piers along the north shore area, on the grounds that it was closer to the Golden Gate than the usual harbor, located just south of Broadway Street on the shore of what is today downtown San Francisco.
_	Although quite frank in many places, Gaskell suppressed details of Charlotte's love for Constantin Héger, a married man, on the grounds that it would be too great an affront to contemporary morals and a possible source of distress to Charlotte's still-living friends, father Patrick Brontë and husband.
_	The U.S. State Department, the CIA, the U.S. Justice Department and the FBI all opposed the move on the grounds that it made the United States look "soft on terrorism" and "could do irreparable damage to the special relationship".
_	One song from the movie, "Kahan Raja Bhoj, Kahan Gangu Teli", provoked protests from a Nagpur-based organisation, the Vidarbha Teli Samaj Mahasangh, on the grounds that it offended the members of their community; they wrote a letter of protest to then-Chief Minister Manohar Joshi, condemning the approval given by the state government to the song and calling for it to be banned.
_	A variety of journalists and commentators took issue with the Federal Court's decision on the grounds that it restricted free speech on a matter of public interest, given Bolt's articles had addressed matters of public interest such as criteria for eligibility for public funds, money, jobs and prizes; but other journalists and commentators supported the case as an example of a legitimate restriction on freedom of expression.
_	Edward also summoned Llewelyn to appear before him on several occasions, which Llewelyn refused on the grounds that he was not safe at Edward's court.
_	When she was asked to leave, she refused on the grounds that the company rules against distribution of such materials could not be constitutionally applied to her.
_	In 1991, a local Jewish parent, David Attis, filed a human rights complaint against Ross's employers, New Brunswick School District 15, on the grounds that Ross's continued employment created a poisoned environment for Jewish students (including Attis's daughter, who, although not a student at Magnetic Hill School where Ross taught, had been intimidated out of attending interscholastic activities at Magnetic Hill).
_	Gardiner required the developers to provide alternate housing for all of the affected parties as a condition of the project's approval; this notwithstanding, some MCM councillors opposed the project on the grounds that it was unfair to the tenants and created a bad precedent for future development on the Saint Lawrence River.
_	He also had his own vegetable garden on the grounds that he maintained during his free time.
_	Alarmed, they appeal to Destiny on the grounds that nothing would be able to grow in the heat of a second sun.
_	Under the presidency of Brian J McCaffrey the movement was involved in a number of conservative campaigns in the 1950s, such as actively supporting members of the Waterford District Football League who were attempting to force the Republic of Ireland national football team to pull out of a match with their counterparts from Yugoslavia on the grounds that they did not wish to associate with communists.
_	Paradis also opposed the federal government's bid to conduct an independent environmental assessment, on the grounds that Great Whale was within Quebec's jurisdiction.
_	They lived in Burrillville, Rhode Island, but Ogarita eventually returned to theater life, causing Wilson in to file a divorce petition in 1882 on the grounds that she was a member of the Theatre Comique in Providence.
_	He refused Gresham's claim of £33 loss of earnings (from the date of his dismissal to the end of the football season, at his basic weekly wage of 30s), on the grounds that he had a trade to follow when not engaged in football, but awarded him £20 in damages plus costs.
_	A page calling for a "Third Palestinian Intifada" to begin on May 15 garnered more than 350,000 "likes" before being taken down by Facebook managers at the end of March after complaints from the Israeli government as well as a counter group which repeatedly requested Facebook to block the page on the grounds that it incited violence.
_	The sons of Dhyan Singh, Jawahir Singh and Moti Singh, put forward a claim to Poonch, on the grounds that it was the Jagir of their father, and to Jasrota, which was earlier a Jagir of their brother Hira Singh.
_	The timing of the affair became an issue in part because Farrow attempted, unsuccessfully, to have Allen's adoption of Dylan and Moses declared void after the molestation allegation, on the grounds that his affair with Previn had begun before the adoptions were finalized on December 17, 1991.
_	At the end of 1892, Strehlow wrote to Rev. Omeis asking for Frieda’s hand in marriage but was refused on the grounds that she was too young, and in any case the couple hardly knew each other.
_	Nothing about the author is known, though authorship has been "wrongly" attributed to Pu. on the grounds that the novel contains many phrases from the Shandong dialect, as does "Jin Ping Mei" (indeed "Jin Ping Mei" is quoted in the novel).
_	He was first overruled on the grounds that the audience would not understand the title, but he eventually got his way.
_	In that case, the Supreme Court invalidated a provision of the Judiciary Act of 1789 on the grounds that it violated the Constitution by attempting to expand the original jurisdiction of the Supreme Court.
_	Another Oneida claim, challenging the pre-constitutional conveyance of another tract, was rejected by the Second Circuit in 1988, on the grounds that the Confederation Congress Proclamation of 1783 had neither the authority nor the intent to limit the acquisition of Indian lands within the borders of the states.
_	Maternalism has been criticized on the grounds that it keeps women out of male dominated professions.
_	On November 11, 2011, Wayne County Circuit Court Judge Robert Ziolkowski vacated the "breach of peace" ruling against Jones and Wayne Sapp on the grounds that they were denied due process.
_	However, "Socialist Worker" argued against those who prematurely raised the slogan 'Troops Out!' on the grounds that the presence of British troops would allow the nationalist population to recover:
_	The Orthodox Christian Community Council have in the past attempted to boycott Naddaf and prevent his entry into the church compound in Nazareth on the grounds that the Christian Arabs should not divide the Palestinian Arab society in Israel.
_	In the past, the university refused to participate in newspaper league tables on the grounds that Universities should be assessed by the UK Government and not (private) newspapers.
_	Although it is true that it was not well drafted (ironic in view of Vernon’s career), the Court of Chancery dismissed the case on the grounds that the testator’s wishes were clear even if there were some irregularities in the wording.
_	ERC's spokesperson Joan Tardá praised Iglesias for his initiative and announced his party's support to the motion, whereas EH Bildu announced a 'critical yes' on the grounds that it was "a priority to evict the most corrupt party in Europe from government" while demanding Iglesias his full support to the right of self-determination.
_	During a TV interview on 4 May 2008, Wendy Alexander performed a major U-turn on previous Scottish Labour Party's policy by seeming to endorse a referendum on Scottish independence, despite previously refusing to support any referendum on the grounds that she did not support independence.
_	Finally, Allen Muth applied while imprisoned for a writ of habeas corpus in federal court on the grounds that the state anti-incest laws violated his constitutional rights and hence his imprisonment was illegal.
_	In December 2005, when a political battle ensued over its renewal, Clinton supported a general filibuster against it, on the grounds that the renewal legislation did not appropriate enough money to New York for anti-terrorism efforts.
_	The University of Alabama responded with a motion to dismiss on the grounds that the Eleventh Amendment prohibited the suit.
_	Historically the literary register was preferred for written Burmese on the grounds that "the spoken style lacks gravity, authority, dignity".
_	When the assembly voted in favor on 24 October 1848, Goudchaux immediately resigned on the grounds that this implied he was not trusted.
_	Because attorney George P. Monaghan held that the confession was invalid on the grounds that Yukl was not advised of his rights before interrogation began, Keenan (now prosecutor) and Monaghan plea-bargained in February 1968 to agree to a charge of manslaughter; Keenan later cited "grave fears" at the office about appeal and overturn and doubt about proving premeditation in a first-degree murder trial.
_	The "Zuo Zhuan" records that in 706 BCE King Wu of Chu invaded the State of Sui on the grounds that the state’s minister Ji Liang (季梁) had halted the king’s army.
_	Shivi later proposes to Sitara, but Sitara resists on the grounds that society will not accept their marriage.
_	His request was rejected on the grounds that he was already receiving a military pension.
_	After returning to Palestine with Shlomo in 1922, Rosa attempted to take the bar examination for foreign lawyers, but her requests were rejected on the grounds that the word orekh din (the masculine Hebrew term for lawyers) only referred to males.
_	Scientists and U.S. courts have rejected this objection on the grounds that science is not based on appeals to popularity, but on evidence.
_	When the case was dismissed, Premanand unsuccessfully appealed on the grounds that claimed spiritual power is not a defence recognised in law.
_	While the scholarly consensus is that Husseini's motives for supporting the Axis powers and his alliance with Nazi Germany and Fascist Italy were deeply inflected by anti-Jewish and anti-Zionist ideology from the outset, some scholars, notably Renzo De Felice, deny that the relationship can be taken to reflect a putative affinity of Arab nationalism with Nazi/Fascist ideology, and that men like Husseini chose them as allies for purely strategic reasons, on the grounds that, as Husseini later wrote in his memoirs, 'the enemy of your enemy is your friend'.
_	Square Enix officially announced on July 28, 2008 that it would liquidate two subsidiaries of Taito, "Taito Art Corporation" (an insurance and travel agent subsidiary) and "Taito Tech Co., Ltd." (a amusement and maintenance subsidiary) on the grounds that both had fulfilled their business purpose.
_	When Valerius was elected in Uppsala in 1207, the Danish archbishop objected on the grounds that he had a clerical ancestry, and priests and other clergymen were not allowed to marry.
_	The annulment was granted in 1970 on the grounds that the court considered Ashley to be male, even though Corbett knew about her history when they married.
_	The IOC voted in 2006 not to include women's ski jumping in the 2010 Games on the grounds that the sport was not yet developed enough and did not meet basic criteria for inclusion.
_	The House Foreign Affairs Committee justified this exclusion on the grounds that "Quemoy and Matsu are considered by both Taipei and by Beijing to be part of mainland China".
_	She was accused of breach of contract and threatened with a fine, but the Bulgarian teenager stood by her decision, which she had taken on the grounds that it was proving extremely difficult for her to gain entry even to low-level tournaments following the loss of all her ranking points and any right to protected ranking status after her ban, so she needed to work at re-establishing herself at least in the mid-hundreds of the WTA rankings as a matter of priority before tending to national team commitments.
_	Bill C-55 is needed to bring Canada’s emergency wiretapping powers into conformity with a 2012 Supreme Court decision that struck down a 20-year-old law on the grounds that it did not require police to inform those who had been wiretapped after the fact or provide for any other oversight of the police power.
_	There are interpretive signs on the grounds that describe hatchery operations and highlight some remaining artifacts.
_	Rio Hotel decided to challenge the constitutionality of the law on the grounds that it related to public morality which is a matter of federal criminal law.
_	Richardson was convicted of murder that spring, but then received a royal pardon and a new job within the customs service, on the grounds that he had acted in self-defense.
_	In a "per curiam" opinion issued on March 15, 2005, the Court of Appeals affirmed the rejection of the claim on the grounds that Cooper had "knowingly and intelligently rejected two plea offers and chose to go to trial".
_	Pavlensky was also nominated for Russia's "Innovation" art prize in 2016, but was later barred by the National Centre for Contemporary Art on the grounds that he had broken the law, prompting four members of the jury to leave in protest.
_	As Health Minister, she once said that she opposed user fees on the grounds that they discourage poor people from seeking medical treatment until the advanced stages of illness.
_	But attorneys for the service member's family appealed the decision on the grounds that such speech should not be allowed to inflict emotional distress on private parties exercising their freedom of religion during a funeral service.
_	Alison Weir has tentatively suggested William Cecil as organizer of Amy Dudley's death on the grounds that, if Amy was mortally ill, he had the strongest murder motive and that he was the main beneficiary of the ensuing scandal.
_	At noon, Captain Denis Bagly of "Talbot" came to "Naniwa" with a letter signed by all of the neutral captains except for the captain of "Vicksburg", W.A. Marshall, declining the request to change anchorage, on the grounds that Chemulpo was a neutral port.
_	In January 2015, journalist Katie Hopkins received the most votes for 2014's "Dick of the Year" but Hills and the team making the show made an executive decision to not give Hopkins the prize on the grounds that she would enjoy receiving it.
_	In May 2009, Germany announced plans to ban games such as paintball on the grounds that they "trivialise and encourage violence".
_	He rejected the ideas of several earlier philosophers that comets were planets, or at least a phenomenon related to the planets, on the grounds that while the planets confined their motion to the circle of the Zodiac, comets could appear in any part of the sky.
_	Chief Justice Rehnquist dissented on the grounds that he did not think that the Fourteenth Amendment's Privileges or Immunities Clause required the result reached by the majority, especially considering that the clause had been applied only a few times since the ratification of the amendment.
_	However, on June 20, Commissioner Selig announced that he was rejecting the proposed deal on the grounds that it was not in the best interests of the Dodgers.
_	At Florida State University, graduate minors exist on an unofficial basis on the grounds that a Master's or Doctoral student takes at least 9 and at most 18 credit hours in a secondary field outside of his or her academic discipline.
_	All three petitions where denied on the grounds that the chimpanzees were not persons and thus the issues in the petitions would not be considered.
_	In 1968, despite Graham Edwards winning the National 200 m breaststroke title, the Australian Swimming Union persuaded an overweight O'Brien to make a comeback in 1968 on the grounds that Australia did not have a quality breaststroker for the Olympics.
_	After a radio silence, the censor board on 17 October 2015 refused to grant censor certificate on the grounds that the release of the film may cause communal disharmony, unrest, and disturbance.
_	Not all critics were as fulsome; the British critic and poet Francis Turner Palgrave castigated it as "an essentially vulgar and low-class work precisely on the grounds that call forth the wonder of uncultivated spectators."
_	Meanwhile, New York Supreme Court Justice John E. McGeehan blocked La Guardia's proposed bus ban on the grounds that it was unreasonable.
_	However, Martin and the literary editor Raymond Mortimer turned down Orwell's review on the grounds that "it is very uncompromisingly said and implies that our Spanish correspondents are all wrong" and that it was more a restatement of Orwell's opinions
_	Renouf claims not to be antisemitic on the grounds that she does not regard Judaism as genetic and criticises Christian Zionism in equivalent terms ("you don't have to be Jewish to be Jew-ish").
_	He would eventually be deprived of his title by Act of Parliament in 1478, ostensibly on the grounds that he lacked the wealth required to maintain the standing of a duke.
_	Eventually, Pamela filed for divorce in December 1945 on the grounds that Randolph had deserted her for three years.
_	In this case, it was held that the claimant could not recover any damages (even after the 75% reduction from the preceding case) on the grounds that, while the claimant's injury was due to the state of the defendant's premises:
_	The name of the party was contested by a minor local party, the "Agrupación Vecinal Unidad Ciudadana", on the grounds that it is similar to their own one.
_	The former was used in some early 18th-century Russian texts, but some authorities of the period considered it superfluous, like Mikhail Lomonosov, on the grounds that "the letter Е, having several different pronunciations, could serve in the pronoun and the interjection " and that it was inappropriate to introduce letters solely for use in loanwords.
_	In late 2004, the Sindhi diaspora vociferously opposed a Public Interest Litigation in the Supreme Court of India, which asked the Government of India to delete the word "Sindh" from the Indian National Anthem (written by Rabindranath Tagore prior to the independence) on the grounds that it infringed upon the sovereignty of Pakistan.
_	As part of his research into "everyday racism", Peukert explored how ordinary people use of disparaging language to describe the homeless allowed them to see as justified the mass incarceration of the homeless into the concentration camps under the grounds that the homeless were part of the "asocial" threatening the "volksgemeinschaft".
_	Separately, Cukurova applied to the English Administrative Court to seek permission to impugn the 2003 Regulations on the grounds that they were "ultra vires" the authority granted under the "European Communities Act 1972", as they extended the Directive's application beyond its contemplated purpose.
_	This sum was payable to the claimant on the grounds that the defendant had failed in its obligation to provide care after a cancelled flight had led to the claimant being forced to sleep overnight in an airport terminal.
_	A judge at that court dismissed the charges against Shekhawat in 2009 on the grounds that there was no proof of direct involvement, although one of his co-accused remained subject to the proceedings.
_	In a 2006 "Washington Post" article, Brown argued against free trade on the grounds that labor activism was responsible for the growth of the U.S. middle class, and that the U.S. economy is harmed by trade relations with countries that lack the kind of labor regulations that have resulted from that activism.
_	English novelist E. M. Forster was a staunch opponent of censoring material on the grounds that it was obscene or immoral, raising the issue of moral subjectivity and the constant changing of moral values.
_	Zaynab, supported by her brother Abdullah, at first refused the proposal on the grounds that, "I am the widow of a Quraysh."
_	On that basis the JPO ruled on the substance of the claim, and it issued a decision of invalidation on the grounds that X's Trademark was in breach of Article 4(1)(xv).
_	A plea for Sharma to be sentenced to death was rejected on the grounds that the murder, although intentional, was not premeditated and Sharma was not considered to be a threat to society.
_	The Hare-Clark system with Robson Rotation is advocated on the grounds that the effect of 'donkey voting' is reduced because of the randomised ordering, and the absence of the group voting tickets creates more personal accountability.
_	The alternative system is advocated on the grounds that informal voting (spoiled ballots) is reduced because only one number need be written; on the other hand, it greatly increases the potential for tactics by parties as they have direct control of a large percentage of the vote.
_	However HIV positive individuals may still be denied immigration visas on the grounds that their treatment takes up limited resources and is a burden for taxpayers.
_	The fraction, or breaking of the bread, was criticised on the grounds that it was not nearly as significant as the consecration or administration; it was largely a practical act.
_	Goldman v. Weinberger, , was a United States Supreme Court case in which a Jewish Air Force officer was denied the right to wear a yarmulke when in uniform on the grounds that the Free Exercise Clause applies less strictly to the military than to ordinary citizens.
_	In 1981, PRLDEF achieved its most visible early triumph when a federal court intervened to block a city Democratic Party primary election on the grounds that New York City Council boundaries diminished the power of minority voters.
_	Luís was deposed; the swearing-in of President-elect Julio Prestes was blocked, on the grounds that the election had been rigged by his supporters; the 1891 Constitution was abrogated, the National Congress was dissolved and the provisional military junta ceded power to Vargas.
_	With the introduction of conscription under the Military Service Act 1916, Baxter and his brothers refused to register on the grounds that "all war is wrong, futile, and destructive alike to victor and vanquished."
_	Little Finger and Black Cat filed for an injunction in Federal District Court, on the grounds that the Tribal Court did not have the jurisdiction to try the case and that the subsequent conviction and enforcement of the sentences were in violation of the due process clause of the Fifth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution.
_	A group of families whose white children were locked out of the closed Norfolk schools also sued in federal court on the grounds that they were not being granted equal protection under the law, since they had no schools.
_	The Mishnah Berurah (an authoritative Ashkenazi halakhic text) allows liquor to be substituted for wine on the grounds that it is "Hamar Medina," a drink one would serve to a respected guest.
_	Firkovich successfully petitioned the Russian government to exempt the Karaites from anti-Jewish laws on the grounds that Karaites had immigrated to Europe before the crucifixion of Jesus and thus could not be held responsible for his death.
_	Boulware later made threats against a judge in his child custody case after he and the mother of his eleven-year-old son lost custody of their son to Boulware's mother, on the grounds that they were unfit for sole custody of the child.
_	However, many supporters of net neutrality in Portugal have objected to this pricing model on the grounds that it creates another barrier to entry for all internet companies that are not included in the special data packages.
_	His successor, Jacques Parizeau, was a hardline separatist; Assimopoulos resigned the vice-presidency in 1988 on the grounds that she could not support the party's policy direction.
_	Some libertarian groups, such as the Cato Institute, criticize smart growth on the grounds that it leads to greatly increased land values, and people with average incomes can no longer afford to buy detached houses.
_	In late 2014 the appeal was rejected on the grounds that, although it was accepted that Brayley was not Nitschke's patient, the controversial concept of rational suicide was inconsistent with the medical profession's code of conduct and that, as a medical practitioner providing advice on suicide, he posed a serious risk because people may elect to commit suicide believing it to be a pathway sanctioned by a medical practitioner and perhaps the medical profession generally.
_	Finally the court rejected a contract claim on the grounds that defendant was never a registered member of Facebook.
_	On June 29, 1890 "Clara Parker" was condemned by the Steamboat Inspection Service on the grounds that its hull was weak and defective.
_	Moreover, the Socialist League at this occasion suspended the 80 members of the Bloomsbury branch on the grounds that the group had put up candidates jointly with the SDF, against the policy of the party.
_	In a letter to Pillsbury chairman Phillip L. Smith, franchise representative Bill N. Pothitos stated that franchisees disapproved of the transaction on the grounds that they "strongly oppose this proposed course of conduct for one reason and one reason alone:
_	In 1990, he launched a campaign to oppose the presence of the ROTC on the MIT campus, on the grounds that it discriminated against gay and lesbian students.
_	Also on October 15, federal judge Claudia Wilken dismissed from the case FBI supervisor Richard Wallace Held, who had been prominent in the agency's COINTELPRO effort, on the grounds that he had no duty to oversee the daily duties of his subordinate agents.
_	Their removal was ordered on the grounds that the "de jure" Chief Justice was not allowed to advise in these cases.
_	With the fall of Abdolhossein Teymourtash in late 1932, the party soon melted away and was outlawed on the grounds that it harbors republican sentiments.
_	In 2000, Simitis was embroiled in a dispute with the Archbishop of the influential Greek Orthodox Church, Christodoulos, when the Greek government sought to remove the "Religion" field from the national ID cards carried by Greek citizens on the grounds that the Hellenic Data Protection Authority (HDPA) recommended so; its decision also included the "Nationality" field, but was not implemented following a subsequent EE directive to the contrary.
_	Cicero disagrees with this view on the grounds that it would make Livius younger than Plautus and Naevius, though he was supposed to have been the first to produce a play.
_	His election was overturned by Pope Benedict XIII on the grounds that he had previously reserved the see for his own appointment; on 9 March 1418, he provided John Bullock instead.
_	At the age of 29, Steppe claimed an exemption from the draft for World War I on the grounds that he supported his widowed mother.
_	This proposal encountered strong opposition not only from Mainlander groups but also from Hakka and Taiwanese aboriginal groups who felt that it would slight their home languages, as well as others including Hoklo who objected to the proposal on logistical grounds and on the grounds that it would increase ethnic tensions.
_	Kenya's minister in charge of the project, Chris Murungaru, was later banned by the UK government from travelling to Britain, on the grounds that it would not be in the public good.
_	When Cochrane was asked in advance of the trial to provide written specifics of his accusations against Gambier he refused on the grounds that it would be insubordinate, leaving the court-martial to set the terms of the charges.
_	Brzezinski continued to argue for and support détente for the next few years, publishing "Peaceful Engagement in Eastern Europe" in "Foreign Affairs", and he continued to support non-antagonistic policies after the Cuban Missile Crisis on the grounds that such policies might disabuse Eastern European nations of their fear of an aggressive Germany, and pacify Western Europeans fearful of a superpower compromise along the lines of the Yalta Conference.
_	He also defined Islam as "A Christian heresy", on the grounds that Muslims accept many of the tenets of Christianity but deny the godhood of Jesus (see Hilaire Belloc#On Islam).
_	This was later justified on the grounds that rescued servicemen would have been rapidly landed at their military destination and promptly returned to active service.
_	Giuliani's high-profile raid of the Princeton/Newport firm ended with the defendants having their cases overturned on appeal on the grounds that what they had been convicted of were not crimes.
_	In the year 1935, the poet Pascual Guerrero asked the department to build a stadium on the grounds that the offering.
_	Morgan was anti-slavery but opposed abolitionism on the grounds that slavery was protected by law.
_	Connors and Goolagong filed a suit at a French court seeking the right to participate but this was rejected on the grounds that there was no need for emergency action.
_	The 1064–1065 war between Brittany and Normandy (the Breton-Norman War) was sparked after Duke William supported the rebellion against Conan II led by Rivallon I of Dol, the Duke of Dol-Combourg In 1065, before his invasion of Anglo-Saxon England, William of Normandy warned his rivals in Brittany and Anjou to abstain from any attacks on his duchy, on the grounds that his mission bore the papal banner.
_	In July 2011, the hospital stopped honouring the Humana ""Mi Salud"" health care insurance plan on the grounds that it was unfair as compared to the payments made to the San Juan area hospitals.
_	Some workers have split off the Pseudorthocerida and Dissidocerida as separate orders, the latter on the grounds that it arose from a different baltoceratid ancestor.
_	PruWinrock's approval was denied by the planning commission for additional on and off-ramps to neighboring I-40 on the grounds that they had not completed a required traffic study.
_	Nevertheless, Ford asserted that the Peace Ship’s expedition was successful on the grounds that it stimulated discussions about peace.
_	Writers adapting a work for another medium (e.g., a film screenplay from a book) often make significant changes, additions to, or omissions from the original plot in the book, on the grounds that these changes were necessary to make a good film.
_	However, these advancements were followed by the first Reform Act 1832, a principal condition of which was the removal of the poorer freeholders from the franchise, on the grounds that the qualifying income had not been amended for 400 years and that consequently many of those who were qualified were not truly independent as secret ballots were not yet in force.
_	This strategy seems to have been successful at least for Laconian Helots: when the Thebans ordered a group of Laconian helot prisoners to recite the verses of Alcman and Terpander (national poets of Thebes), they refused on the grounds that it would displease their masters.
_	Referee Bill Harrigan deferred to the video referee who ruled a penalty try on the grounds that contact had been made with the head, giving Melbourne a 20–18 lead and the premiership title.
_	DC Comics sued the Shuster heirs in 2010, and the court ruled in DC's favor on the grounds that the 1992 agreement with the Shuster heirs barred them from terminating the grant.
_	The LB&SCR originally did not buy sufficient stock for 30 sets, on the grounds that the trailers cars would be quicker to overhaul than the motor cars.
_	The Sierra Club president forbade any chapter from opposing Diablo Canyon, so The San Luis Obispo Chapter formed the Shoreline Preservation Conference to oppose the construction on the grounds that the area had been proposed as a state park, was a sacred Chumash Indian site, had some of the largest oak trees on the West Coast, was located on the second-to-last coastal wilderness area in California, and could be sitting on the fault that lightly shook Santa Barbara in a 1927 earthquake.
_	Aspects of the Whig interpretation are apparent in films, television, political rhetoric and even history textbooks: thus in the debate over Britishness, for example, David Marquand praised the Whig approach on the grounds that "Ordered freedom and evolutionary progress "have" been among the hallmarks of modern British history, and they "should" command respect".
_	He refused on the grounds that he "had better things to do", something which he claims never to have regretted.
_	Hitler then met with Rundstedt and excused himself on the grounds that it had all been a misunderstanding.
_	Fungi are considered to be in urgent need of conservation by the British Mycological Society on the grounds that it is a traditionally neglected taxon which has legal protection in few countries.
_	The application was to set aside the combined summons as an irregular proceeding on the grounds that the provisions of Rule 53 of Uniform Rules of Court (providing that proceedings on review "shall be by way of notice of motion") and of section 407(4)(a) of the Companies Act (providing that a person aggrieved by the Master's direction may "apply to Court") required that proceedings be brought by way of notice of motion.
_	The court dismissed application on the grounds that neither Rule 53 nor section 407(4)(a) rendered proceedings by way of notice of motion peremptory.
_	He sued in the Court of Queen's Bench to have the conviction quashed, on the grounds that:
_	Calling the legislation "presumptuous," Ballard vetoed it on the grounds that it violated the Idaho Organic Act of 1863, which established the territory.
_	While the Ivy League institutions settled, MIT contested the charges on the grounds that the practice was not anticompetitive because it ensured the availability of aid for the greatest number of students.
_	A conviction was overturned by the High Court of Justiciary Appeal Court on the grounds that a temporary sheriff was not independent in terms of Article 6 of the European Convention on Human Rights as he was appointed by the Lord Advocate for 1 year, and could be dismissed at will.
_	In Canada, the constitutionality of the rape shield law was challenged on the grounds that it hampers a defendant's ability to present a defence.
_	However, in January 2008, he was pardoned under a 1998 law for the crime on the grounds that anyone convicted under Nazi Germany is officially not guilty.
_	With respect to the relationship with other plays, any connection with 'The Spanish Fig’ would seem to be ruled out on the grounds that it pre-dates the publication of de Thou's Historiarum.
_	A recent example of the House of Lords reconsidering an earlier decision occurred in 1999, when the judgment in the case on the extradition of the former President of Chile Augusto Pinochet was overturned on the grounds that one of the Lords on the committee, Lord Hoffmann, was a Director of a charity closely allied with Amnesty International, which was a party to the appeal and had an interest to achieve a particular result.
_	Carroll "Poke" Runyon suggests that the name ultimately derives from "a Middle Eastern Pagan Goddess", on the grounds that some manuscripts depict Paimon as a young woman riding a camel, and that the name "Paimon" purportedly meant "a tinkling sound" in an unspecified language, in turn a claimed reference to Isis.
_	After Dobermann's death in 1894, the Germans named the breed Dobermann-pinscher in his honor, but a half century later dropped the word 'pinscher' on the grounds that this German word for 'terrier' was no longer appropriate.
_	The RF's intention was partly to test whether or not the British would attempt to block this bill after Gibbs had granted Royal Assent to it, but this issue never came to a head because Sandys persuaded Field not to forward it to Gibbs for ratification on the grounds that it had not been unanimously passed.
_	Shiel contested the election on the grounds that the Oregon constitution had set the election date and no law had been passed to change it.
_	At that point, many people disagreed with the name Kukub on the grounds that it was not a Malay name, so they changed it to Kukup.
_	However a majority of the IRA led by Rory O'Connor opposed the Treaty, on the grounds that it disestablished the Irish republic, which they argued they were sworn to defend, and that it imposed a declaration of fidelity to the British monarch on Irish parliamentarians.
_	A 2012 study, however, questioned some types of round pen training on the grounds that pressure-release methods do not enhance horse-human interaction (as remote-controlled cars were used to elicit similar responses) but actually control the horse through fear and for that reason may be less humane than originally thought.
_	The book strongly criticizes string theory and its prominence in contemporary theoretical physics, on the grounds that string theory has yet to come up with a single prediction that can be verified using any technology that is likely to be feasible within our lifetimes.
_	His permanent residence permit was revoked by the Swedish government in August 2008, on the grounds that he is no longer considered to be a resident in the country.
_	In January 2008, a petition to matriculate armorial bearings for the City of Inverness was refused by Lord Lyon King of Arms on the grounds that there is no corporate body or legal persona to whom arms can be granted.
_	Robespierre also argued against the Girondins' objective of using war as a means of exporting revolution, on the grounds that "nobody likes armed missionaries".
_	Certainly some girls were asked to return their membership cards when they were suspected of having engaged in immoral conduct, and one girl sued for libel after the GFS expelled her as a member on the grounds that she was suspected of having an affair with a married man.
_	Martz would soon after establish a website, http://www.savetheoasis.com/, which explains the station's position on the issue, stating that WIOT should not get special treatment on the grounds that it was an Ohio radio station that served no part of Detroit (though the statement was not exactly true, as the station is interfering with listeners inside WIOT's protected signal contour) and that Clear Channel's motive was to try to remove competition, as Clear Channel owns two of the heritage adult-oriented radio stations in Detroit, WMXD and WNIC.
_	The Prince of Wales is believed to have originated the nickname "Foggy" on the grounds that he was "thick and wet".
_	A group of Michigan residents sued on the grounds that their Fourth Amendment rights prohibiting unreasonable search and seizure were being violated.
_	The court ordered the by-election as Hussein was disqualified from contesting when his nomination papers were rejected by the returning officer on the grounds that he had mistakenly filled the address of his house in Pasir Mas in the column that was meant for the address in the constituency.
_	Both Stoffer and her parents, themselves BYU alumni, criticized the manner in which the school suspended Stoffer, on the grounds that the letter with which BYU notified Stoffer of their decision, according to the Stoffers, implied that Stoffer had sexual relations with her male housemates, which Stoffer characterized as "totally false and slanderous."
_	Candrakīrti on the other hand, critiqued Bhāvaviveka's adoption of the epistemological ("pramana") tradition on the grounds that it contained a subtle essentialism.
_	Henry called for the accusers to be prosecuted, on the grounds that "[i]f they believe [Moore] is predatory, they are guilty of allowing him to exist for 40 years".
_	The I-CL disagreed with this view and took a dual defeatist position on the war on the grounds that Argentina was not a semi-colony of imperialism, and also called for self determination for the Falkland Islanders.
_	In June 2006, a federal judge rejected Newdow's Establishment Clause lawsuit on the grounds that the minted words amount to a secular national slogan, and do not dictate anyone's beliefs.
_	The case was thrown out of court on the grounds that a merger through a "national convention" did not violate the PC Party constitution.
_	The house was placed with its long axis right up against the Bird Ave. sidewalk with sections of the traffic circle acting as the grounds that a house of this standing would normally possess.
_	Merrill Singer has criticized the concept of public anthropology on the grounds that it ignores applied anthropology.
_	She supports a national ban on fracking on the grounds that "cutting-edge science now suggests fracking is every bit as bad as coal".
_	On 1 February 2018, the Australian Electoral Commission issued a notice that it was considering deregistering the party on the grounds that it had ceased to have at least 500 members.
_	As such, Hugenberg drafted "A Bill against the Enslavement of the German People" which declared acceptance of the Young Plan to be high treason under the grounds that Germany should not have to pay any reparations, and that those ministers who signed the Young Plan on behalf of the "Reich" government and those who voted for the Young Plan in the "Reichstag" should be prosecuted for high treason.
_	Supported Premier Mike Harris's cut to social welfare in 1995, on the grounds that the poor would be encouraged to improve their lives.
_	According to the Guttmacher Institute, as of October 2017, 17 states have passed bans on abortion "at about 20 weeks post-fertilization or its equivalent of 22 weeks after the woman’s last menstrual period on the grounds that the fetus can feel pain at that point in gestation."
_	In the Province of Buenos Aires, this split was protested by other parties, on the grounds that the PJ (taken as a whole) would most likely win the three senatorial benches available (as it finally occurred).
_	On November 11, 2011, Wayne County Circuit Court Judge Robert Ziolkowski vacated the "breach of peace" ruling against Terry Jones and Wayne Sapp on the grounds that they were denied due process.
_	It also has connotations with political claims on the territory on the grounds that it was held by Greece and in 1914 was declared an independent state by the local Greeks against annexation to the newly founded Albanian principality.
_	It was turned down by Hull Truck, Salisbury Playhouse and the National Theatre in the UK on the grounds that they felt their audiences would be 'too sophisticated' for the subject matter.
_	However, around 1,700 candidates were barred from running by the Guardian Council vetting body, the Supervisory and Executive Election Boards, on the grounds that they were not sufficiently loyal to the Iranian revolution.
_	His nomination was rejected by the Massachusetts Governor's Council by a 4 to 3 vote on the grounds that the position should go to a Democrat.
_	Although Mark Kinsey Stephenson played the lead role in "The Unnamable" and its sequel, it almost wasn't to be on the grounds that he wasn't 'cosmetically suited' for a lead role.
_	A suggestion to demolish the tollhouse opposite the Spaniards in 1966 was successfully resisted, partly on the grounds that it would lead to more and faster traffic.
_	The Poles objected on the grounds that their greater number, earlier arrival and greater financial contribution entitled them to preference.
_	In the County Court, Judge O'Malley dismissed Mr Mirvahedy's claim on the grounds that it was not any abormal or unusual characteristic of the animals that led to the accident.
_	Kellestine, who frequently consumed the drugs he was supposed to sell and who was deeply in debt with the bank frequently threatening to foreclose on his farm he brought in 1982, had discovered that selling methamphetamine was a lucrative business, and was greatly annoyed when Muscedere had ordered him to stop selling methamphetamine under the grounds that it was wrong.
_	After Morse's lawyers appealed the conviction on the grounds that she was being punished for expressing ideas, the New Zealand Supreme Court ruled in 2011 that the previous rulings had misinterpreted the meaning of "offensive behavior" in the Summary Offences Act.
_	Cleaning is not a reversible process and can sometimes be controversial due to fears that cleaning would damage a piece, or on the grounds that damage or residue forms part of the history of a given piece and should not be modified.
_	The vicar opposed the acceptance of the status of a Roman cardinal by the Melkite patriarch, on the grounds that "the leader of an Eastern Catholic church should not hold a subordinate Latin-rite office" and in protest of Patriarch Maximos' acceptance Zoghby resigned as vicar.
_	Personifying this division were the evangelical leaders James Dobson and Rick Warren, the former who warned of the dangers of a Barack Obama victory in 2008 from his point of view, in contrast with the latter who declined to endorse either major candidate on the grounds that he wanted the church to be less politically divisive and that he agreed substantially with both men.
_	He refused to revoke, on the grounds that he had never asserted Luther's heresies himself, but he did abjure and recognize the Pontiff as his judge.
_	In 1995 the Dharmacharya (spiritual head of the Hindu organization, Sanatan Dharma Maha Sabha) Pandit Krishna Maharaj, refused to accept the Trinity Cross from Prime Minister Patrick Manning, for his social work on the grounds that it did not represent a true national award involving all religious denominations of Trinidad and Tobago.
_	The former defended their decision not to be included on the grounds that their performance was 'sub-standard', but to lend their support, Jimmy Page and Robert Plant pledged to donate proceeds from the DVD release of Page & Plant:No Quarter to the campaign, and John Paul Jones pledged proceeds from his American tour with Mutual Admiration Society.
_	On 15 October 2012, Sukhni was added to the European Union's sanction list on the grounds that as a cabinet minister, he "shares responsibility for the regime’s violent repression against the civilian population."
_	In 1618 Pierce petitioned the Crown to declare his nephew illegitimate, on the grounds that while his parents had lived together as man and wife, his father was at all material times married to an unnamed daughter of Lord Cahir.
_	This was owned and run in laissez-faire style by a Dutch Quaker, Harry Tuyn, although the story told in Morley's obituaries that subjects such as maths and Latin were not taught at Sizewell Hall on the grounds that they were too boring is untrue.
_	The ministry based their rejection, in 1993, on the grounds that the purpose of FCA is "against good customs so that the expressed purpose is contrary to the views about justice and morality prevailing in our society".
_	A set of appeals to the Court of Appeal and House of Lords led to the quashing of the murder conviction in 1998 and a re-trial in March 1999, on the grounds that new evidence suggested that the fourth bullet entered the side of the car.
_	The committee refused on the grounds that Butterworth was not entitled to one as he was not fired, but had voluntarily resigned.
_	While at Brescia, Curtiss gave Italian poet Gabriele d'Annunzio a short joyride, but declined a similar request by Princess Laetitia on the grounds that the seat would be unsuitable.
_	However, the U.S. delegation had not counted on the strong opposition by two delegations (Argentina and Chile), each for different reasons, which managed to persuade other delegations to oppose Blaine's candidacy on the grounds that he could not serve as president because he was not technically a delegate.
_	However, Daiei Motion Picture Company (a producer of popular features at the time) and the Japanese government had disagreed with the choice of Kurosawa's work on the grounds that it was "not [representative enough] of the Japanese movie industry" and felt that a work of Yasujirō
_	On April 16, 2008, the Supreme Court ruled in a case brought by a number of people with Jewish fathers and grandfathers whose applications for citizenship had been rejected on the grounds that they were Messianic Jews.
_	On 1 August, Kaitani's defence lawyers Iqbal Khan and Rabo Matebalavu called for the charges against Kaitani and his fellow-accused to be dismissed on the grounds that twelve state witnesses who testified, including New Zealand Police handwriting expert David Boot, had failed to conclusively link the accused to their alleged crime.
_	In 1922, the Viscountess Rhondda, a peeress "suo jure", claimed a seat in the House on the grounds that sitting in Parliament constituted the exercise of a public function.
_	The doctrine was criticized on the grounds that it did no more than alienate the Japanese.
_	This storyline caused anti-abortion viewers to complain to the Justice Minister on the grounds that the story was hate speech against people with disabilities.
_	Amongst the criticisms is the fact that it explicitly ignores the publications of most full-time researchers in the UK, on the grounds that they are employed on fixed term contracts.
_	British Coal closed Tower Colliery on 22 April 1994, on the grounds that it would be uneconomic in current market conditions to continue production.
_	In the 1990s, that story was partially debunked on the grounds that the sale of Ruth had occurred five years earlier.
_	The Japanese government immediately banned the photo of the Emperor with MacArthur on the grounds that it damaged the imperial mystique, but MacArthur rescinded the ban and ordered all of the Japanese newspapers to print it.
_	Despite the game's controlling body agreeing to it, the Australian Cricket Board vetoed it on the grounds that it might lead to umpires being quizzed by teams after every game and meant that the throwing controversy would continue into the World Series Cup during the coming week.
_	How can a left-leaning town that has shot down skyscraper proposals on the grounds that they would wipe out historic buildings be contemplating the destruction of an official city landmark?
_	The United States National Academy of Sciences has criticized PK parties on the grounds that conditions are not reliable for obtaining scientific results and "are just those which psychologists and others have described as creating states of heightened suggestibility."
_	Other scholars have denied these theories on the grounds that no archaeological remains have been found that proof that the papar were in Iceland before the island was settled around 874.
_	In his preface to the work, Sullivan justifies this on the grounds that the episode has no dramatic connection with the story.
_	Many members of the Coptic Christian community to which he belonged, objected to his accepting the premiership on the grounds that it would antagonize the relationship between Muslims and Christians when both were united under the Wafd Party to fight against the British occupation.
_	Briggs led the successful fight against a City Council resolution proposed by Roy Hampton asking Mayor Bowron to remove activist Don Healy from a City Charter Revision Committee on the grounds that he was a Communist.
_	Long tried to have the case dismissed on the grounds that under Louisiana law Pleasant could not sue in her own name, as under the state community property law, the suit would only be proper if filed in her husband's name.
_	Some prefer the sound produced via tube amplifiers on the grounds that it is more natural and satisfying than the sound from transistor amplifiers.
_	In the campaign to establish a free library, some of the opposition had argued against it on the grounds that taxes shouldn't be used to circulate novels.
_	Alfonso X of Castile would claim the duchy on the grounds that her dowry had never been fully paid.
_	Some other inhabitants of the area have also taken up this custom, justified on the grounds that felines are "a serious threat to Australia's native fauna".
_	They were aware of the emperor's intention, so they nominated Lu Wan on the grounds that he had made great contributions in the military campaigns against the rival kingdoms.
_	The Québec Superior Court dismissed the case in August 1998, on the grounds that the courts in Guyana were in a better position to hear the case.
_	In 2008, the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania rejected a further request from Abu-Jamal for a hearing into claims that the trial witnesses perjured themselves, on the grounds that he had waited too long before filing the appeal.
_	It is said to have been a pre-Roman city, although this remains unconfirmed and has been questioned by some authors, on the grounds that the flat location did not meet the defensive requirements of a pre-Roman town and only a few pottery remains have been found.
_	The North Carolina Supreme Court overruled the conviction on the grounds that slaves were the absolute property of their owners who could not be punished at common law unless the legislature authorized such punishment.
_	Duncan-Jones has suggested that "donativa" may have been paid to auxiliaries also from the time of Hadrian onwards, on the grounds that the total amount of donative to the military increased sharply at that time.
_	They justified the imposition of controls on the grounds that they would thus wrest profits from wealthy private merchants that could pose a threat to the state and bring them into state coffers; particularly, modernists claimed that salt and iron industrialists were "brutal and tyrannical," who employed thousands of workers that could potentially become rebels.
_	Aubry objected to the move on the grounds that it would interfere with their joint custody arrangement.
_	In , the new Arrows team which had been established by former Shadow personnel was sued by Shadow on the grounds that the Arrows FA/1 car was a copy of Shadow's DN9 – a view upheld by the UK High Court, which placed a ban on Arrows racing the FA/1.
_	Their appeals to the Florida Court of Appeals were rejected on the grounds that the jury had ruled the confessions had been given voluntarily.
_	This contention was rejected by the court, on the grounds that even if it were true, as an interpreter, his tasks included locating, evaluating and forwarding to the "Einsatzgruppe" command lists of Communist party functionaries.
_	This was in spite of racial theory that falsely regarded most Polish leaders as actually being of "German blood", and partly because of it, on the grounds that German blood must not be used in the service of a foreign nation.
_	In January 1857, the bill for the organization of the territory was introduced into the House of Representatives, but the proposal was defeated on the grounds that the population of the proposed territory was yet too small.
_	Bn funding for the Padma bridge project on the grounds that there was conspiracy to commit corruption.
_	Wilson, reluctant to cause trouble with the left-wing, decided not to sack him on the grounds that he was inexperienced.
_	Discovering the betrayal, Walz requested reassignment on the grounds that his honor had been impugned.
_	Upon motions by the prosecution and the defence, the investigative judge in the case ordered the disclosure of the source for the news story, on the grounds that it was necessary to safeguard national security and ensure a fair trial for H.
_	While describing their views as "repugnant" and "counter to the kind and tolerant values of the vast majority of New Zealanders", Immigration Minister Iain Lees-Galloway cleared their entry on the grounds that the duo had met immigration character requirements including not having prior criminal convictions.
_	YTB responded by stating that it intends to "vigorously defend the case," and the case was dismissed in July 2009 on the grounds that non-residents of Illinois could not pursue the matter under Illinois law.
_	At her deportation hearing on October 27, Goldman refused to answer questions about her beliefs on the grounds that her American citizenship invalidated any attempt to deport her under the Anarchist Exclusion Act, which could be enforced only against non-citizens of the US.
_	The court dismissed this allegation on the grounds that Steinberg had registered his complaint with the defendants within weeks of beginning their advertising campaign, and that a six-month delay between publication of the allegedly infringing work and instigation of a lawsuit was not sufficient to establish a claim of laches.
_	The government defended its decision not to compensate local authorities on the basis of actual costs incurred on the grounds that "such an approach would mean that the central government would hold all the financial risks but have no commensurate control of how the risks are managed".
_	In August 2011, Jordan expressed opposition to extending the life of Waimanalo Gulch Sanitary Landfill on the grounds that the deadline did not give sufficient time for the community to express their opinions and that the community had been accepting Oahu's trash for the past twenty years.
_	Schleicher opposed the prospect of a "grand coalition" headed by the SPD's Hermann Müller, and made it clear that he preferred that the SPD be excluded from power on the grounds that their anti-militarism disqualified them from office.
_	American Tibetologist Elliot Sperling has argued in favor of a recent tendency by some authors writing in Chinese to revive the term "Tubote" () for modern use in place of "Xizang", on the grounds that "Tubote" more clearly includes the entire Tibetan plateau rather than simply the Tibet Autonomous Region.
_	Following passage of the Espionage Act of 1917, "The Masses" was suppressed by the U. S. government on the grounds that it was detrimental to the war effort.
_	The High Court of England and Wales held that the Foreign Secretary, Douglas Hurd, had acted "ultra vires" (outside of his power, and therefore unlawfully) by allocating £234 million towards the funding of the dam, on the grounds that legislation only empowered him to allocate funds to economically sound projects.
_	Shlomo Avineri has criticised observance of Nakba Day on the grounds that a more important issue is the failure to solidify a stronger national movement for Palestinian citizens as a foundation for nation-building.
_	In his refusal, which he based on the grounds that he held the castle of the king and not of the archbishop, he was supported by Henry II (Ralph de Diceto, i. 311; Gervase of Canterbury, i. 174, ii. 391).
_	A confidential memo from the Northern Ireland Office also called for pressure on the Irish Government to discharge the soldiers on the grounds that the safety of the SAS men in an Irish prison could not be guaranteed.
_	Justice Robert Grier of the U.S. Supreme Court, as circuit justice, tried the case, and instructed the jury to acquit on the grounds that though the defendants might be guilty of murder or riot, they were not charged with that, and were not guilty of treason.
_	A curious point regarding this first movement is that the conductor, the late Venon Handley, rejected it for performance on the grounds that there was just one bar for the second violin in the first movement which was too difficult to play!
_	Just to show you how desperate the Nelson Maple Leafs wanted to win was when they launched a protest to the WIHL, on the grounds that the injured Betker took approximately 15 minutes to return to action.
_	He argued that he could not be charged on the grounds that it would constitute double jeopardy in violation of Section 11(h) of the "Charter".
_	However, Human Rights Watch supported "lifting the current restrictions on headscarves in university on the grounds that the prohibition is an unwarranted infringement on the right to religious practice.
_	All but one employee appealed to the MSPB on the grounds that the punishment was too severe.
_	This argument can be challenged on the grounds that a number of raags mentioned Raagmala are not in Sri Granth Sahib Ji and a number of raags used in Sri Granth Sahib Ji are not in the Raagmala.
_	The opposition to marriage of same-sex couples, on the grounds that it fails to consider the needs
_	It passed legislation to become simply Rhodesia, but the British government refused to approve this on the grounds that the country's name was defined by British legislation and so could not be altered by the colonial government.
_	Healy from a city charter revision committee on the grounds that Healy had been "an active member of the Communist party" since 1936.
_	Amid frantic efforts by Beadle and others on both sides to revive the Royal Commission, the Rhodesian government had Gibbs announce a state of emergency the same day on the grounds that black Rhodesian insurgents were reportedly entering the country.
_	In contrast to the rationalist approaches above, cognitivists critique the rationalist theories on the grounds that liberals and realists both use flawed assumptions such as that nation-states are always and forever rational actors; that interests remain static, that different interpretations of interests and power are not possible.
_	Some provinces allow a ballot to be refused on the grounds that no party satisfies the elector's vote.
_	However, it incurred the hostility of Samuel Morse, who obtained an injunction against it on the grounds that the paper tape and alphabet used fell under his patent.
_	As of March 25, 2014 all of these requests have been denied on the grounds that they would interfere with an ongoing investigation.
_	Committee on Petitions dealt with the petition, but rejected it on the grounds that judicial rehabilitation by Czech courts is not possible, because he was tried by the National Court in Bratislava and there is not enough materials for other type of rehabilitation.
_	The claim was rejected by the Commission on the grounds that there was no description of the granted land either in the grant itself, or the map which accompanied it.
_	Frederick William refused the offer on the grounds that revolutionary assemblies could not grant royal titles.
_	On 18 August 1993, the court rejected the petitions on the grounds that (1) the principle of double jeopardy would be infringed, (2) that new charges would be unreasonable given the seriousness of those of which he had been acquitted, (3) that conviction on the new charges would be unlikely, and (4) that Demjanjuk was extradited from the United States specifically to stand trial for offenses attributed to Ivan the Terrible of Treblinka, and not for other alternative charges.
_	Proponents of the measure objected to the wording of the ballot title and summary on the grounds that they were argumentative and prejudicial.
_	This comes to a response to the two parties requesting the board for an "interlocutory" review on the grounds that inventory of the records were not relevant to the state's open records laws.
_	Franz is told by the Yugoslav consul in Vienna that despite his father-in-law's telegraphed offer of a position being available for him in a Zagreb bookstore, the consul refuses them visas on the grounds that native Yugoslav unemployment is already high and might make things worse if foreigners are seen as threatening to take already hard to find jobs from its natives.
_	When K C Dey refused the offer on the grounds that he would not lend his voice to other actors, they spotted Manna Dey sitting in the corner of the room and offered him the opportunity.
_	The parliament declined Nanuashvili's proposal on the grounds that an investigation by prosecutor's office is under way.
_	Áder was criticised for his close relationship with Prime Minister Viktor Orbán on the grounds that he would not serve as a check on the power of the Prime Minister.
_	Wainwright v. Greenfield, 474 U.S. 284 (1986), is a case in which the United States Supreme Court reversed the lower court's finding and overturned the petitioner's conviction, on the grounds that it was fundamentally unfair for the prosecutor to comment during the court proceedings on the petitioner's silence invoked as a result of a Miranda warning.
_	The corporation vigorously defended its action on the grounds that the letter was justified criticism of a performer.
_	The accident gave rise to a tort court case that "Amity Hall"s owners lost to "Albion"s owners on the grounds that "Amity Hall"s master had not followed the sailing instructions that Captain Alms of "Proserpine" had issued on setting out.
_	Nissen succeeded in rejecting a draft resolution from the two Finnmark Sami on the grounds that it concerned "special interests".
_	Tshekedi opposed the marriage on the grounds that under Tswana custom a chief could not marry simply as he pleased.
_	The Ministry of Justice later revealed that the murders had taken place with the connivance of the Bolshevik Red Guard and the Commandant of the Hospital, Stefan Basov, who justified the murder on the grounds that there would be 'two less bourgeois mouths to feed'.
_	In 1910, she petitioned the Law Society to be examined, but the Law Society refused on the grounds that membership was restricted to men.
_	Later on, when he became king in 1509, Henry VIII is supposed to have commissioned an English translation of a Life of Henry V so that he could emulate him, on the grounds that he thought that launching a campaign against France would help him to impose himself on the European stage.
_	Curtiss successfully shut down a rival bar that was approved by, and named for, Ruth, on the grounds that the names were too similar.
_	Burdett-Coutts was a personal friend of the Duke of Wellington, a generous benefactor and extremely devout - so much so that she dismissed Dickens' appointment as deputy matron on the grounds that she was a dissenter.
_	In 1998, Bordeaux's appeal court decided that Sergio Tornaghi could not be extradited to Italy, on the grounds that Italian procedure would not let him be judged again, after a trial during his absence.
_	The LB&SCR opposed the line on the grounds that it would compete with its own services from Sutton to Central London, and claimed that its own planned electrification of its lines to Victoria and London Bridge would offer quicker journeys than the W&SR route.
_	As Roosevelt rolled out a series of policies to give "all help short of war," America First mounted campaigns against them, on the grounds that each of them, in fact, did constitute war: first, the nation's first peacetime draft - Selective Service, begun in 1940, then Lend-Lease which allowed the British, near bankruptcy, to continue to buy the food and arms they needed as they reached their second year of resisting Nazi invasion single-handedly.
_	On September 8, 2006, Landis's attorney announced that he would formally request that the case be dropped on the grounds that LNDD's 370-page report revealed inconsistencies in the way the samples were handled.
_	At the outbreak of World War I he had volunteered his services and, like a number of other pastoralists, was rejected on the grounds that he was working in an essential occupation.
_	He condemned various interpretations of Marx—such as historicism, idealism, economism—on the grounds that they fail to realise that Marx's "science of history", historical materialism, represents a revolutionary view of social change.
_	In January 1934, a group backing the corporation formed in 1900 were asking for custody of the church's properties on the grounds that the property was purchased by and was still in the name of the original corporation.
_	Later tried at Cardiff Assizes and acquitted on the grounds that cremation was not contrary to law, he was able to carry out the ceremony (the first in the U.K. in modern times) on 14 March 1884 with pagan prayers.
_	Katz elaborated on this in 2003 in "The Battle for Rome: The Germans, The Allies, The Partisans, and The Pope, September 1943 – June 1944", using evidence from recently released OSS and Vatican sources that certain German diplomats, notably Eugen Dollmann, Himmler's representative in Rome and German Consul Eitel Möllhausen had gone to Pope Pius' personal liaison to the German occupational authorities, Pankratius Pfeiffer, asking him to urge the Pope to intervene and limit reprisals on the grounds that they would inflame the Roman population and make the occupation (and negotiations for a separate peace with the Allies they all fervently wished for) even more difficult.
_	The King initially opposed the match on the grounds that her family was of insufficient rank, as well as his hopes for his son's marriage to a German princess.
_	The patient in question had never been charged with a criminal offense, but was held in a windowless cell at the Penetanguishene Mental Health Centre for ten years on the grounds that he was prone to violent behaviour.
_	Following negotiations, on 8 May 1924, the League of Nations ratified the annexation on the grounds that Lithuania accepted the Memel Statute, a power-sharing arrangement to protect non-Lithuanians in the territory and its autonomous status.
_	The project was committed to ending all prostitution on the grounds that it "helps to construct and maintain gender inequality".
_	Crimmins appealed on the grounds that he did not know the bonds had been transported across state lines.
_	Early in 1963, by which time he is being coached by Bob Groseclose, he cleared sixteen feet in training but was turned down by meeting promoters on the grounds that he wasn't good enough.
_	She was twice imprisoned and refused to pay taxes on the grounds that as she did not have the vote therefore she should not have to pay.
_	Conservatives quickly seized on the fact that Obama and the bill's proponents insisted repeatedly throughout the protracted political debate 2009 and 2010 that the mandate was not a tax, but the Supreme Court upheld it on the grounds that it was a tax.
_	The Court of Appeal in Lublin also upheld it on the grounds that Sowiński posed a threat to the environment.
_	The government also rebuffed American proposals to bomb North Vietnam on the grounds that such actions would cede the moral high ground, which they claimed on the basis of fighting in a purely defensive manner.
_	In "American Canine Federation and Florence Vianzon v. City of Aurora, Colorado", 618 F.Supp.2d 1271 (2009), the plaintiffs sued in the United States District Court for the District of Colorado to prevent Aurora, Colorado from enforcing a pit bull ban on the grounds that the law was unconstitutionally vague, that the law was an abuse of the city's police power, and that the ban represented an unconstitutional taking of property.
_	In 2014, the brewery filed for an exclusive trademark on the use of the name 'Schlafly' to sell microbrewery beer; however, this was opposed by conservative activist Phyllis Schlafly, on the grounds that "alcohol has a connotation that is the opposite of conservative values."
_	In 2012, Bhushan filed a PIL seeking cancelation of coal block allocations by the government on the grounds that certain companies had been illegally favoured by the politicians.
_	The law was passed, however it was returned to the Assembly by the President in May 2007 on the grounds that it conflicted with Article 7 of the Albanian constitution.
_	In 2013, Dublin City councillor Nial Ring started a controversial campaign to change the official Irish name from Baile Bocht to Baile Bog, on the grounds that 'Poor Town' was insulting to the residents.
_	Despite numerous strikes in and around Addis Ababa, which sometimes ended in bloody confrontations, on May 19, 1975, the Derg temporarily closed CELU headquarters on the grounds that the union needed to be reorganized.
_	Holt sued the city of Maumelle, Arkansas in 1988 in an attempt to have its prohibition against pit bulls overturned on the grounds that the ordinance was impermissibly vague, that it was unreasonable to ban pit bull-type dogs, and that the city's Board of Directors committed a breach of contract by passing a pit bull ordinance that it had previously agreed to forego; Mr. Holt also asked that the city pay compensatory damages, punitive damages, and his attorney's fees.
_	McDonald's attempted to get all of its workers to sign the petition but many refused on the grounds that the current definition is accurate despite the company's complaint.
_	Kyllo appealed to the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit on the grounds that observations with a thermal-imaging device constituted a search under the Fourth Amendment.
_	Several applications to the European Court of Human Rights were rejected in 2011 on the grounds that the applicants were not affected parties, as they did not intend to build minarets.
_	A "concerned citizen", William B. Ritchie, sued to oppose the granting of federal registration on the grounds that doing so would be immoral and scandalous.
_	She defended her actions on the grounds that averting interplanetary warfare was a responsibility so great as to justify courses of action that would otherwise be considered immoral or illegal.
_	In 2002 Roger Nicole, a conservative Calvinist and founding member of the Evangelical Theological Society (ETS), put forward a motion to expel Sanders and Pinnock from the Society on the grounds that their affirmation that God can change the divine mind is incompatible with doctrinal basis of the Society.
_	Continue to maintain the grounds that the building reside on.
_	A major disruption to "Banksia" nomenclature occurred in 1891, when Otto Kuntze challenged "Banksia" L.f. on the grounds that Johann Reinhold Forster and his son Georg had already penned the name "Banksia" to describe a different genus of plant, and hence "Banksia" J.R.Forst & G. Forst took precedence and rendered "Banksia" L.f. (i.e. as used by Linnaeus) invalid.
_	Other Hindus, such as Soumya Dasgupta, have opposed the celebration on the grounds that Western holidays like Halloween have "begun to adversely affect our indigenous festivals".
_	On January 22, 2018, the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania, divided along partisan lines, invalidated the state's congressional map, on the grounds that Pennsylvania's Republican-dominated legislature had engaged in partisan gerrymandering that "clearly, plainly and palpably" violated the Pennsylvania Constitution.
_	After much deliberation, the Indonesian government agreed to allow Eurico Guterres to be extradited by the International Police, on the grounds that he be tried under Indonesian law rather than international law, and that he be allowed to carry out his sentence in Indonesia.
_	Colonel Fergusson, to whom Farran was said to have confessed his guilt, refused to testify, on the grounds that he might incriminate himself.
_	Some organizations exempt women preceding the "draining" drinker from having to pay, instead assessing only the man or men to that drinker's left for the cup's cost, on the grounds that a woman should not be expected to drain the cup and therefore did not forgo a clear opportunity to do so.)
_	The establishment of an autonomous Ukrainian region in Czecho-Slovakia in October 1938 had promoted a major Soviet media campaign against its existence on the grounds that this was part of a Western plot to support separatism in the Soviet Ukraine.
_	Jurgenson's publication of Tchaikovsky's setting was promptly banned by the director of the Chapel, Nikolai Bakhmetiev, on the grounds that it had been published without his approval.
_	In 2009, because of financial constraints, TfL decided to stop work on a project to provide step-free access at Greenford and five other stations, on the grounds that these were relatively quiet stations and some were already one or two stops away from an existing step-free station.
_	He justified his silence on the grounds that no actual offer had been made: "Nobody sat down in front of me with a suitcase of money."
_	This was believed to be the first time an American corporation has been sued in a US court on the grounds that the company violated human rights in another country.
_	Except for occasional attacks upon nonunion workmen, or upon persons supposed not to be in sympathy with the miners' union, no serious disturbance in Goldfield occurred, but in December 1907, Governor Sparks, at the insistence of the mine owners, appealed to President Theodore Roosevelt to send federal troops to Goldfield, on the grounds that the situation there was ominous, that destruction of life and property seemed probable, and that the state had no militia and would be powerless to maintain order.
_	Five days earlier the Louisiana Supreme Court had granted Wilson a new trial, on the grounds that he had not received a fair trial.
_	Her low-cut dress and large breasts were justified on the grounds that as "women breastfed publicly in Molly's time, breasts were popped out all over the place."
_	The Saudi government initially declined to grant her a visa, on the grounds that Saudi Arabia does not recognize Israel, but reversed the decision after direct orders from the Foreign Minister Saud Al-Faisal following a phone call from Ban Ki-moon.
_	Aurangzeb refused Jahanara’s proposition on the grounds that Dara Shikoh was an infidel.
_	After Justice Yaqub Ali's removal, Bhutto objected to the inclusion of the new Chief Justice, Sheikh Anwar-ul-Haq, as a chief justice of the Bench on the grounds that by accepting the office of acting president during the absence of Zia-ul-Haq from the country, he had compromised his impartial status.
_	This offer was supported by the Prussian Prime Minister Otto von Bismarck, but opposed by the French Emperor Napoleon III on the grounds that the installation of a relative of the Prussian king would result in the expansion of Prussian influence and the encirclement of France.
_	He had long assumed that he could easily do so, but the War Office rejected his offer, on the grounds that he was too old.
_	The entry was refused on the grounds that he had been given authority to build five boats, not six.
_	In 1981, Gallinghouse closed the case on the grounds that the "evidence did not warrant an indictment".
_	A complaint of 1492, brought to the Star Chamber, accuses men of acting riotously by coming to a fair as Robin Hood and his men; the accused defended themselves on the grounds that the practice was a long-standing custom to raise money for churches, and they had not acted riotously but peaceably.
_	When the election results were being totaled, the Yavapai County Board of Supervisors, in a 2–1 decision, attempted to disqualify 168 votes for Stevens on the grounds that they came from two towns where residents had not paid their poll tax.
_	Leading ecological economist and steady-state theorist Herman Daly praised the Pope's encyclical on the grounds that it "... unifies the main divisions of Christianity on at least the fundamental recognition that we have a shamefully neglected duty to care for the Earth out of which we evolved, and to share the Earth's life support more equitably with each other, with the future, and with other creatures."
_	After the competition, Desmarets petitioned the king to allow him to leave France for study with Italian composers, but Lully objected on the grounds that it would diminish his command of the French style.
_	The Charity Commission removed the trust's registration on 9 December 2010 on the grounds that it had "ceased to exist".
_	In July 2005, 49,500 private shareholders of Britain's national railway infrastructure company Railtrack sued the Secretary of State for Transport for damages, alleging that in October 2001 the then holder of that office, Stephen Byers MP, had acted unlawfully in planning to put their company into administration on the grounds that it was insolvent.
_	After the German invasion of the Soviet Union in 1941 she applied to join the Red Army several times, but each time was refused on the grounds that she was a member of the Leninsky District Executive Committee.
_	In the Historia Augusta, the eunuch body is described as a "tertium genus hominum" (a third human gender), and in 77 BC, a eunuch named Genucius was prevented from claiming goods left to him in a will, on the grounds that he had voluntarily mutilated himself ("amputatis sui ipsius") and was neither a woman or a man ("neque virorum neque mulierum numero").
_	Around the 12th century, some scholars began to doubt the historical existence of Sunzi, primarily on the grounds that he is not mentioned in the historical classic "The Commentary of Zuo" ("Zuo zhuan" 左傳), which mentions most of the notable figures from the Spring and Autumn period.
_	Rolán & Rubio (2002: 46) hold "Discopsis" as a valid genus, distinct from "Cochliolepis" , on the grounds that the latter belongs in the family Vitrinellidae and the former in Tornidae.
_	O'Malley asked the National Catholic Bioethical Center to review the contractual relationship, which theologians in a survey conducted by the "Boston Globe" in March had unanimously supported on the grounds that Catholic hospitals would not participate directly in providing abortion and the arrangement would allow Caritas to deliver much-needed services to the poor.
_	The charges were dismissed on the grounds that, unlike what she had stated, there were no signs of sexual abuse.
_	Provisions against virtual child pornography in the Child Pornography Prevention Act of 1996 were ruled unconstitutional by the U.S. Supreme Court in 2002 on the grounds that the restrictions on speech were not justified by a compelling government interest (such as protecting real children).
_	In August 2006, the lawsuit was dismissed on the grounds that gambling was not a vested right.
_	He opposed the partition of India on the grounds that it would jeopardise the interests of the minority communities.
_	His election was initially approved by the Independent High Electoral Commission on the grounds that they had "serious crime cases" pending against him.
_	According to Ostrovsky, then Mossad head Nahum Admoni decided against giving the specific details to the Americans on the grounds that the Mossad's responsibility was to protect Israel's interests, not Americans.
_	She suffered her first setback when the RBI rejected her application, in 1996, on the grounds that some of the promoting members were non-literate.
_	They also offered the Radcliffe Ph.D. to three other female psychologists who had completed their doctoral studies at Harvard, including Mary Whiton Calkins, who refused on the grounds that she had never been enrolled at Radcliffe and opted to hold out for a Harvard degree that was never conferred (and has not been, to this day, despite continued protests).
_	On 1 January 1559 the anonymous "Beggars' Summons" was posted on the doors of friaries, threatening friars with eviction on the grounds that their property belonged to the genuine poor.
_	Finally, anti-Moroccan nationalists within the PPM opposed the war on the grounds that it afforded Morocco opportunities to expand its influence.
_	Chen Shui-bian, the president of the Republic of China (known informally as "Taiwan" and to APEC as the "member economy" of "Chinese Taipei"), was expressly forbidden from attendance by the Chinese Foreign Ministry; his replacement—former vice-president Li Yuan-zu—was also refused entry on the grounds that he was also a political rather than an economic representative.
_	But in spite of these developments, their petition was again denied on the grounds that their total taxpayers reached only 400.
_	The continued chaining was justified on the grounds that they would have run off jeopardising the expedition.
_	The film was rejected for distribution and screening in Kenya by the Kenya Film Classification Board, on the grounds that the film "promotes homosexuality, which is contrary to national norms and values" of Kenya.
_	Brand consonance solidifies corporate identity and encourages brand acceptance, on the grounds that when a consumer is exposed to a consistent message multiple times across the entirety of a brand, the message is easier to trust and the existence of the brand is easier to accept (Hoyer, MacInnis & Pieters, 2012).
_	The judge found in Colin & Shields’ favour on the grounds that the plaintiff must have realised the defendants’ error, which, as it concerned a term of the contract, rendered the contract void.
_	There was opposition to the siting of a statue of Mary Seacole at St Thomas' Hospital on the grounds that she had no connection with this institution, whereas Florence Nightingale did.
_	This original animation was rejected by the BBC on the grounds that it was far too offensive to be broadcast on TV.
_	The cathedral lost hundreds of its statues (later replaced by copies in the 19th century) and in April 1794, there was talk of tearing its spire down, on the grounds that it was against the principle of equality.
_	In August 2010, controversy arose when Gillespie outlawed the wearing of berets on the grounds that they led to an increased risk of skin cancer.
_	He initially attempted to have the article removed by complaining to Spain's data protection agency—"Agencia Española de Protección de Datos"—which rejected the claim on the grounds that it was lawful and accurate, but accepted a complaint against Google and asked Google to remove the results.
_	The CWA opposes emergency contraception, such as Plan B, on the grounds that it "blurs the line" between contraception and abortion.
_	The Klan were eventually dropped from the scheme on April 4, 2001, on the grounds that for the duration of their sponsorship, they had not once cleaned the freeway.
_	Even though the delegation was not received in London (on the grounds that it represented only the interests of a small group of urbanised Africans), its actions aroused considerable support among the African elite at home.
_	The British government disagreed on the grounds that it was honouring its own citizens who only happened to be Canadians as well.
_	Rangers appealed the loss, however, on the grounds that Van Raavens should not have ordered the shootout, since the Rangers goal in extra time in Lisbon gave them a lead of three away goals to two.
_	However, she is ultimately released on the grounds that she wasn't mentally well at the time of the assassination and is sent back to District 12.
_	The historian Eberhard Jäckel, in an essay first published in the "Die Zeit" newspaper on September 12, 1986, argued that Nolte's theory was ahistorical on the grounds that Hitler held the Soviet Union in contempt and could not have felt threatened as Nolte claimed.
_	Although the Supreme Court reaffirmed "United Public Workers v. Mitchell" in "United States Civil Service Commission v. National Association of Letter Carriers," it abandoned its reliance on the doctrine of privilege and did so narrowly on the grounds that permitting public employees to engage in political activity was dangerous to democracy.
_	In March 1948, the Chief of Staff of the Air Force, General Carl Spaatz, proposed that the Air Force take over the AFSWP, on the grounds that the Key West Agreement had given it responsibility for strategic bombing.
_	He later justified this action on the grounds that he had wanted to protect Arnold from blame had the attack been a failure.
_	Kass supports a universal ban on the cloning of humans on the grounds that cloning is an affront to morality and human dignity.
_	In other countries, the authority responsible for the highway tends to subsidise these costs on the grounds that these areas are partly a public service to drivers.
_	The 39th Amendment to the Constitution of India placed MISA in the 9th Schedule to the Constitution, thereby making it totally immune from any judicial review; even on the grounds that it contravened the Fundamental Rights which are guaranteed by the Constitution, or violated the Basic Structure.
_	Again the IFA rejected it on the grounds that it would interfere with the NIWFA's fixtures.
_	Hipparchus then invited Harmodius' sister to participate in the Panathenaic Festival as kanephoros only to publicly disqualify her on the grounds that she was not a virgin.
_	This arrangement gave Treloar less influence with the Army than he had enjoyed as head of the AWRS during World War I. General Thomas Blamey, the commander of the AIF, subsequently redesignated the War Records Section the Military History and Information Section (MHIS) on the grounds that its original name had not adequately described the unit's role.
_	After this competition was over, one-third of the students who had "won" were approached by the researcher, who asked them to return the money on the grounds that he had used his own funds to pay the winners and was running short; another third were asked by a secretary to return the money because it was from the psychology department and funds were low; another third were not approached.
_	Tryon directed that the junior midshipman should accept the prize for the winners, on the grounds that he would most likely live longest to remember the event.
_	Based on the somewhat limited information available at the time, the authors eliminated WWJ on the grounds that "the evidence of a direct relationship between the licensee of 8MK and the licensee of WBL is "very" tenuous", and because supporting WWJ as the oldest U.S. station could only be done through "tortured reasoning."
_	He planned, and widely publicized, the issue of a writ on the Queensland Government on the grounds that it had colluded with business to promote drilling.
_	Kahn to spare his soul at the outset of Kahn's invasion of Earth on the grounds that Kano can teach his armies how to use modern Earthrealm weaponry.
_	The NCAA attempted to have the case dismissed on the grounds that it did not receive federal assistance.
_	The Command sought to have this directive modified on the grounds that dispatching so many aircraft from a single airfield would mean that the force would need to be separated into several waves.
_	In Atkins v. Virginia, the U.S. Supreme Court decision banning the execution of mentally retarded persons, was decided on the grounds that "diminished capacities to understand and process mistakes and learn from experience, to engage in logical reasoning, to control impulses, and to understand the reactions of others" was cited as the evidence supporting a reduced view of criminal culpability.
_	When Lord Cornbury became governor, he placed the church and the parsonage at the disposal of the congregation of the Church of England on the grounds that the building had been paid for by public taxation.
_	The Hawaii District Court heard the government's motion to dismiss on , and on 26 September the Court issued an order granting the motion to dismiss on the grounds that it had no jurisdiction over the LHC project.
_	The case was duly removed by said defendants into the circuit court of the United States upon the grounds that there was a separable controversy between them and the plaintiff, and that the suit involved a question under the bankrupt law of the United States as to the effect of the husband's discharge in bankruptcy upon the plaintiff's claim and mortgage.
_	He stayed in the race until election day in the 1909 election (while he was still an alderman in Edmonton), running in the same riding and under the same banner after refusing to contest the Liberal nomination on the grounds that he considered it rigged in favour of Lucien Boudreau.
_	One day, he was summoned to the Bogd Khan, given fresh clothes, and after a while he was even made to marry a woman who worked as one of the Bogd Khan's seamstresses, on the grounds that according to a horoscope by the Bogd Khan, their fates were connected.
_	Phelps was first elected to the Yukon Territorial Council in 1974, but his election was overturned in 1975 after Don Branigan filed for a court injunction on the grounds that as the government was renting space in Phelps' commercial real estate holdings for some of its liquor stores, his serving on the council placed him in a conflict of interest.
_	English women's football matches began in 1895 but following the first international match in 1920, women were banned from all affiliated FA grounds from 1921-71 on the grounds that, "the game of football is quite unsuitable for females and ought not to be encouraged."
_	On 16 January 2009 IGPDecaux, the company holding licenses for ads on public transport in Genoa, refused to give authorization to the atheist bus campaign on the grounds that it may "offend the moral, civic and religious convictions of the public".
_	In "Nichols", the Ninth Circuit Court denied protection to the plaintiff’s characters on the grounds that they were not “distinctly delineated”, but poorly developed.
_	Michael Martin notes that the authenticity of this passage of the Annals has also been disputed on the grounds that Tacitus would not have used the word “messiah” in an authentic Roman document.
_	FSMK is opposed to the UIDAI project on the grounds that it uses proprietary software and is run by a company that does not conform to privacy laws of the land.
_	The Chicago grain warehouse firm of Munn and Scott was found guilty of violating the law but appealed the conviction on the grounds that the law was an unconstitutional deprivation of property without due process of law that violated the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	Although both logically unassailable and consistent with a literal reading of scripture, Omphalos was rejected at the time by scientists on the grounds that it was completely unfalsifiable and by theologians because it implied to them a deceitful God, which they found theologically unacceptable.
_	On August 1, 1985, New York harbor officials confiscated the comic publication on the grounds that it was pornographic, but a court later overturned that decision.
_	He claimed finally that the sweeping nature of the ban was disproportionate and could not be justified on the grounds that it may have shocked or confused some parts of society ("Bączkowski v Poland").
_	China Inland Mission, naively, brushed off charges of imperialism on the grounds that churches they had founded were relatively independent.
_	Almost immediately these predictions were challenged on the grounds that they are empirically not true.
_	Major Canadian unions expressed their opposition to the legislation on the grounds that it would undermine the worker security of defined-benefit plans, contrary to the government's election commitments to strengthen retirement security.
_	On March 12, 2013, Al-Turki's request to be sent to his home country to serve out his sentence was denied by the Colorado Department of Corrections on the grounds that state law requires sex offenders to undergo treatment while in prison and that al-Turki had declined to participate.
_	In August 2002, while Krekar was in Iraq, the Norwegian government revoked his refugee status on the grounds that he had traveled back to his homeland and spent long periods there.
_	However, when approaching the project of producing her very first album, she was nervous about the possibility of her record label, A&M, refusing to release the album (A&M had initially refused to release her eighth studio album "The Key" on the grounds that it was not commercial enough, and had asked Armatrading to write some additional, more commercial material).
_	The Canadian Board of Censors barred the film from the province of Quebec on the grounds that the story of David Leone, the foundling son of Pope Pius XI would prove offensive to the majority Roman Catholics.
_	Aflaq, the leader of the Ba'athist movement, organised the expulsion of leading Iraqi Ba'athist members, such as Fuad al-Rikabi, on the grounds that the party should not have initiated the attempt on Qasim's life.
_	The case was dismissed on the grounds that the statements were not defamatory and that the claim was filed more than six weeks after the broadcast.
_	Hill hence filed suit against Hathaway on the grounds that the sheriff was negligent in maintaining order at the facility.
_	The success of the single lead to the band signing to Sony Music, on the grounds that the band would be allowed to release their music through their own label, Furtive, in order to retain a higher degree of creative control whilst concurrently enjoying the benefits of Sony's major label distribution and advertising clout.
_	Black's appeal hearing had been expected to last three days, but at the end of the first day, Lord Taylor refused leave to appeal the conviction on the grounds that Black's trial had been fair, and that none of his contentions could be substantiated.
_	Monsanto stated that he was infringing their patents because the soybeans he bought from the elevator were new products that he purchased for use as seeds without a license from Monsanto; Bowman stated that he had not infringed due to patent exhaustion on the first sale of seed to whatever farmers had produced the crops that he bought from the elevator, on the grounds that for seed, all future generations are embodied in the first generation that was originally sold.
_	In November 2013, President Mohamud asked Prime Minister Shirdon to resign from office on the grounds that Shirdon was allegedly ineffective in the job.
_	NGOs have also been challenged on the grounds that they do not necessarily represent the needs of the developing world, through diminishing the so-called “Southern Voice”.
_	In 2004 an attempt was initiated to shut down the organization by Attorney General of Ankara on the grounds that its statute contained the statement "...the defence [of the right] of individuals to receive education in their mother tongue", which was claimed to be against the Article 42 of the Constitution of Turkey which says that "No other language than Turkish may be taught in educational and teaching facilities to Turkish citizens as their mother tongue".
_	In 1997, the shooter was acquitted on the grounds that he was following orders and had no intent to kill.
_	This was later justified on the grounds that rescued servicemen would have been rapidly landed at their military destination and promptly returned to active service, as well as being retaliation for the Japanese fighter planes attacking survivors of the downed B-17 bomber.
_	It competed with spontaneous generation and epigenesis, but those two theories were often rejected on the grounds that inert matter could not produce life without God's intervention.
_	This conviction was overturned in 1989 on the grounds that U.S. District Judge David Vreeland Kenyon erred in admitting polygraph evidence during the trial.
_	However, following the match, Preston formally protested the result, on the grounds that umpire Jim McMaster had paid a free kick to Dandenong full-forward Jim Miller, from which a goal was scored, before the opening bounce was executed and therefore before the game had officially begun – which Preston contended made the free kick invalid and the resultant goal void.
_	Protests of censorship from the local arts community drew nationwide sympathy and support, but the Postal Service defended its decision on the grounds that it is not an art gallery, and ended the program.
_	The possibility that stellar evolution of either Sirius A or Sirius B could be responsible for this discrepancy has been rejected by astronomers on the grounds that the timescale of thousands of years is too short and that there is no sign of the nebulosity in the system that would be expected had such a change taken place.
_	It has also emerged that he was offered cabinet office (Education Minister) in 1951 by Prime Minister Winston Churchill in exchange for supporting the new Conservative government but refused on the grounds that it would have destroyed the Liberal Party.
_	Fugard attempted to have "The Road to Mecca" produced in New York in 1985 but Actors Equity refused to grant Bryceland permission to perform on Broadway on the grounds that she was not an "international star" and therefore not entitled to preference over an American actress.
_	His Ph.D. thesis, submitted to "Psychological Monographs", was rejected before a review on the grounds that the nature–nurture issue it addressed had already been settled in favor of nurture.
_	To his surprise, they took the case and reversed the conviction on the grounds that the government failed to prove "the pertinence of the questions".
_	This consent expired, and application to renew it in 2004 was refused on the grounds that there was no provision for affordable housing.
_	Kunstler refused to defend right-wing groups such as the Minutemen, on the grounds that: "I only defend those whose goals I share.
_	The king agreed to the terms on the grounds that proof be brought forth on Grumbkow's guilt, and upon his son's appointment as governor of Hanover.
_	Currently, HSH Princess Sophie von Hohenberg, a descendant of Franz Ferdinand, is claiming for the restitution of the castle to her family (which was never recognized as part of the House of Habsburg), on the grounds that the provisions of Article 208 of the Treaty of Saint Germain, and Article 3 of Law no. 354 of 1921 in Czechoslovakia, do not apply to them.
_	On 23 February 1983, the Government passed a law nationalising Rumasa, a private business that included merchant banking interests, on the grounds that it was at the point of bankruptcy and the government needed to protect the savings of depositors and the jobs of its 60,000 employees, a decision that aroused considerable criticism and a judicial conflict over the law that was only resolved, in favour of the government, in December 1986.
_	While she never married López, her marriage to Quatrefages was annulled on the grounds that it did not fulfill the legal obligations for it to be considered a lawful marriage (he had not received permission to marry from his commanding officer, and they had no children together).
_	Lee made his general conference address announcing the home teaching program, Henry D. Moyle objected to the change during a first presidency meeting on the grounds that the correlation committee was overstepping its bounds and taking responsibility away from the presiding bishop who supervised the ward teaching program.
_	The time limits were lowered from 28 to 24 weeks for most cases on the grounds that medical technology had advanced sufficiently to justify the change.
_	Some traditions withhold the rite of Holy Communion from those not yet at the age of accountability, on the grounds that children do not understand what the sacrament means.
_	By 66 BCE the Reformists had many of the lavish spectacles, games, and entertainments installed by Emperor Wu to impress foreign dignitaries cancelled on the grounds that they were excessive and ostentatious.
_	A subsequent attempt to re-register the NOTA party in 2014 was blocked by the Electoral Commission on the grounds that the acronym 'NOTA' is as good as the phrase 'None of the Above', the logic being that it would confuse voters into thinking it is possible to cast a formal vote for 'None of the Above' when they would in fact just be voting for another party, albeit one standing on a single issue NOTA platform.
_	As well as citing Australia's SEATO obligations to South Vietnam, Holt justified the war on the grounds that Australia was morally obligated to "resist communist subversion and aggression" and "defend the right of every people to choose their own social and economic order".
_	This produced vocal opposition from bodies such as the Keep Sunday Special campaign, and the Lord's Day Observance Society: on religious grounds, on the grounds that it would increase consumerism, and that it would reduce shop assistants' weekend leisure time.
_	E-surveys were challenged at Congress on the grounds that they ‘encourage people to vote without hearing the debates first’.
_	Contrast "Heaven v. Pender", 11 Q.B.D. 503., an English case of the next year, in which the court also permitted recovery to a worker injured as the result of defective scaffolding used in the painting of a ship but based its decision not on the inherently dangerous product rule but on the grounds that the dock owner had invited the worker onto the property.
_	On March 12, 2010, the newspaper "Süddeutsche Zeitung" broke the story, and three days later Hullermann was suspended from his post in Bad Tölz on the grounds that he had ignored the order not to work with young people.
_	Yates has also been associated with Warwickshire on the grounds that he dedicates his work to one Henry Reynolds, who is assumed to be identical with Henry Reynolds, and that Drayton, who was a Warwickshire man, also dedicated his epistle "Of Poets and Poesie" to Reynolds.
_	In May 1954 he moved the rejection of the Town and Country Planning (Scotland) Bill on the grounds that it burdened the community with the cost of compensating landowners for the loss of land value.
_	Lim Huan Boon from Barisan Sosialis (BS), who started the trigger of the BS boycott of Parliament because they claimed that Singapore's independence was "phony" on the grounds that the separation matter was not discussed in the legislature and announced that all of its MPs would resign their seats and take their struggle for democracy onto the streets.
_	In August, he denied Weissman and Rosen's motion to dismiss their indictment on the grounds that the government could still prosecute and punish those who retransmitted classified information orally regardless of whether they had a security clearance or not, an interpretation of the Espionage Act that could have wide-reaching implications if it were allowed to become legal precedent.
_	In the UK, the advert was banned on the grounds that it was “political”.
_	A public defender was assigned to his case, and rather half-heartedly entered an "extenuating circumstances" plea, on the grounds that the accused was clearly a fantasist, as his poems demonstrated, meaning that there was no question of "guilt" as strictly defined.
_	In September 2015, the Fourth Circuit court remanded the terrorism case on the grounds that "the FBI withheld evidence of its 2002 investigation into the first American on the CIA's kill or capture list, Anwar al-Awlaki".
_	Furthermore, only a few acts should be prohibited, namely cartels that fix prices and divide markets, mergers that create monopolies, and dominant firms pricing predatorily, while allowing such practices as vertical agreements and price discrimination on the grounds that it did not harm consumers.
_	She is frequently critical of him, on the grounds that his clothing shows him to be no gentleman.
_	Vico, in contrast to the positivist movement, asserted the superiority of the science of the human mind (the humanities, in other words), on the grounds that natural sciences tell us nothing about the inward aspects of things.
_	This model has faced criticism on the grounds that it has failed to sufficiently promote social integration, although some commentators have questioned the dichotomy between diversity and integration that this critique presumes.
_	For a sizable length of its existence, the union was associated with the National Union of Students (NUS), however in May 2002 the union chose to disaffiliate itself from the NUS on the grounds that the organisation was becoming too bureaucratic.
_	The Oregon Supreme Court overturned that decision and awarded the office to Johnson, on the grounds that neither violation was deliberate and that both had occurred after the election.
_	Jonathan Dancy rejects this interpretation on the grounds that Mill is explicitly making intention relevant to an assessment of the act not to an assessment of the agent.
_	However, Voline's allegations against Makhno in regards to sexual violations of women has been disputed by some on the grounds that the allegations are unsubstantiated, do not stand up to eyewitness accounts of the punishment meted out to rapists by the Makhnovists, and were originally made by Voline in his book "The Unknown Revolution" which was first published in 1947, long after Makhno's death and following a bitter falling-out between Makhno and Voline.
_	If Bell's inequalities are violated, either local realism "or" counterfactual definiteness must be incorrect; but some physicists dispute that experiments have demonstrated Bell's violations, on the grounds that the sub-class of inhomogeneous
_	Among them are "Love Camp 7" (rejected in 2002) and "Women in Cellblock 9" (rejected in 2004), on the grounds that they contain substantial scenes of sexual violence and in the case of the latter an actress who at 16 was under age at the time of production rendering it child pornography under U.K. law.
_	Edwards objected on the grounds that any increase in Measure 50's cuts would require too great a curtailment of government services, especially in educati
_	In 1971 Durant supported Thatcher's decision to end free school milk on the grounds that many children did not like it.
_	The claim was made on the grounds that the school had interfered with her right to manifest her religion (Article 9 of the European Convention on Human Rights) and her right to education (Article 2(1) of the first protocol).
_	Later, in a controversial article for the "Guardian" newspaper, entitled "Black Shirts in Green Trousers", George Monbiot (a cofounder of the left-wing political party Respect) accused Goldsmith of having "advocated the enforced separation of Tutsis and Hutus in Rwanda and Protestants and Catholics in Ulster, on the grounds that they constitute 'distinct ethnic groups' and are thus culturally incapable of co-habitation" (a point rejected by Goldsmith).
_	An appeal in 2000 failed, and in 2002 the charge was overturned in the High Court of Australia on the grounds that the trial judge had potentially misdirected the trial.
_	Senior judges rigorously opposed the concept on the grounds that constitutional and judicial review should remain the prerogative of the Supreme Court and that a constitutional court would create a fourth branch of government more powerful than the judiciary, legislature, or executive.
_	After winning the world championship, Fischer criticized the existing championship match format (24 games; the champion retained the title if the match was tied) on the grounds that it encouraged whoever got an early lead to play for draws.
_	Thanks to a strong defence by his cousin, Thomas, Lord Erskine, he was acquitted on the grounds that he had no treasonable intent.
_	Hu to resign on the grounds that he had been too lenient with student protesters and for moving too quickly towards free market-style economic reforms.
_	The following day, Brum resigned on the grounds that her friend disagreed with her new obligations; she voluntarily gave up her title after 18 hours because she "wanted to be with Benno instead of flying through the world under a strict contract for a year."
_	In May 2012, Attorney General Nicola Roxon informed Unkles that the Australian Government would not seek a pardon for Morant from the British Government, on the grounds that Morant, Handcock and Witton did, in fact, kill unarmed Boer prisoners and others.
_	Irish Catholic unionists petitioned against the Government of Ireland Bill 1893 on the grounds that it would create a "revolutionary spirit disastrous to the true interests" of Catholicism.
_	It was a snap election, prompted by the dissolution of the Regional Council by the Regional Administrative Tribunal on the grounds that one of the lists supporting Roberto Cota (Northern League) in the 2010 regional election (which saw Cota narrowly defeating Mercedes Bresso, the incumbent Democratic President) had committed irregularities in filing the slates for the election.
_	Gage rejected Bradstreet's treaty on the grounds that the Colonel had exceeded his authority in making it.
_	Forcieri was summoned to appear before Judge Ariel Lijo in June 2014 to answer questions about these matters, but he requested an extension on the grounds that he was doing “strategic” work at the World Bank in Washington.
_	The military claimed in their Press bulletin: "For some time the people of the Río Negro village have become troubled by the influence of subversive elements, which have benefited from the problems of land, raised on the grounds that their land will be affected by the flooding of the Chixoy dam.
_	Although the Count subsequently relented and declared Clermont restored in his rights as first-born son, when Clermont succeeded as Count of Paris in 1999, he reinstated François as the next heir on the grounds that his father's act had been" ultra vires".
_	Many early feminists fought to repeal these laws, either on the grounds that prostitution should be illegal and therefore not government regulated or because it forced degrading medical examinations upon women.
_	Patents are justified on the grounds that inventors must be protected so they have incentive to invent.
_	The judge justified the scale of the penalty - it was the best possible under an accelerated procedure - on the grounds that political beliefs should not be demonstrated with violence, and that the fact the injured was the Chancellor, had not influenced his judgment.
_	On 2 February 2018, the Australian Electoral Commission issued a notice that it was considering deregistering the party on the grounds that it had ceased to have at least 500 members.
_	New York's two senators, Chuck Schumer and Kirsten Gillibrand, also wrote Baum to oppose the move on the grounds that a Hamilton-based team would do severe economic harm to the Sabres.
_	It was debated the same day and opposed by council member Sir Romesh Chunder Mitter (from Bengal) on the grounds that it interfered with orthodox Hindu code, but supported by council member Rao Bahadur Krishnaji Lakshman Nulkar (from Bombay) and by the President of the council, the Governor-General and Viceroy Lord Lansdowne.
_	She sued the government on the grounds that her constitutional rights were violated.
_	However, Dion undid this act on the grounds that his own consent was needed and then came forward himself to propose Heraclides for the role of admiral.
_	Lord Dreghorn was established as Clan Chief of Clan Labhran by the Lyon court on the grounds that he was a descendant of the MacLarens of Tiree.
_	Also in an essay published in the December 1, 1986 edition of "The New Republic", the American historian Charles S. Maier rejected Nolte's claim of moral equivalence between the actions of the Soviet Communists and German Nazis under the grounds that while the former were extremely brutal, the latter sought the total extermination of a people, namely the Jews.
_	Mallows solved a $10,000 mathematical problem posed by John Horton Conway, but declined the prize money on the grounds that the problem was too easy.
_	In his role as Secretary of State for Constitutional Affairs, Falconer sought to make it easier for government bodies to refuse to release documents under the Freedom of Information Act (2000), on the grounds that they are too expensive and too time-consuming for civil servants to find.
_	Avro vocally objected on the grounds that neither of these were even in testing at that point, whereas both the MX-1179 and Falcon were almost ready for production and would have been nearly as effective for "a very large saving in cost".
_	Initially, Tufa Lilugu's brother Tufa Juyan (禿髮俱延) suspected Qifu Gangui's sincerity and requested that Qifu Gangui be exiled to west of the Qinghai Lake—a suggestion that Tufa Lilugu rejected on the grounds that if he did so, no one else would surrender to him.
_	Chileans call the waterway around the islet "Beagle Channel", but in Argentina they called it "Moat channel" on the grounds that the Beagle Channel, allegedly, went south around Navarino Island.
_	Immediately after the funeral, Logan seized Martin Chartier's 250-acre estate on the grounds that Martin owed him a debt of 108 pounds, 19 shillings and 3 and 3/4 pence.
_	On July 31 he called a meeting of the People's Pulpit Association, a Watch Tower Society subsidiary incorporated in New York, to expel Hirsh and Hoskins as directors on the grounds that they were opposing the work of the Association.
_	In 1996, Wingrove challenged the British Board of Film Classification, which has refused to grant a distribution certificate for his short film "Visions of Ecstasy" on the grounds that it was blasphemous, at the European Court of Human Rights in Strasbourg.
_	Another question focused on the alleged inflexibility of the military's punishment scheme, as the government had apparently rejected Martinez's 2006 plea on the grounds that Martinez would have been eligible for parole within 10 years if sentenced to life, even after pleading guilty to 2nd-degree murder in the slaying of the two officers.
_	Rock Nominee's filed for a petition of unfair prejudice on the grounds that this was a transaction at an undervalue.
_	This was requested on the grounds that "even though the story might be worth nothing, my name was worth something".
_	On appeal, the Florida Supreme Court remanded the case and reversed the decision, on the grounds that there was "considerable doubt that Delbert Tibbs is the man who committed the crimes."
_	He sought a speedy restoration of the states, on the grounds that they had never truly left the Union, and thus should again be recognized once loyal citizens formed a government.
_	This perspective has also been criticized on the grounds that it is "ad hoc": that Gardner is not expanding the definition of the word "intelligence", but rather denies the existence of intelligence as traditionally understood, and instead uses the word "intelligence" where other people have traditionally used words like "ability" and "aptitude".
_	An alternative approach is to argue that the dependence on particle number cannot be trusted on the grounds that changing formula_19 also changes the dimensionality of phase space.
_	France's Gaullists rejected it on the grounds that it threatened national sovereignty, and when the French National Assembly refused to ratify it (August 1954), the treaty died.
_	This has engendered some opposition on the grounds that the collection rightfully belongs to Iraqi Jews, almost none of whom currently reside in Iraq.
_	In 1966 Reading and Walker attacked the mudflow interpretation on the grounds that evidence for contemporary deformation, an expected feature of mudflow deposits, is lacking.
_	The then British Chief of the Imperial General Staff (CIGS), Sir William Slim, himself a field marshal (and later Governor-General of Australia), resisted Menzies' recommendation for Blamey's promotion, on the grounds that Dominion generals could not be made field marshals.
_	Krajišnik was acquitted of genocide or complicity in genocide on the grounds that the court had found no evidence of a genocidal intent on his part to destroy in full or part ethnic or religious communities.
_	Subsequent to the passage of the Act, the City of Philadelphia, whose municipal waste was delivered in part to landfills and other waste-processing facilities in New Jersey, filed suit against the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection in the Chancery Division of the New Jersey Superior Court, seeking an injunction against enforcement of the Waste Control Act on the grounds that it was unconstitutional.
_	The statues were destroyed by the Taliban in March 2001, on the grounds that they were an affront to Islam, even though they were left intact by Muslim rulers for 1200 years.
_	At the same time, opposition to his plan for a match with Alekhine re-surfaced, on the grounds that Alekhine was a political enemy and the only proper course was to demand that he be stripped of the title.
_	On November 11, 2011, Wayne County Circuit Court Judge Robert Ziolkowski vacated the "breach of peace" ruling against Terry Jones and Wayne Sapp on the grounds that they were denied due process.
_	In 1976, the Supreme Court considered the monumental case (Williams v. Florida) in which Williams attempted to have his conviction overturned on the grounds that the jury consisted of only six individuals.
_	In 1943, Massigli opposed the visit of the Prime Minister of Iraq, Nuri as-Said, to Algeria after a summit with the Prime Minister of Egypt, Mustafa el-Nahhas, on the grounds that such visit would encourage Arab nationalist sentiment in French North Africa, would give the impression that France was aligning itself with one fraction, centred around as-Said Pasha, and might weaken the electoral chances of pro-French Lebanese nationalists in the upcoming Lebanese elections.
_	An opposition can be based on the grounds that the subject-matter of the patent is not patentable (Article 100(a) EPC, for instance because the claimed invention is not new or not inventive), on the ground that the invention is insufficiently disclosed to allow a person skilled in the art to carry it out (Article 100(b) EPC), or on the ground that the content of the patent extends beyond the content of the application as filed –"or, if the patent was granted on a divisional application or on a new application filed under , beyond the content of the earlier application as filed"– (Article 100(c) EPC).
_	An opposition can for instance not be validly based on the grounds that the invention lacks unity () or that the right to the European patent does not belong to the proprietor of the patent ().
_	He refused their offers on the grounds that, as a Muslim, he was duty-bound to resist them, as "infidel invaders" just as he had the Soviets in earlier decades.
_	By 1984, the School was under threat of closure from the National Advisory Board (NAB) on the grounds that its Fine Art degree course "was academically and geographically isolated".
_	Although most notable in the episode "Shindig"—when he criticized her desire to purchase an elaborate dress on the grounds that she would have no opportunity to wear it in her job—this recurs throughout the series.
_	In 1902 he applied for a secondment to the West African Frontier Force but was turned down on the grounds that he was too young: he re-applied the following year and was accepted on 14 November 1903.
_	Reporting on the discussion at the 2004 conference, he writes that, "We cannot support, nor extend our solidarity to, them on the grounds that their strategy excludes many Iraqi citizens—above all, women—and do great harm on the civilians, and will bring the Iraqi future society under an Islamic dictatorship."
_	Unfortunately for his wife, Sir Reginald was "too attached to his lift and refused to budge"; he obtained a divorce on the grounds that his wife "harassed him" with telegrams urging him to return to England.
_	He attempted to get into the Garden College in Rawalpindi but he was refused admission on the grounds that his former University in Jammu and Kashmir was not recognized there.
_	"Audrey Rose" was banned in 1977 on the grounds that its treatment of reincarnation amounted to "heresy".
_	On 29 March 2014, the Black Sea Fleet was reported to have refused to add the submarine to its ranks on the grounds that it was obsolete and suffered from a number of technical issues.
_	Former British Conservative MP Louise Mensch has objected to SlutWalk "on the grounds that it 'lionises promiscuity', which she says is harmful."
_	Having regained his memory, the Doctor confronts the Valeyard (now calling himself "the Ripper" on the grounds that the name is more evocative) in a church where the Ripper has left his TARDIS- now reprogrammed into the appearance of the Doctor's tomb-, causing his foe to lose control of the Dark Matrix, provoking it by revealing that the Dark Matrix is just as trapped under the Valeyard's control as it was on Gallifrey.
_	The SSS arrested and interrogated Galadima on the grounds that his statement was a call for violent change.
_	General Sir John Du Cane, a member of the RAWCF committee, encouraged his fellow members to consider Jagger on the grounds that the memorial would be the work which established Jagger's reputation and thus the sculptor would produce his best work.
_	The Land Commission rejected the claim on the grounds that the boundaries were vague, but the United States district court confirmed the grant.
_	Her first novel was published by Dell Books in 1979; Gerrold wrote an "overture" to that novel, on the grounds that he'd rather be making overtures than introductions to Duane.
_	This public sector investment in a private company was criticised by the National Audit Office on the grounds that it had not been put out to tender.
_	Kilpatrick appealed to the commission to reconsider its decision on the grounds that Johnson was not a resident of Detroit.
_	On October 22, 2008, StudiVZ, Holtzbrinck Networks GmbH and Holtzbrinck Ventures GmbH filed motions to dismiss based on a lack of personal jurisdiction and on the grounds that Germany was a more convenient forum.
_	However, the complaint was rejected on the grounds that the boy's parents were already aware about the programme's format and had willingly given their consent for the boy to participate.
_	The trade union and ANC political ally COSATU criticised the move by South African financial institutions to refuse to do business with Oakbay on the grounds that it was "political posturing" and put the jobs of thousands of South African employees of the firm at risk.
_	However, in 2011, he recused himself from this position during a hearing on illegal mining, on the grounds that he had previously appeared for one or more of the parties.
_	The NLRB ruled against the company and ordered the workers be rehired and given back pay, but Jones & Laughlin refused to comply on the grounds that they believed the act was unconstitutional.
_	Stewart filed for divorce from Williams on March 22, 2013, on the grounds that the marriage was irretrievably broken.
_	On the grounds that political dissenters in the Soviet Union were psychotic and deluded, they were locked away in psychiatric hospitals and treated with neuroleptics.
_	A staunch anti-Communist, he came to embrace the fascist National Socialist doctrines of Nazi Germany on the grounds that they were the only alternative to Bolshevism.
_	However, Grate and most of the crew mutinied at Valparaiso in August 1853, on the grounds that they believed the vessel was too small and unsuitable for the mission.
_	Apple Inc., a member of the MPEG LA, has also opposed the inclusion of Ogg formats in the HTML standard on the grounds that H.264 performs better and is already more widely supported, citing patents on their codec's efficiency and the lack of precedents of "Placing requirements on format support", even at the "SHOULD" level, in HTML specifications.
_	Donald Trump's nomination of Betsy DeVos to be Secretary of Education on the grounds that she and her husband had donated to the Foundation for Individual Rights in Education (FIRE), which seeks to "defend individual rights on college campuses".
_	The newspaper was finally banned on 31 October 1964 (on the grounds that the Moroccan Communist Party itself was non-existent).
_	He announced plans to close 10 full-service MUC police stations in 1992, a decision he defended on the grounds that it would allow the force to operate more road patrols and set up more "points of service" for residents to contact the police.
_	He later declined their request for an inquiry, on the grounds that Ellis still held the right of appeal to the Privy Council and an inquiry therefore could not achieve finality.
_	The Dominions Office rejected the claim on the grounds that the Union of South Africa would respond with its own claim for the southern half of the territory.
_	All four were sitting members of the Montreal city council who had previously left the governing Montreal Citizens' Movement (MCM), on the grounds that it had abandoned its progressive roots and commitment to open government.
_	The American representative, Navy Captain Alfred Thayer Mahan, justified voting against the measure on the grounds that "the inventiveness of Americans should not be restricted in the development of new weapons."
_	In his early work, "Interests and Rights" (1980), Frey disagreed with Singer – who in his "Animal Liberation" (1975) wrote that the interests of nonhuman animals must be included when judging the consequences of an act – on the grounds that animals have no interests.
_	Mill opposes state paternalism on the grounds that individuals know their own good better than the state does, that the moral equality of persons demands respect for others' liberty, and that paternalism disrupts the development of an independent character.
_	Advocates of the Whale Cove theory dismiss the latitude given by Drake on the grounds that he may have deliberately falsified it in order to deceive the rival Spanish.
_	The cases were won on the grounds that Summum's right to freedom of speech was denied and the governments had engaged in discrimination.
_	However, Soviet Premier Joseph Stalin, despite the agreed terms of dividing Berlin and Germany with the Western Allies, wants to take Berlin for himself, on the grounds that the Soviet Union best deserved to conquer its archenemy's capital, after the unparalleled brutality of the Eastern Front.
_	On 16 December 2011 the First Preliminary Chamber of the ICC, by a two-to-one majority, dismissed the charges against Mbarushimana, on the grounds that there was insufficient evidence for assuming that he has contributed to the war crimes in North and South Kivu.
_	This was part of the trials for the West Highland Line services mentioned earlier, but the locomotive was rejected for such duties on the grounds that they were "no better than a good B1".
_	Wood sued, with Lucy defending on the grounds that no valid contract existed.
_	Following a decision from the Third Circuit U.S. Court of Appeals in Philadelphia, Major League Baseball blocked it from carrying the series on the grounds that as a cable superstation, TBS could not have the rights to a national telecast that competed with network coverage of the NLCS, which was carried that year by ABC.
_	When the case was before the district court, Hebei claimed that Chinese law required them to price-fix, and this claim was supported by the Chinese Ministry of Commerce in written submissions to the court, but this defense was denied on the grounds that there was no evidence that Chinese law actually imposed this requirement; a jury awarded damages to ASP.
_	For Housman, "No one could have a better friend than I have found in Gow," although even Gow sometimes found the older man daunting: when asked by colleagues to put a knotty question of translation to Housman, he refused, on the grounds that Housman would merely say that the meaning was obvious to the feeblest intellect.
_	The allegations had been made on a secret tape recording, though the defendant had subsequently withdrawn them on the grounds that he had been drunk at the time they were made.
_	The Court acquitted Mbahou on the first charge on the grounds that a physical act of crime had to be proven, and it acquitted him on the second charge because he had not actually adopted the uniform corresponding to the rank he claimed.
_	When the Clinton campaign declined to file for recounts, Green Party presidential nominee Jill Stein agreed to spearhead the recount effort on November 23, on the grounds that unspecified "anomalies" may have affected the election's outcome.
_	This term has been criticized on the grounds that many learners already speak more than one language.
_	The council of the new village named it Mishmar HaShiv'a ('Guardian of the Seven') in honour of seven Jewish soldiers killed near there in 1948, but the government committee in charge of assigning names forced them to change it to Azor on the grounds that preserving Biblical names was more important.
_	The verdict was overturned in 1883 by President Arthur on the ground of faulty evidence, but the expulsion was immediately reinstated by the Secretary of War on the grounds that Whittaker had failed an exam.
_	"Stegastes" species may be offered to new aquarists on the grounds that they are easy to care for.
_	Lewis commented that she turned down the deal on the grounds that Harrods is the only UK department store that continues to stock clothing made from animal fur: "It wasn't a million pounds that I was offered, as the papers reported, but even if it had been, I still would have turned it down".
_	In 1908, when Mary Louise was 11 months old, her mother sued her father for divorce on the grounds that he failed to provide for her.
_	His lawyers defended him on the grounds that he suffered "a delusional disorder."
_	China, which has held the rocky outpost since seizing it from the Philippines in 2012, registered a protest on the grounds that the US Navy should have notified China in advance of its approach and had "violated China's sovereignty and security interests".
_	The commanding officer only issued the medals to the volunteers who stayed behind and retained the others on the grounds that, if he returned the remainder to the War Department, the War Department would try to reissue the medals.
_	The LDS Church currently does not use the cross on the grounds that "because the Savior lives, we do not use the symbol of His death as the symbol of our faith", although this aversion to the cross only became dominant in the 20th century.
_	In "United States v. Sheldon" (1817), decided after the war had ended, "Barber" was distinguished on the grounds that driving cattle on foot was not "transportation" within the meaning of the act.
_	Food Not Bombs and a church for the homeless called First Vagabonds Church of God sued the city on the grounds that serving food is first amendment-protected political speech and religious activity.
_	On 15 December, Kougias appealed for the two defendants to be released from custody, on the grounds that neither of them ever had any previous criminal convictions, that their names and addresses were known, that they had considerable ties with their community, and that the charges were based on the testimony of witnesses that the defendants objected to.
_	The censor objected to "A Group of Soldiers" on the grounds that "the type of man represented is not worthy of the British Army".
_	Lord Howick had dismissed petitions against the New Poor Law on the grounds that they came largely from areas where the new law was not yet in operation; the true views of the agricultural labourers in the areas where it had been applied was approbation as shown by agrarian unrest being much less than in 1830.
_	The parish was united with St Mildred, Poultry, although the parishioners objected on the grounds that This was a noisy, crowded parish perpetually disturbed by carts and coaches, and wants sufficient place for burials.
_	Heseltine was not satisfied with Thatcher’s draft reply when he saw it and consulted Sir Patrick Mayhew (Solicitor-General and acting Attorney-General as Sir Michael Havers was ill) on the grounds that the government might be legally liable for any incorrect advice.
_	However, Carlin's lawsuit was dismissed on the grounds that the Postal Reorganization Act did not allow judicial review of the board's decision to fire a Postmaster General.
_	Several courts have interpreted the word "sale" in the PMO to preclude herdshares on the grounds that a herdshare is little more than an impermissible sale by another name.
_	They were opposed by Kevin McKenna, the IRA Chief of Staff, and by the republican leadership based around Gerry Adams, on the grounds that actions of that scale were too big a risk and unsustainable.
_	In the U.S., many university administrators and university associations like the Association of American Universities have vigorously opposed the unionization of graduate student employees on their campuses through legal challenges on the grounds that unionization threatens academic freedom of institutions and harms the relationship between faculty and students, although recent research suggests that unionization neither negatively affects academic freedom nor harms faculty-student relationships.
_	The defense challenged this, among other things, on the grounds that there were no neck injuries to him—injuries that they claimed would have been expected if he had been violently shaken.
_	The charges were submitted by the Commandant of the Marine Corps, Colonel Heywood on the grounds that he had sent large amounts of fuel and bed linens to his personal residence while he was the Commandant of Marines at the Brooklyn Navy Yard.
_	An uproar was created when governing bodies dominated by right wing nationalist groups decided this painting should be rejected from an exhibition at the National Gallery of Modern Art in New Delhi on the grounds that it was irreverent toward a national symbol.
_	Brambledown began life in Shincliffe village on the grounds that is now Poplar Tree Garden Centre in Durham.
_	Later this incident was criticized within the party ranks on the grounds that the identity of the party had been revealed, eventually leading to the resignation of Mohan Vaidya and others in the party leadership.
_	However following the publication, the British Government obtained a High Court order to confiscate all proceeds from the book, on the grounds that the government owned the copyright to anything written by Tomlinson.
_	The party survived the 1999 closure case but was banned by the Constitutional Court on 13 March 2003 on the grounds that it allegedly supported the PKK.
_	Though offered a scholarship to Princeton, Nader's father forced him to decline the offer on the grounds that the family was able to pay Nader's tuition and the funds should go to a student who could not afford it.
_	Reeves's TV work, although pioneering, was the subject of considerable criticism on the grounds that he was attempting to sell a presidential candidate to the public in the same manner that one might sell a car or a brand of toothpaste.
_	Dang refused to supply Pubei's personal retainers on the grounds that they weren't in the employ of the government, and therefore not eligible for government support.
_	Although the Supreme Court later reaffirmed "Mitchell" in 1973 in "Civil Service Comm'n v. Letter Carriers", it did so on the grounds that permitting public employees to engage in political activity was dangerous.
_	She was refused an entry visa by Israeli authorities on the grounds that she had twice in the past tried to run Israel's naval embargo of the Gaza Strip and that a 10-year exclusion order was in effect against her.
_	Capriglione in 2017 sponsored legislation that would forbid lobbyists from running for office in Texas on the grounds that they pose either a "perception of conflict of interest" or an actual conflict.
_	The "San Antonio Express-News," calling for "transparency in government," opposes Capriglione's bill on the grounds that one should not be banned from office based on occupation.
_	She discovers that a road serving a gold mine in the Pantanal region has been driven through Indian land, and writes a letter of protest to the American press (on the grounds that no action would be taken in Brazil).
_	Lazio won unopposed, while Clinton won 82 percent of the vote in easily defeating unknown Manhattan doctor Mark McMahon, who ran on the grounds that "the Clintons have tried to hijack the Democratic Party."
_	Their removal was ordered on the grounds that the "de jure" Chief Justice was not allowed to advise in these cases.
_	On 15 April, the newspaper's columnist, Professor Geoffrey Alderman, argued against the CST on the grounds that its leadership and funding were neither transparent nor accountable.
_	The Tokyo District Court rejected the suit, on the grounds that the statute of limitations had been exceeded.
_	During the McCarthy hearings of 1954 and 1955, Senator McCarthy objected to the Army’s decision to promote dentist Irving Peress to major on the grounds that he was a security risk.
_	Chiang turned down a Hugo nomination for his short story "Liking What You See: A Documentary" in 2003, on the grounds that the story was rushed due to editorial pressure and did not turn out as he had really wanted.
_	In January 1930, Barthel and seven other council members who had voted in favor of granting a rock-crushing permit in the Santa Monica Mountains were unsuccessfully targeted for recall on the grounds that the eight
_	Sax lost on the grounds that the tone produced by the two families of instruments is markedly different, despite their mechanical similarities.
_	The Speaker, Kamuta Latasi, rejected the Opposition's attempt to table a motion of no confidence, on the grounds that there was now a vacant seat in Parliament.
_	In "Schechter Poultry Corp. v. United States" (1935), the Court also voted unanimously to declare the National Industrial Recovery Act (NIRA) unconstitutional on the grounds that it gave the president "unfettered discretion" to make whatever laws he thought were needed for economic recovery.
_	The "market vendor" refuses to sell raspberry jam to "Penny Pigtails" on the grounds that her legs are "made of cotton" and "far too long" (an event that Salad Fingers finds most upsetting).
_	Some former opponents of Saddam, such as Ahmed Chalabi, have argued for the destruction of all Saddam-era monuments and symbols on the grounds that they are "a clear reminder of the consequences of totalitarianism and idealising a person that embodies evil".
_	Kamiya approved the idea, on the grounds that he felt the weapon would look "hot" in a female hand.
_	In 2010 Bennett became one of the most prominent targets of the Tea Party movement, on the grounds that he was insufficiently conservative.
_	A coalition of right-wing parties including the Social Christians, Social Democrats, and the Constitutional Liberal Party, calling itself the 'Democratic Coordinating Committee' (Coordinadora), decided to abstain from the elections on the grounds that the opposition parties had been given insufficient 'guarantees,' and not enough time to prepare for the elections.
_	Queen Isabella made a claim to throne of France on behalf of her son Edward on the grounds that he was a matrilineal grandson of Philip IV of France.
_	After further discussions with Ms Westacott, Beamer declined to approve the proposed variation on the grounds that the shopping centre tended to undermine the viability of the Liverpool shopping centre, on 8 July 2004.
_	"Eudryandra" on the grounds that it contained a single seed separator, and erected for it a new series of unstated rank, "Dryandra" § "Haplophyllae", which he defined as "Folia omniæ integerrima" ("All the leaves have completely smooth margins").
_	The English historian criticizes the "transplant (to) the whole of Italy (with) the laws and institutions of the Piedmont" on the grounds that it was done "with so little consultation, and a callousness so fast and big, from seriously offending the sensibilities and local interests".
_	Modibo Sangaré's candidacy was rejected by the court on the grounds that he had not paid the required bond of 10 million CFA francs.
_	It is now classified as "Data Deficient" on the grounds that the taxonomic status of the species complex is unclear.
_	They relate mainly to the process of editing "Shakespeare and the Goddess of Complete Being", and also contain a sequence of drafts of letters in which Raine attempts to explain to Hughes his disinclination to publish Hughes's poem "The Cast" in an anthology he was editing, on the grounds that it might open Hughes to further attack on the subject of Sylvia Plath.
_	The joke backfired when Grace, fielding nearby, appealed on the grounds that Barlow had hit the ball twice and then "attempted a run".
_	In the original context of AM radio broadcasting in the 1930s, overloads due to shorter peaks were considered unimportant on the grounds that the human ear could not detect distortion due to momentary clipping.
_	Two seeks another declaratory judgment that the distribution of DVD Copy Plus and DVD-X COPY do not violate the Copyright Act on the grounds that they have substantial non-infringing uses, that the use of these software constitute fair use, and/or that the relevant provisions of the Copyright Act, if interpreted to bar the distribution of DVD Copy Plus and DVD-X COPY, violate the First Amendment.
_	He ends with an argument against keeping Comey as FBI director, on the grounds that he was given an opportunity to "admit his errors" but that there is no hope that he will "implement the necessary corrective actions."
_	Jeffersonian Republicans justified Tallmadge's slavery restrictions on the grounds that Congress possessed the authority to impose territorial statutes which would remain in force after statehood was established.
_	In the aftermath of the Jacobite defeat on 13 February 1692, in an incident since known as the Massacre of Glencoe, 38 members of the Clan MacDonald of Glencoe were killed by members of the Earl of Argyll's Regiment of Foot, on the grounds that they had not been prompt in pledging allegiance to the new monarchs.
_	The DSM-IV classification has been criticized by other Western psychiatrists on the grounds that
_	Unionist Matt McCarten criticised the composition of the Commission on the grounds that it should have at least one union member, which government had refused, arguing that including union members would risk bias.
_	An official in the Lord Chamberlain's office recommended that a licence should be refused on the grounds that the loose morals of the two main female characters "would cause too great a scandal".
_	The plans were widely opposed and a local petition was organised by the Daily Telegraph against the design on the grounds that it was inappropriate to the setting in Richmond.
_	Rogers had the workhouse master George Catch removed, on the grounds that Catch had delayed calling a doctor for a woman in pain giving birth, to save money.
_	However his immediate family opposed the trip on the grounds that it would delay his entry into the legal profession, and it took some time for one uncle and a family friend to persuade them to let him go.
_	He denounced antisemitism as "idiocy", but only on the grounds that the mother of Jesus was Jewish.
_	St Mary's Old Boys' Club was the alumni association of St Mary's College, Crosby, and operated as a private members' club for over sixty years until its licence was revoked by the authorities in 2010 on the grounds that it was not a 'bona fide' club operated in good faith.
_	The Headmaster of the Doon School asked the Ministry of Information and Broadcasting's censor board to withhold a censor certificate for the film on the grounds that the film is defamatory.
_	The letter gave directions to where the “golden cache” was buried and the grounds that Shotwell had worked.
_	A work written during the early years of the Qing dynasty refutes the above description on the grounds that there is no logic in the "Guaizi Ma" as previously described.
_	There, she patrolled two sectors from her assigned parish, Saint Thomas Church in Manhattan on the grounds that she was assigned to an area where there had not been demonic activity since the Purge of 1985.
_	Socialists critique the private appropriation of property income on the grounds that because such income does not correspond to a return on any productive activity and is generated by the working class, it represents exploitation.
_	Dred Scott, a slave, had lived with his master for a few years in Illinois and Wisconsin, and with the support of abolitionist groups, was now suing for his freedom on the grounds that he resided in a free state.
_	It also ruled that since slaves were private property, their master was fully within his rights to reclaim runaways, even if they were in a state where slavery did not exist, on the grounds that the Fifth Amendment forbade Congress to deprive a citizen of his property without due process of law.
_	Council started a court case to stop the expansion, on the grounds that the expansion had not had an environmental assessment and violated the 1983 agreement.
_	He sued the Shubert theater organization for violation of the New York Civil Rights Act, but lost in the state's highest court in 1916 on the grounds that only discrimination on the basis of race, creed or color was unlawful.
_	However, on 28 April 2010, the Court of Session dismissed the SNP's complaint, and refused to prevent the BBC from broadcasting the third debate in Scotland, on the grounds that the SNP had left the bringing of the case "far too late", had not contested the broadcasting of the first two debates by ITV and Sky Television, and that the third debate would in any case be broadcast by Sky on satellite across the UK, which a Scottish court had no power to block.
_	The script was originally written for Granada Television, but they rejected it initially on the grounds that it would be too expensive, although it later emerged that some at Granada were worried that the political radicalism of the play might upset advertisers.
_	Barret refused to pay the balance on his pledge to the railroad on the grounds that it had changed its originally planned route.
_	In the 1807 attack on Copenhagen the British army confiscated the entire Dano-Norwegian navy on the grounds that Denmark–Norway was about to launch an attack on Britain.
_	In some places, Berkeley's argument for blind obedience to a de facto authority resembles Thomas Hobbes's argument in Leviathan, on the grounds that rebellion can lead to anarchic violence and chaos which is worse than the worst tyranny (§§16, 47, 51), although Berkeley disagrees with Hobbes's idea that moral and political obligation ultimately rests on the law of self-perservation (§33).
_	In May 1994, he proposed eliminating the unelected position of city manager on the grounds that the office was too powerful.
_	The CTC refused on the grounds that they had already talked to community leaders two months before the increases were announced.
_	However, he insisted he had only asked for leniency on the grounds that the timber had been found to be illegal due to a technicality.
_	He objected to the king's choice on the grounds that Becket was too worldly, the only bishop or magnate known to have opposed the king's choice.
_	These groups generally protest on the grounds that all foetuses have a right to life; that sexual health education leads to promiscuity; that contraception is against the teachings of the Bible; and for other similar reasons.
_	The marriage was annulled in 1927 on the grounds that the pair had not been resident in Scotland for the required 21 days prior to the marriage.
_	Even so, Townsend opted to plead guilty on 27 March and argued for a lenient sentence on the grounds that he was not aware that his acts were illegal.
_	Smith's conviction was overturned by the Pennsylvania Supreme Court on the grounds that the prosecution hid the existence of sand that could have supported Smith's case.
_	Despite being more popular than some men's football events (one match saw a 53,000 strong crowd), women's football in England suffered a blow in 1921 when The Football Association outlawed the playing of the game on Association members' pitches, on the grounds that the game (as played by women) was distasteful.
_	In January 1885, Johnston lodged a claim for the reward, on the grounds that
_	However, on 31 August 2016, the Second US Circuit Court of Appeals in Manhattan dismissed the lawsuit on the grounds that US federal courts lacked overseas jurisdiction on civil cases.
_	However the Taliban ruled not to extradite Bin Laden on the grounds that there was insufficient evidence published in the indictments and that non-Muslim courts lacked standing to try Muslims.
_	Little has been achieved on this front since 2009 when a proposed constitution was contested by the US Justice Department on the grounds that the powers sought exceeded what would be considered allowable under territorial status.
_	Judge Warren Wilbert refused to allow the defense to present a plea of necessity, but did allow them to present a case for voluntary manslaughter on the grounds that the defendant sincerely believed that he was committing a smaller crime to prevent a greater evil.
_	The Times Higher Education article noted: "Another key concept in the research strategy is "leadership", which Professor Price distinguished from excellence on the grounds that it was active rather than passive.
_	The defendant applied for a stay of proceedings on the grounds that they were, "," frivolous and vexatious, and an abuse of process.
_	In fact, in 1944, Gray briefly killed off Warbucks on the grounds that it was widely thought that capitalists were obsolete.
_	Described by his ministerial colleagues as a man "driven by his strong ideological beliefs and professionalism", Zapatero is said to have chosen Alonso on the grounds that the latter would fight terrorism without compromising human rights.
_	Bidwell won a seat in the Legislative Assembly of Upper Canada for Lennox and Addington but failed to take his seat because his election was petitioned against on the grounds that he was a fugitive from justice, he had an immoral character, and he had taken an oath of allegiance to the United States.
_	In April 2007, Tate filed a motion to have his 30-year sentence vacated on the grounds that his former attorney (now deceased), Ellis Rubin, was incompetent.
_	In 2001, with the 50th anniversary of Straffen's imprisonment approaching, his solicitors called for his case to be reopened on the grounds that he had not been fit to stand trial.
_	In his 2006 book "The Myth of Progress", Wessels asserts that the aspiration to sustain indefinite exponetial economic growth is an impossibility on the grounds that it violates three scientific principles: the limits to growth, the second law of thermodynamics and the law of self organization.
_	She was on the point of divorcing Zoubkoff on the grounds that his behaviour had resulted in his expulsion from Germany, he was unable to maintain her, and that "conjugal relations did not exist"., but only a few days after this announcement became public she fell seriously ill with pneumonia, dying in a Bonn hospital on 13 November 1929.
_	Petry was later cleared of criminal wrongdoing on the grounds that his action was self-defense, but he expressed no remorse about the shooting and later remarked "That's what happens when a man carries a toy pistol.
_	He commented that on the same basis "the quality of the code I use to put together problems for our physics undergraduates shows that we should not trust results from my colleagues who work on the Large Hadron Collider on the grounds that "it is all physics code"."
_	Salah Tahlak said that Pe'er was refused on the grounds that her appearance could incite anger in the Arab country after she had already faced protests at the ASB Classic over the 2008–2009 Israel–Gaza conflict.
_	His attorney, Dragan Barbarić, acting in his client's absence, initiated a successful appeal against the first instance verdict on the grounds that it lacked proper factual description of the offence and as such was in violation of criminal procedural law.
_	The appeal was granted on the grounds that members of the board reported they weren't convinced Molitor's “tendency to manipulate others has in fact ended,” according to a copy of the board's decision.
_	However, works by Norwegians are present in the standard reader "Sýnisbók íslenzkra bókmennta til miðrar átjándu aldar", compiled by Sigurður Nordal on the grounds that the language was the same.
_	Harold Bloom rejects the theory that Shakespeare wrote "Edward III", on the grounds that he finds "nothing in the play is representative of the dramatist who had written "Richard III"."
_	Other users, however, thought that so many bucky bits were overkill, and objected to this design on the grounds that such a keyboard can require three or four hands to operate.
_	Philippa Langley refutes Hicks's argument on the grounds that he does not take into account all the evidence.
_	His initial training in Torquay and Carlisle did not prepare him for his assignment to Bomber Command, an assignment which in January 1941 he refused, on the grounds that his conscience would not permit him to take part in the indiscriminate bombing of civilians.
_	In 1848, the United States House of Representatives voted to censure President James K. Polk, on the grounds that the Mexican–American War had been "unnecessarily and unconstitutionally begun by the President of the United States."
_	The trust failed to submit returns to the Charity Commission from 2005 onwards, and its registration was removed in 2010 on the grounds that it had "ceased to exist".
_	However, General Douglas Haig, the commander of the British Empire forces in France, rejected this proposal on the grounds that the size of these forces was too small to justify grouping them in a field army.
_	In the United Kingdom lawyers applied to seek a judicial review of the government's stance of not providing financial aid for Britons facing criminal proceedings overseas, but their legal challenge was dismissed by judges at the High Court of England and Wales on the grounds that Sandiford had little chance in successfully appealing the sentence.
_	Privately Boiocalus, as a memento of his 50-year friendship, was promised land though he felt obliged to reject on the grounds that it would make him a traitor.
_	Martin claims that critics who value aestheticized violence defend shocking depictions onscreen on the grounds that "screen violence is not real violence, and should never be confused with it".
_	However, his registration was denied by the Chinese Football Association on the grounds that Yapp did not qualify as a domestic player and as such, would violate the Chinese Super League stipulations which require all keepers to be domestic players.
_	It was a replacement for the Arrows FA1, which the team had been forced to withdraw after a legal protest from the Shadow team on the grounds that it was too similar to their own design; the result of the Arrows team being formed earlier in the year from a splinter group of disgruntled Shadow employees.
_	Tessa wants to join too but is refused membership on the grounds that she is an awful musician - Kelvin's relationship with her ends soon after.
_	Afterwards, they declined on the grounds that it was impossible to smuggle arms out of the Levant region without alerting Israeli intelligence.
_	Some objections to the founding of the "Taisei Yokusankai" or Imperial Rule Assistance Association, came on the grounds that "kokutai", already required all imperial subjects to support imperial rule.
_	Also in 2015, the benefit cap was the subject of a successful legal challenge on the grounds that it unlawfully discriminated against disabled people and their carers.
_	The student then filed a lawsuit against the Resident Assistant on the grounds that the searches were private and thus violated his Fourth Amendment right to protection from private searches.
_	As a private citizen, he sued the Texas Republican Party on the grounds that an elections rule, approved by the legislature in 1960, which permits a person to run for the White House and another office at the same time, is unconstitutional.
_	Normally γ is taken to be unity, on the grounds that the thermal conductivity of electrons is large enough to keep them isothermal on the time scale of ion acoustic waves, and γ is taken to be 3, corresponding to one-dimensional motion.
_	After appeal, the contract was cancelled on the grounds that the specifications had been devised so that only Worthington could qualify.
_	Morgan declined on the grounds that "I didn't think he was ethical."
_	Shortly after the publication of the information, the House of Commons authorities asked the Metropolitan Police to investigate, a request that the Metropolitan Police declined, on the grounds that a prosecution would not be in the public interest.
_	In the case of voluntary statutes, the ability to give informed consent is also an issue; in 1984, the U.S. state of Michigan's court of appeals held that mandating chemical castration as a condition of probation was unlawful on the grounds that the drug medroxyprogesterone acetate had not yet gained acceptance as being safe and reliable and also due to the difficulty of obtaining informed consent under these circumstances.
_	Some have objected to this phrasing, which is an elaboration of referring to training as "human capital", either for the same reason that phrase is objectionable, or on the grounds that it implies that the human in which the knowledge is "invested" is a resource to be exploited.
_	The lead chancellor Li Deyu, however, opposed on the grounds that Consort Wang was of low birth and did not have a son.
_	On 27 November, the defence counsel for Elisabetta, Anthony Metzer, QC, attempted to have the case thrown out as an abuse of process on the grounds that the two prosecution witnesses, Lawson and Saatchi, could not be "witnesses of truth".
_	As it was the money (and ships) were declared to be "Droits of Admiralty" on the grounds that war had not been declared, and the captains and crew shared a relatively small "ex gratia" payment of £160,000 for the bullion, plus the proceeds of the sale of the hull and cargo.
_	It is subject to criticism on the grounds that it interferes with a legislator's primary duty, namely to read and be knowledgeable about a bill before casting his or her vote.
_	At Potsdam, Stalin argued for the Oder–Neisse line on the grounds that the Polish Government demanded this frontier and that there were no longer any Germans left east of this line.
_	Posner criticized the theory on the grounds that homosexuality and early masturbation could both be effects of whatever factor might be responsible for causing homosexuality.
_	The Stop Esso campaign was a campaign by Greenpeace, Friends of the Earth and People and Planet aimed at boycotting the oil company Esso, known as ExxonMobil in the United States, on the grounds that it is damaging the environment.
_	Georges Clemenceau and others objected in the grounds that the decision was too favorable to the company.
_	The city was prevented from joining the NDH on the grounds that Zara itself was not subject to the conditions of the Treaty of Rome.
_	However, the Western Division race had not yet been decided and Chargers and Raiders owners Barron Hilton and Al Davis respectively objected to playing the Eastern playoff "early" on the grounds that it would have given the Eastern winner an unfair advantage in terms of rest in case the Chargers and Raiders also had to play a tiebreaker.
_	While the Gomery Report: Phase 1 exonerated Martin from responsibility and liability for the misspending of public funds, Chrétien has decided to take an action in Federal Court to review the commission report on the grounds that Gomery showed a "reasonable apprehension of bias", and that some conclusions didn't have an "evidentiary" basis.
_	In 2012, the Preston Downs Trust (a Plymouth meeting room in England) attracted considerable media attention when the Charity Commission rejected an application for charitable status on the grounds that it could not be sure that it met the criterion for public benefit.
_	Stevens was the only delegate who refused to sign Sierra Leone's Declaration of Independence, on the grounds that there had been a secret defence-pact between Sierra Leone and Britain; another point of contention by Stevens was the Sierra Leonean government's position that there would be no elections held before independence which would effectively shut Stevens out of Sierra Leone's political process.
_	The defeated Conservative candidate mounted a successful legal challenge to the result on the grounds that errors by election officials (failures to stamp certain votes) had changed the result; the court ruled the result invalid and ordered a by-election on 20 November which was won by the Liberal Democrats with a much larger majority, causing much recrimination in the Conservative Party about the decision to challenge the original result in the first place.
_	In July 1782, the Earl of Shelburne offered the Americans independence, but Jay rejected the offer on the grounds that it did not recognize American independence during the negotiations; Jay's dissent halted negotiations until the fall.
_	In the early 1990s, he publicly opposed the "WillyWorld" shopping mall proposal, on the grounds that enough other similar projects were already in the works.
_	He objected to the Bill on the grounds that it created a monopoly and placed betting under the control of the Jockey Club and the National Hunt Committee.
_	In the debate over what to do about China's increased involvement, Marshall opposed a cease–fire on the grounds that it would make the U.S. look weak in China's eyes, leading to demands for future concessions.
_	Some authors question the status of Latvian debitive as a mood on the grounds that a mood by definition cannot be combined with another mood (as can be seen above.)
_	Crookes lost four times on the grounds that he had not shown anyone in BC had actually read the materials on the minor websites, but this left the major question unresolved:
_	The United Nations representative Ambassador Oritiz Sanz arrived on 22 August 1968 and made repeated requests for Indonesia to allow a one man, one vote system (a process known as a referendum or plebiscite) but these requests were refused on the grounds that such activity was not specified nor requested by the 1962 New York Agreement.
_	However, his claim was rejected on the grounds that the Police had acted in compliance with a warrant issued by a competent authority.
_	The Ninth Circuit distinguished "Liparota" on the grounds that it did not pertain to acts that cause public endagerment, and therefore criminal liability needed to be used more sparingly.
_	According to Cassiodorus, in the 5th century, Theodoric, King of the Ostrogoths, allowed the inhabitants of the city to spoliate the theatre for building material for the construction of stone buildings, on the grounds that the monument had been abandoned "for a long time."
_	However, construction was delayed, and in 1933 the decision was reversed in favour of Trowbridge, on the grounds that it was better served by rail services.
_	The ACLU had originally intended to oppose the Butler Act on the grounds that it violated the teacher's individual rights and academic freedom, and was therefore unconstitutional.
_	That year, in the case of "Corbett v Corbett", Arthur Corbett attempted to annul his marriage to April Ashley on the grounds that transsexuals were not recognised by English law.
_	In 2012 Delhi Charter School was made to drop its classroom ban on pregnant students and the ability to mandate pregnancy tests for students suspected of being pregnant on the grounds that the tests were an invasion of privacy.
_	They justify the state on the grounds that it is the logical consequence of adhering to the non-aggression principle and argue that anarchism is immoral because it implies that the non-aggression principle is optional and that the enforcement of laws under anarchism is open to competition.
_	In May 1988, however, Wood, who was born in the United Kingdom, was disqualified from membership of the Senate on the grounds that he had not been an Australian citizen at the time of nomination.
_	An opponent, James Quillen Wellborn (1927-2004), a native of Daingerfield, Texas, a mathematics teacher at Bossier High School and a former chairman of the Bossier Parish Republican Party, failed to have Jones disqualified from the ballot on the grounds that Jones had not met the residency requirement for municipal office in Bossier City because he had spent part of the preceding year in Tulsa.
_	Burns justified his destruction of the animals on the grounds that electrocution — the technique that he had learned in 1982 from James Druck — was quick and painless.
_	The selectors again picked Ramsey, but left star winger Stanley Matthews out on the grounds that England could beat the Americans without him, ignoring Winterbottom's protests.
_	Nelson advocated an ordinance that would outlaw the wearing of zoot suits within the city on the grounds that the high-waisted, wide-legged, tight-cuffed, pegged trousers favored by young Hispanic men in 1943 had become a "public nuisance."
_	Begged by their hostess to save "my poor darling Eva – Eva of the golden hair," Lucien demurs, on the grounds that he has never even met her.
_	In practice, however, the Order has tended to oppose marches by republicans and other "disloyal" groups on the grounds that there is no right to parade sedition.
_	Removing the cosmological constant term from the Friedmann equations on the grounds that it was both unsatisfactory and unnecessary, Einstein arrived at a model of a universe that expands and then contracts, a model that was later denoted the Friedmann–Einstein model of the universe.
_	After sentencing, Foster filed a motion for a new trial on the grounds that the jury selection violated the US Supreme Court's "Batson" decision.
_	Below the church was a crypt for vestries, a public meeting-room, and a mortuary chapel, it had been intended to use this crypt as a temporary church, but the Bishop had vetoed the suggestion on the grounds that people would not 'go into the ground to say their prayers'.
_	This was based upon the grounds that the current clubs had a strong supporter base that may be lost if their club was barred from the competition.
_	At the national convention, the integrated Mississippi Freedom Democratic Party (MFDP) claimed the seats for delegates for Mississippi, on the grounds that the official Mississippi delegation had been elected in violation of the party's rules, as it excluded blacks from voting.
_	Sheinin suggested that, should the negotiations fail, Boras could take legal action on the grounds that the requirement of MLB teams to pay large transfer fees to NPB teams artificially depressed the player's personal contract.
_	Nevertheless the court simply dismissed the case on the grounds that anything damaging Carnières had said about Zaouche was only of secondary importance, and that his primary aim had been to defend French interests.
_	They attempted to publish the new proof in "The Journal of Symbolic Logic" but it was rejected on the grounds that a new proof of an elementary mathematical theorem was not notable, apparently overlooking the fact that one of the authors was a computer program.
_	The Assembly convened on 29 November 2007, elected its leadership and then heard a proposal to dismiss Congress on the grounds that it was corrupt.
_	The UC Davis report was contested by the North American Olive Oil Association on the grounds that UC Davis has a conflict of interest due to the fact that they market their own olive oil and have an interest in promoting olive oil from California.
_	The members of the 'For Socialism' platform were expelled at the congress, with the existence of "platforms" in the party being banned altogether, on the grounds that they gave too much influence to minority groups.
_	However, the receiver sales were ended after the Westinghouse Electric & Manufacturing Company threatened legal action, on the grounds that Tuska's patent rights didn't extend to other companies, and WCJ was shut down in late 1922.
_	On 30 April 2016, the returning officer rejected his nominations papers on the grounds that he was a convicted person serving a jail sentence.
_	This was rejected on the grounds that no oriental could handle the managerial and critical work.
_	In 2007, the company was criticized by blogger Darren Barefoot on the grounds that its current and former employees responded deceptively to negative reviews of its products, services, and business practices.
_	The Kosovo Albanians boycotted Yugoslav and Serbian elections on the grounds that they would legitimise the Milošević government, they also questioned its veracity.
_	His reliance on this mechanism led Fleeming Jenkin to attack natural selection on the grounds that blending inheritance would average out any novel beneficial characteristic before selection had time to act.
_	In 2006, Quest turned down an opportunity to join Al Jazeera English news channel, the English language version of al-Jazeera, "on the grounds that being gay and Jewish might not be suitable".
_	This offer was rejected on the grounds that it was not "compatible with our status as a first class power to depend on others for weapons of this supreme importance."
_	Charlotte's father vehemently refused to approve the union on the grounds that a poor Irish pastor should never be bold enough to suggest marrying his famous daughter.
_	In 2011, Goodwin-Gill penned a legal opinion which recommended that the Palestinian National Authority not seek recognition of Palestine as a member state of the United Nations on the grounds that such a move would deprive the considerable Palestinian diaspora of legal representation within the putative state.
_	Marleasing SA (the Applicant) brought an application before the Spanish national courts for an order that the contract establishing "La Comercial" was void and that the formation of La Comercial should be nullified on the grounds that establishment "lacked cause, was a sham transaction and was carried out in order to defraud the creditors of Barviesa (a co-founder of La Comercial)".
_	La Comercial argued that the action should be dismissed in its entirety on the grounds that article 11 of the First Council Directive 68/151/EEC of 9 March 1968 on coordination of safeguards which, for the protection of the interests of members and others, which had not yet been implemented by Spain, provided an exhaustive list of the cases under which the nullity of a company may be ordered and that "lack of cause" was not a ground listed therein.
_	Nicholas Almeida, a social activist working in Mumbai, organized a protest against the film on the grounds that it intentionally exploited the poor for the purposes of profit, also arguing that the title "Slumdog Millionaire" is offensive, demeaning, and insulting to their dignity.
_	The proposal is subject to a planning appeal lodged by members of the "Save 10 Murray" group on the grounds that 10 Murray Street is a historically and culturally significant building.
_	In 2009, because of financial constraints, TfL decided to stop work on a project to provide step-free access at West Kensington and five other stations, on the grounds that these are relatively quiet stations and some are already one or two stops away from an existing step-free station.
_	The inquiry was terminated by Moi in November 1991 at a point when Troon was being cross-examined on the grounds that he needed to return to the UK.
_	She was against female suffrage on the grounds that "men and women help one another because they are different, have different gifts and different spheres."
_	Initially, the director of civil status refused to permit the change on the grounds that a legal male could not bear a female name.
_	(Montreuil was initially prevented from changing her name despite this ruling on the grounds that she had not established general use, as normally required for a name change; the Quebec appeals court finally authorized the change on November 7, 2002.)
_	Benavente described indignantly how Las Casas had once denied baptism to an aging Indian who had walked many leagues to receive it, only on the grounds that he did not believe that the man had received sufficient doctrinal instruction.
_	The train driver David Banks was charged with manslaughter, but tried in a Western tribunal and acquitted on the grounds that the train had sounded and the suspicion the victim had been a suicide.
_	Umar once acquitted a pregnant single mother on the grounds that she was a "heavy sleeper" who had had "intercourse without realizing it".
_	Providentialism was frequently featured in discussions of European political and intellectual elites seeking to justify imperialism in the 19th century, on the grounds that the suffering caused by European conquest was justified under the grounds of furthering God's plan and spreading Christianity and civilization to distant nations.
_	Arden, Jackson and McFarlane LLJ granted an interim injunction on the grounds that liability under "Wilkinson v Downton" can arise even if the statement is true.
_	In December 2014, Turkey's state-owned Housing Development Administration (TOKİ) refused to divulge the actual construction cost on the grounds that releasing the information could hurt Turkey's economy, citing Article 17 of the Law on the Provision of Information.
_	Activision amended its lawsuit against West and Zampella to join Electronic Arts (EA) as a defendant on the grounds that EA began a conspiracy with West and Zampella.
_	Citizens to Preserve Overton Park opposes the proposed plan on the grounds that it would irreparably damage the park's value to the residents of Memphis, Tennessee.
_	ABA commissioner Mike Storen tried to block the sale on the grounds that selling the team's last true star was not in the best interest of the league.
_	As was his policy, Graham ignored criticism of his campaigns and, in 1966, claimed not to know why the University opposed them; but members of his staff openly accused Jones of jealousy on the grounds that Jones's evangelistic meetings had never been as large as Graham's.
_	Both consuls were now unfit for command or deceased; the dictator Marcus Claudius Glicia, appointed by Pulcher, was removed on the grounds that he was Pulcher's freedman, and thus not even a senator, let alone a senator of some status.
_	The absolutist party of the landowners and the Church, however, were not satisfied with this compromise, and they continued to regard Miguel as the legitimate successor to the throne on the grounds that according to the Portuguese succession rules (approved by the Cortes after the 1640 Restoration), Pedro had lost the right to the Portuguese crown, and therefore to choose a successor, when he took possession of a foreign crown (Brazil).
_	Mayor Anthony A. Williams objected on the grounds that the proposal changes Pierre L'Enfant's 1791 design for the city and would have cost an estimated $1 million for new signs and maps.
_	This was followed by calls for a boycott of Asda, as well as the companies represented by the other signatories to the letter on the grounds that "Companies that support the CSR are failed corporate citizens."
_	Chongryon for its part opposes moves to allow Zainichi Koreans to participate in Japanese politics, on the grounds that it assimilates Koreans into Japanese society and thus weakens Korean ethnic identity.
_	The anarchist Emma Goldman opposed suffragism on the grounds that women were more inclined toward legal enforcement of morality (as in the Women's Christian Temperance Union), that it was a diversion from more important struggles, and that suffrage would ultimately not make a difference.
_	The helmet reduced casualties but was criticized by General Herbert Plumer on the grounds that it was too shallow, too reflective, its rim was too sharp, and its lining was too slippery.
_	As late as the turn of 20th century, the Brahmin priests of Shahu, the Maratha ruler of Kolhapur refused to use Vedic mantras and would not take a bath before chanting, on the grounds that even the leading Marathas such as Shahu and his family belonged to the Shudra varna.
_	On July 20, 2018, the United States Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit upheld the dismissal of a lawsuit against the federal government relating to this incident, on the grounds that the suit was barred by the Federal Tort Claims Act.
_	With many friends among the settlers, Garza opposed revolution on the grounds that it would strain relations between neighbors.
_	The cities of Amsterdam and Utrecht have proposed cutting social security benefit to unemployed women wearing a burqa, on the grounds that it makes them unemployable in a predominantly non-Muslim country.
_	Berry and Ramirez successfully sued to return to the commission on the grounds that it was meant to be a nonpartisan entity.
_	His tenure as president of the commission lasted until March 1924, during which time he was placed on the retired list by the Admiralty, on the grounds that his salary came from the commission.
_	In the House of Lords, Baroness Symons argued that the rest of the UK should be allowed to vote on Scottish independence, on the grounds that it would affect the whole country.
_	Applications to increase mussel farms in Admiralty Bay have been successfully opposed on the grounds that the area is a special feeding site for the dusky dolphin.
_	In the late 1980s, accounting practitioners and educators were heavily criticized on the grounds that management accounting practices (and, even more so, the curriculum taught to accounting students) had changed little over the preceding 60 years, despite radical changes in the business environment.
_	In January 2017, the Israeli government demolished 11 buildings being built by 4 families, on the grounds that they were built without permits.
_	Newton objected to Leibniz's equation on the grounds that it allowed for the centrifugal force to have a different value from the centripetal force, arguing on the basis of his third law of motion, that the centrifugal force and the centripetal force must constitute an equal and opposite action-reaction pair.
_	The decision not to include houses on the bridge can be traced back directly to Henry IV, who decided against their inclusion on the grounds that houses would impede a clear view of the Louvre, which the newly built "galerie du bord de l'eau" linked to the Tuileries Palace.
_	A reconstructed Colorado Supreme Court handed down a decision in 1910 which ruled against all perpetual franchises on the grounds that they were prohibited by the constitution.
_	This was denied not on the merits, which were not addressed, but on the grounds that the lawsuit, which was filed on August 16, 2004, was filed too late.
_	The bill would have amended the federal judicial code to remove Supreme Court and district court jurisdiction to review cases arising out of any statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, or practice, or any act interpreting such a measure, on the grounds that such measure: (1) protects the rights of human persons between conception and birth; or (2) prohibits, limits, or regulates the performance of abortions or the provision of public funds, facilities, personnel, or other assistance for abortions.
_	During his term he became embroiled in a controversy when James Edwin Robertson was declared ineligible for election to the House of Commons of Canada after winning a seat in the 1882 federal election, on the grounds that he was still a sitting member of Prince Edward Island's legislative assembly, and therefore ineligible to run in the federal election.
_	In 2004, the Supreme Court heard "Elk Grove Unified School District v. Newdow", an appeal of the ruling, and rejected Newdow's claim on the grounds that he was not the custodial parent, and therefore lacked standing, thus avoiding ruling on the merits of whether the phrase was constitutional in a school-sponsored recitation.
_	Some organizations, such as the Representative Council of Black Associations of France (, CRAN), have argued in favour of the introduction of data collection on minority groups but this has been resisted by other organizations and ruling politicians, often on the grounds that collecting such statistics goes against France's secular principles and harks back to Vichy-era identity documents.
_	Richter still objected, on the grounds that the audience would simply suppose Klein-Rogge’s bare backside was his own.
_	On 10 February 1938, Carol proclaimed martial law and suspended all civil liberties under the grounds that the violent election was running the risk of plunging the nation into civil war.
_	Farah was arrested in early May 1998 on the grounds that he was suspected of financing a radical faction of the Front for the Restoration of Unity and Democracy (FRUD).
_	When Vladimir Kirillovich died on 21 April 1992, his daughter Maria claimed to succeed him as head of the Russian Imperial Family on the grounds that she was the only child of the last male dynast of the Imperial house according to the Romanovs' Pauline laws.
_	Spencer demurred however, on the grounds that there was no precedent for such a memorial, when the action in which he was killed was not successful.
_	It was an important element of politics in Poland during the times of the nobilities' election of kings, when monarchs would attempt to push through the election of their heir, and Polish nobility (szlachta) would oppose it, on the grounds that it would lead to absolute monarchy.
_	Bill Sirs of the Iron and Steel Trades Confederation rejected such calls on the grounds that industrial action by steelworkers at the integrated complexes could incapacitate the rolling mills and billet forges, and cause job losses.
_	In April 2000 two motorists caught speeding and challenged the Road Traffic Act 1988 which required the registered keeper of a vehicle to identify the driver at a particular time as being in contradiction to the Human Rights Act 1998 on the grounds that it amounted to a 'compulsory confession', also that since the camera partnerships included the police, local authorities, Magistrates Courts Service (MCS) and Crown Prosecution Service (CPS) which had a financial interest in the fine revenue that they would not get a fair trial.
_	The "R" symbol was introduced by 19th-century French chemist Charles Frédéric Gerhardt, who advocated its adoption on the grounds that it would be widely recognizable and intelligible given its correspondence in multiple European languages to the initial letter of one or more words already used to denote the concept and sharing the meaning "root" or "residue":
_	Danny declines on the grounds that "we're mates."
_	The idea of atonement for sin is criticized by Richard Dawkins on the grounds that the image of God as requiring the suffering and death of Jesus to effect reconciliation with humankind is immoral.
_	O'Rourke continued to live with his order and appealed his dismissal to Rome on the grounds that he had a right to baptize the baby.
_	Consequentialist libertarianism (also known as libertarian consequentialism or consequentialist liberalism, in Europe) refers to the libertarian position that is supportive of a free market and strong private property rights only on the grounds that they bring about favorable consequences, such as prosperity or efficiency.
_	His 1851 application was rejected by the interior ministry on the grounds that he had received public funding for his experiments.
_	These charges were dismissed by a US District Court in 2009 on the grounds that the transactions were exempt under the Commodities Exchange Act because they didn't occur in a marketplace but were negotiated contracts among sophisticated companies.
_	Piatigorsky disliked traditional academic jargon and for most of his life he upheld the principle that scholars should publish as little as possible on the grounds that publishing interrupts thinking.
_	Wigand demanded its removal, but a successful substitute had not been found and Sandefur refused on the grounds that sales would drop.
_	Butterfield disputed this on the grounds that: a molluscan foot is also mainly composed of cellular material, which he thought unlikely to be fossilized in Burgess Shale conditions; the wrinkles were too straight and ran too precisely across the animals' bodies; the gaps between them were the same size as the gaps between the gill-like structures round the foot.
_	A review in "The Hindu" criticized the book on the grounds that Haley, the daughter of immigrants from India, stressed her American-ness at the cost of "distanc(ing) herself from what makes her interesting.
_	J. W. Dalton has criticized the global workspace theory on the grounds that it provides, at best, an account of the cognitive "function" of consciousness, and fails even to address the deeper problem of its nature, of what consciousness "is", and of how any mental process whatsoever can be conscious: the so-called "hard problem of consciousness".
_	In December 2010, he attacked, and was one of six Conservative MPs who voted against Coalition proposals to increase student tuition fees from a maximum of £3,000 to a maximum of £9,000 per year, on the grounds that this would deter the less well-off from going to university.
_	In "State v. Post" and "State v. Van Beuren" 20 N.J.L. 368, decided together, the constitutionality of slavery in the state was challenged on the grounds that the first article of the first section of the newly passed (1844) state constitution ("All men are by nature free and independent...") precluded it.
_	Several publishers of antivirus and anti-spyware software updated their products to detect and remove XCP if found, on the grounds that it is a trojan horse or other malware; and an assistant secretary for the United States'
_	He was determined to carry out this order, and justified doing so on the grounds that continuing the resistance at Brest would divert Allied forces away from Germany.
_	This time, though, his defense counsel appealed the conviction to the Travis County Court of Law No. 1 on the grounds that Powell could not be arrested for being an alcoholic.
_	His proposals were rejected by Göring on the grounds that intruder operations were not his business.
_	Schmid did not receive substantive support from other field commanders, most notably Hans-Jürgen Stumpff, who objected to the operation after meeting with Schmid in January and February 1944 on the grounds that Hitler opposed such operations and newer German radar was not to fall into Allied hands.
_	When Formosus did not comply he was removed from the ranks of the clergy and excommunicated on the grounds that he had had deserted his diocese without papal permission; and had aspired to the position of Archbishop of Bulgaria.
_	Some do so on the grounds that seat belt laws infringe on their civil liberties.
_	When the blacksmith attacks Süß's coach with a sledgehammer, Süss has the blacksmith hanged on the grounds that an attack on the Duke's minister is tantamount to an attack on the Duke himself.
_	However his legal team launched a second judicial review in May 2006, on the grounds that McFarlane could not get a fair trial due to "systematic delays in bringing the prosecution".
_	However, Germany refused this request on the grounds that Haji Ahmadi is a German citizen.
_	The case was dismissed in October 2016 on the grounds that the plaintiffs were aware of Vibram's use of the name in 2011, but did not file suit until four years later.
_	U was deposed and replaced with his son, King Chang; together they were assassinated with poison one year later and replaced with Prince Gongyang on the grounds that he was of true royal descent.
_	He declined, on the grounds that his prototype suit was too heavy for a diver to handle easily, but was encouraged by the request to begin work on a new suit using lighter materials.
_	The owner challenged the charge on the grounds that the municipal law was a violation of his freedom of expression under section 2(b) of the "Charter".
_	Arnie declined to apologize, on the grounds that he was joking and not actually advocating violence against children.
_	In a free vote on abolition of the death penalty, Evans spoke loudly in support of retaining capital punishment on the grounds that public opinion was not supportive, and reported that the people to whom he spoke were concerned that too many condemned prisoners were being reprieved.
_	Metalist was expected to take fourth place (and subsequently compete in the UEFA Cup) by virtue of having the best three-way, head-to-head record among the three teams (which is the official tie-breaker to be used in domestic competitions), but following a protest by Metalurh Zaporizhzhya and an arbitrary decision by PFL (the administrative body of the UPL), Metalurh Zaporizhzhya was awarded fourth place on the grounds that it had better head-to-head records independently against either side.
_	Fadul's candidacy was rejected on the grounds that he was still President of the Tribunal of Accounts and a member of the Bar, which the Supreme Court judged to be legally incompatible with his presidential candidacy.
_	The candidacy of Aristides Gomes was also rejected on the grounds that he had been out of the country during the 90 days before he filed his candidacy.
_	After Livingstone won, Daisley pressed for his readmission into the Labour Party, on the grounds that Livingstone had "gone out of his way to be conciliatory".
_	In 1976, the United States Coast Guard attempted to assert jurisdiction over two of New Hampshire's interior waterways, Winnisquam Lake and Lake Winnipesaukee, on the grounds that they could be navigated via the Merrimack River, which empties into the Atlantic Ocean.
_	Attempts to deport him to Turkey, following convictions for drug trafficking offences, failed after Turkey in 2002 officially stripped him of his Turkish citizenship, on the grounds that he allegedly dodged the obligatory military service in Turkey.
_	This can be justified on the grounds that we can never know anything by direct experimentation about any part of the universe that is causally disconnected from the Earth, although many credible theories require a total universe much larger than the observable universe.
_	It also includes ordinary crimes, but perhaps with different standards of proof and punishment than for civilians, on the grounds that more is expected of military personnel by their oaths of office.
_	However Conway Morris (2006) criticized Vinther and Nielsen's classification of "Halkieria" as a crown group mollusc, on the grounds that the growth of the spicules in the aplacophorans and polyplacophorans is not similar to the method of growth deduced for the complex halkieriid sclerites; in particular, he said, the hollow spines of various molluscs are not at all like the halkieriid sclerites with their complex internal channels.
_	By the 2003 election the Social Democrats delivered in several protests against the Democrats' lists on the grounds that it was the Social Democrats who had initially registered the name Democrats.
_	Greatness and pettiness are demonstrable among the Academy members, even during the first decade during which William James declined his nomination on the grounds that his little brother Henry had been elected first.
_	A Court majority denied that a municipal ordinance that required all employees to execute oaths that they had never been affiliated with Communist or similar organizations, violated the clause, on the grounds that the ordinance merely provided standards of qualifications and eligibility for employment.
_	In this case, the Supreme Court struck down an order by the Subversive Activities Control Board requiring members of the Communist Party to register with the government and upheld an assertion of the privilege against self-incrimination, on the grounds that statute under which the order had been issued was "directed at a highly selective group inherently suspect of criminal activities."
_	Barr's "inmate grievance" was dismissed on the grounds that his injury was a result of diabetes.
_	Representing himself during the two-hour hearing, Jeyaretnam appealed on the grounds that he wanted another chance to contribute to society.
_	Bishop Swan was the lead plaintiff in a 1996 federal lawsuit against the city of Springfield, MA seeking to declare the at large representation system unconstitutional on the grounds that it diluted the votes of African Americans, Latinos, and other communities of color.
_	Bank Melli was included in these sanctions, on the grounds that, besides its other customers, Bank Melli provides financial services to Iran's nuclear and ballistic missile programmes.
_	He declined however, on the grounds that they would be setting up in opposition to some of his old friends who had just set up their own "Co-operative Printers' Association" in London, which he joined as a rank and file printer.
_	He was criticised by campaigners on the grounds that “we should be encouraging more people to use the roads, not less”, while it was subsequently revealed that Smith had recently called for £11.5 million in grant funding for the city’s cycling strategy, such as creating new cycle lanes, to be diverted elsewhere.
_	The Center, acting on behalf of Bronshtein's mother and sister, appealed his execution, rescheduled for 4 May 1999, to the Pennsylvania Supreme Court on the grounds that Bronshtein was not competent to refuse further appeals.
_	Work eventually started in 1855 on a hill of the grounds that overlooks the Royal Tasmanian Botanical Gardens and the Derwent estuary.
_	This role enabled him to escape conscription on the grounds that he was conducting work of ‘national importance’.
_	That did not lead, however, to invalidation of all drug patents on the grounds that the inventors "merely discovered that certain chemicals interact with the human body in ways directed by chemistry," at least not as of 2015.
_	After his release from prison, Mendoza-Martinez was ordered deported on the grounds that he was not a US citizen (part of the Selective Training and Service Act, as amended by the Immigration and Nationality Act of 1952, stripped draft dodgers of their citizenship).
_	In March 2001, the Taliban destroyed two giant pre-Islamic Buddha statues carved into cliffs in Bamiyan province, on the grounds that statues are idolatrous and insulting to Islam.
_	On 15 May 2007, acting on the advice of Batra, the Chief Minister of Madhya Pradesh Shivraj Singh Chouhan removed sex education from the state curriculum on the grounds that it offended Indian values.
_	A higher French court upheld the verdict but reduced the fine from 50,000 francs to 3 francs, or less than US$1, on the grounds that trial publicity had helped Kravchenko sell books.
_	The bar association initiated disbarment proceedings against Karst on the grounds that his slurs against Judge Humphries constituted misconduct.
_	Chinese sports officials delivered a letter of protest on the grounds that political activities violated the spirit of the Olympics and were banned in the charter of the International Olympic Committee and the Olympic Council of Asia.
_	Nagaoka rejected Thomson's model on the grounds that opposite charges are impenetrable.
_	June, proposals were made by the French to the advanced posts of the Brunswick Corps commanded by Prince Frederick of the Netherlands near Valenciennes, as also to those of the Prussian I Corps commanded by General Zieten, for a suspension of hostilities, upon the grounds that Napoleon had abdicated in favour of his son; that a Provisional Government had been appointed, and that these persons had sent ministers to the Coalition Powers to treat for peace.
_	After being cleared, Di Pietro started a political career, something he had previously excluded on the grounds that he did not want to exploit the popularity he had gained while doing what he perceived to be just his duty.
_	The government opposed this on the grounds that it would weaken the function of the inter-parliament Council of Ireland, but it was passed, as was an amendment adding a Senate of Northern Ireland.
_	The case was remanded to the District Court, which did not apply the superior court's criteria (on the grounds that in the interim, the Supreme Court had changed the applicable law).
_	Turei justified her actions on the grounds that she and her young daughter depended on the Domestic Purposes Benefit.
_	In January 2008 a petition to matriculate armorial bearings for the City of Inverness was refused by Lord Lyon King of Arms on the grounds that there is no legal persona to which arms can be granted.
_	When it was put before the legislature, NDP MLA Elijah Harper refused to grant unanimous leave for emergency debate, on the grounds that the deal did not recognize the position of aboriginals in Canada's constitutional framework.
_	Congress passed two such measures by wide margins during Bill Clinton's presidency, but Clinton vetoed those bills in April 1996 and October 1997 on the grounds that they did not include health exceptions.
_	However, Smithers calls off the beating on the grounds that is no way to thank the man who saved Mr. Burns' life, and instead convinces Mr. Burns to instead reward the Simpson family.
_	"The "Ethics" does not end at its apparent peak, identifying perfect happiness with the life devoted to "theōria"; instead it goes on to introduce the need for a study of legislation, on the grounds that it is not sufficient only to know about virtue, but one should try to put that knowledge to use."
_	On March 30, 2016, prosecutors in Maui moved to dismiss the domestic abuse charges on the grounds that his wife was refusing to cooperate as a witness.
_	While the Ivy League institutions settled, MIT contested the charges on the grounds that the practice was not anticompetitive because it prevented bidding wars over promising students from consuming funds for need-based scholarships and ensured the availability of aid for the greatest number of students.
_	In March 2012, the number of communes was drastically reduced to 197 on the grounds that in many cases, they were now an economically unfeasible level of government.
_	The British Ornithologists' Union's Taxonomic Records Committee's decision to accept this split has been questioned on the grounds that the differences in the male courtship displays may be functionally trivial, and would not prevent interbreeding, whereas a difference in a pre-copulation display "would" indicate that the two are separate species.
_	In February 2013, during a London Assembly meeting following the publication of the 2014 budget for London, Johnson was ejected from the meeting following a vote and on the grounds that his Deputy Victoria Borwick had left the chamber.
_	In addition to the program itself, the involvement of Poindexter as director of the IAO also raised concerns among some, since he had been earlier convicted of lying to Congress and altering and destroying documents pertaining to the Iran-Contra Affair, although those convictions were later overturned on the grounds that the testimony used against him was protected.
_	Charles VII won an additional advantage when he was able to secure the exclusion of Maria Theresa from the election, on the grounds that the succession to Bohemia remained unsettled.
_	The series was originally set to broadcast as two feature-length episodes, but due to local elections taking place on the day the first episode was due to be broadcast, 4 May 2000, the series was pulled from the schedules at the last minute, on the grounds that it may be in breach of rules on political bias.
_	During the winter of 1774-1775, Louis XVI ordered the replanting of the gardens on the grounds that many of the trees were diseased or overgrown and needed to be replaced.
_	In July 2017, Union Minister of Women and Child Development Maneka Gandhi suggested the legalization of medical marijuana on the grounds that it would reduce drug abuse and aid cancer patients at the second meeting of the group of ministers to examine the draft Cabinet note for the National Drug Demand Reduction Policy.
_	MacDonald was a keen golfer and his sons also played at the club, but in August 1915 a group of members submitted a motion to remove his name from the roll of members on the grounds that the club's character was damaged.
_	The Australian Chiefs of Staff initially supported the proposal to send both convoys to the UK on the grounds that it would result in the brigades being deployed to the main theatre of war, would ease the problems associated with equipping these units and would encourage volunteers for another AIF division which was being formed at the time.
_	He later protested against funding for the Calgary Birth Control Association in 1988, on the grounds that the organization provided abortion counselling.
_	Ghannouchi argued for these accommodating measures against more purist party members on the grounds that the country was still too fragile, and the economy too much in need of reform, for Ennahda to be in opposition.
_	Despite her support for Azami's installment as the new Headmaster (having only supported his installment on the grounds that it'd 'shake things up'), she is not fully influenced by Azami's ideals: she disagrees with the expulsion of Isshiki, Megishima, and Kuga from the Council of Ten; is reluctant to wear Central's badge; and gives easy tests to Takumi and Megumi in the third phase of the Promotional Exam.
_	Shiites in Saudi Arabia were very receptive to Ruhollah Khomeini and his attacks on the Saudi royal family on the grounds that Islam and hereditary kingship are not compatible.
_	The Australian Capital Territory passed a same-sex marriage law in December 2013, though this was struck down by the High Court on the grounds that such a law could only be introduced by the Commonwealth.
_	In 1959, a request for reparations was submitted to the Japanese government, but Japan refused them on the grounds that Singapore was still a crown colony of Britain, and they had already paid reparations to Britain in 1951.
_	Despite overwhelming circumstantial evidence, Mason secures his client's acquittal on the grounds that no body has been found and there are no eyewitnesses to the woman's death.
_	Fraser applied to the High Court for leave to appeal to the Judicial Committee of the Privy Council on the grounds that his case involved a devolution issue, namely that his prosecution and conviction had infringed his rights under Article 6 of the European Convention on Human Rights.
_	His application was refused as incompetent by the Appeal Court on 24 March 2009, on the grounds that the issues had already been determined in the earlier appeal proceedings and that Parliament had not intended, in the Scotland Act 1998, to allow the Privy Council to review the merits of decisions of the Appeal Court.
_	Such substitution is widely prohibited or discouraged in motor vehicle air conditioning systems, on the grounds that using flammable hydrocarbons in systems originally designed to carry non-flammable refrigerant presents a significant risk of fire or explosion.
_	Ashour was critical of the redistricting on the grounds that the districts were uneven in size: "No one in the chamber is opposed to the five constituencies, but there are differences about the geographic distribution."
_	In May 1937, Beck refused an order to draw up orders for executing "Fall Otto" (Case Otto), the German plan for an invasion of Austria under the grounds that such a move might cause a world war before Germany was ready for such a war.
_	Burke later claimed that about this time Margaret Hare suggested killing Helen McDougal on the grounds that "they could not trust her, as she was a Scotch woman", but he refused.
_	However, Peugeot protested on the grounds that in France it had exclusive rights to car names formed by three numbers with a zero in the middle.
_	It was suppressed following the British–American backed coup d'état in 1953 and was outlawed in 1957, on the grounds that it had an alliance with the Tudeh Party of Iran ten years earlier.
_	A final decision not to publish was taken by Long on the grounds that an official account of the whole naval war was anyway to be published by Sir Julian Corbett.
_	""He was assigned detention on the grounds that he might flee and/or influence witnesses.
_	Although the ministry has announced no firm plans to construct the proposed road, Elliot Lake City Council passed a motion in August 2015 calling for the project's revival on the grounds that it would provide significant economic benefit to both communities.
_	The appellants appealed on the grounds that there was an improper duplication of charges as all the acts alleged in the charges were done with a single intent and in the course of a single criminal transaction and that they should be regarded as involving only one offense.
_	According to official results he defeated Movement for Democratic Change (MDC) candidate Iain Kay with 19,912 votes against Kay's 10,066 votes; this victory was questioned on the grounds that the total number of votes was said to exceed voter turnout.
_	Assemblyman Arnold Proskin (R)-Colonie, whose district included portions of the proposed preserve, opposed on the grounds that the bill was creating another state agency (like the Adirondack Park Agency) that would wrest control from local communities over their development.
_	For example, Chief Justice Warren Burger was an outspoken critic of the exclusionary rule, and Justice Scalia criticized the Court's decision in "Boumediene v. Bush" for being "too protective" of the rights of Guantanamo detainees, on the grounds that habeas corpus was "limited" to sovereign territory.
_	It was also opposed by several leading potential candidates for the Republican nomination in the 2012 presidential election, including Mitt Romney, typically on the grounds that it did not make the Bush tax cuts permanent and that it would overall increase the national deficit.
_	At the start of the resumed game, Martin tried to protest on the grounds that Brett had missed a base.
_	Both purport to come from a prosecution of Aristogeiton initiated by Lycurgus on the grounds that Aristogeiton had initiated prosecutions and made speeches in the assembly when he was disenfranchised.
_	Pashupatas disapproved of Vaishnava theology, known for its doctrine servitude of souls to the Supreme Being, on the grounds that dependence upon anything could not be the means of cessation of pain and other desired ends.
_	In an August 2009 article for "TIME", titled "A Brief History of Wikipedia", journalist Dan Fletcher noted, "In May, Wikipedia banned IP addresses owned by the Church of Scientology on the grounds that Scientologists were making edits that didn't suggest a 'neutral point of view' — the encyclopedia's golden rule."
_	Although Landreville was acquitted on charges of influence peddling resulting from his involvement in the scandal, he was subsequently induced to resign from the Supreme Court of Ontario bench on the grounds that his conduct had fallen beneath the standards of probity expected of a judge.
_	One of the earliest cases was "Keaveney v. Geraghty", where the plaintiff's libel proceedings were stayed on the grounds that they were frivolous, vexatious, and an abuse of the process of the court.
_	De Hauteclocque then offered his own services to the unit, but its commander, "Colonel" Raoul Magrin-Vernerey, rejected his offer on the grounds that he was high-born, over-qualified and a cavalryman.
_	Pepper was favored by Lucy herself; however, CBS refused on the grounds that Pepper suffered from a drinking problem too, which was far more severe than Frawley's.
_	In February 1917, the Army revoked Gardiner's Medal of Honor on the grounds that there was no record in the archives of its having been issued.
_	More recently, dominant white and sabino were distinguished from one another on the grounds that dominant white alleles produce nonviable embryos in the homozygous state, while "Sabino 1" was viable when homozygous.
_	Justice Thomas refused to let them file the appeal, on the grounds that the trial court record was incomplete since it only included the judge's ruling.
_	However, residents objected to the plan on the grounds that it aggrandized and insulated the mayor from his constituents; that the location, rather than symbolizing D.C.'s economic and ethnic diversity, would place the mayor in one of the city's whitest, wealthiest, and most exclusive communities; and, especially, that the Casey Foundation's plan required the acquisition of four acres of national park land to be used as private grounds for the mansion.
_	Naval officials reviewed the report and requested Dewey to not release it on the grounds that it would be a public-relations disaster for the Navy and it might damage future similar war efforts.
_	Parwez's position is contrasted with the traditionalists like Mawdudi, who were criticized by Parwez on the grounds that their system is essentially the same as capitalism.
_	The Project 25 design was then rejected on the grounds that it was too weak compared to foreign ships and the whole program was cancelled in early 1938 after an attempt to modify the design with larger guns had been made.
_	In 1966, Howard Hughes attempted to buy the Stardust for $30.5 million, but was thwarted by government officials on the grounds that his acquisition of any more gambling resorts might violate the Sherman Antitrust Act.
_	However, this election was disallowed by the Commons on the grounds that a sitting member was not eligible to be returned for a second constituency.
_	But Islamic philosophers such as al-Farabi and Ibn Sina vehemently rejected this Pythagorean doctrine. in "Kitab al-Musiqa al-Kabir" Al-Farabi rejected the notion of celestial harmony on the grounds that it was "plainly wrong" and that it was not possible for the heavens, orbs and stars to emit sounds through their motions.
_	Fan Noli, an idealist, rejected demands for new elections on the grounds that Albania needed a "paternal" government.
_	This relationship has been called under scrutiny on the grounds that UNF Proselytizing and the laws of the United States regarding the secular nature of congressional funding.
_	In February 2011, 14 former students of ECA's Virginia College in Jackson, Mississippi sued the school on the grounds that it had not yet received its practical nursing program accreditation from the Mississippi Community College Board (formerly State Board for Community and Junior Colleges in Mississippi).
_	In 1908 Franz Joseph ordered that the baptismal records of the children be altered, and that the children be given the surname of their mother "Skublics" on the grounds that no marriage had ever taken place.
_	The US Court of Appeals for the First Circuit in Boston overturned Lisi's decision to dismiss the case and it was sent back for trial in Providence on the grounds that the police department failed to properly train one of the officers.
_	Haig defended Gough to Lloyd George during a car journey (3 April) – he recorded that Lloyd George was looking for a scapegoat for the manpower problem and for his attempts to redeploy divisions to the Middle East contrary to Robertson's advice, and that Lloyd George demanded Gough's dismissal on the grounds that he had neither held nor destroyed the Somme bridges.
_	Theodore II Palaiologos, the scholar Gemistos Plethon advises against the maintenance of a navy, on the grounds that resources were insufficient to adequately maintain both it and an effective army.
_	In all hearings it was contended on behalf of Oppenheimer that on the authority of "Rex v Home Secretary, ex parte L." [1945] 1 K.B. 7, and "Lowenthal v Attorney General" [1948] 1 All E.R. 295, Oppenheimer's purported loss of German citizenship under the decree of 1941 could not be recognised by English courts and that irrespective of German law, under English law he remained a German national after 25 November 1941 on the grounds that English law did not recognise a change of nationality by a decree of a foreign enemy state in wartime, and English law would not give effect, as far as it related to matters in England, to a penal and confiscatory decree of a foreign country.
_	ONDCP supporters such as Representatives Tom Davis and Mark Edward Souder have dismissed such criticism on the grounds that the ONDCP is expressly authorized by law to conduct anti-drug media campaigns.
_	In 2010, the Supreme Court of India held his expulsion unconstitutional on the grounds that it was excessive and unconstitutional.
_	On January 23, 1997, on the grounds that filmmakers and production companies are protected by the First Amendment, the case was dismissed, but Byers immediately appealed the decision, and on May 15, 1998, the Intermediate Louisiana Court of Appeals overturned that decision, claiming that Byers did indeed have a valid case against the filmmakers (However, Byers herself died of cancer in late 1997).
_	However, on March 12, 2001, judge Robert Morrison dismissed the case on the grounds that there was no evidence that either Time Warner or Stone intended to incite violence.
_	During the trial, they were subpoenaed to testify for the prosecution, but Horn refused to testify at the trial on the grounds that her forced testimony would threaten intellectual and academic freedom.
_	Then President Ludwig Scotty had reportedly resisted on the grounds that it was "none of Australia's business".
_	South Australian Chief Justice Len King agreed that Miller should be granted another hearing on the grounds that the judge at his trial, Mr Justice Matheson, had instructed the jury to find Miller guilty of murder.
_	Such interpretations have been criticized on the grounds that "all" is not a word that constitution-makers use lightly.
_	Head coach Nick Saban attempted to challenge Miller's touchdown reception on the grounds that he stepped out of bounds before reaching the goal line (which television replays proved was correct), however, officials failed to see Saban throw the red flag before the Steelers kicked the extra point, and the Dolphins were unable to challenge the call.
_	However, it was done so on the grounds that the Montanan constitution of 1889 did not grant the legislature the power to tax individual persons; and attempts to define it as a policing measure for matters of public health as opposed to a revenue measure were found invalid.
_	The University's Student Union campaigned against the motion on the grounds that it would have an adverse impact on graduate student housing and finance.
_	In August, 2010, the Constitutional Court rejected the vice president's complaint on the grounds that the columnist was "protected by the right to freedom of thought".
_	In 2007, tenants sought a reduction in rents on the grounds that a reduction in building security constituted a reduction in building-wide services, and got a ruling in their favor from the DRA (Directory and Resource Administrator).
_	In May 1980, a group of business owners sued Metro on the grounds that the decision to change the course of the Green Line was illegal because it had been undertaken without a public hearing (in violation of Metro's rules).
_	When Walker is called up, he applies to the Military Service Hardship Committee, who reject him on the grounds that he doesn't keep books for his business.
_	On his return to the army, which he found at Sinope, he was chosen commander-in-chief, Xenophon having declined the position for himself on the grounds that he was not a Spartan.
_	For twenty-four years (1852–1875) he was examiner in midwifery to the Royal College of Surgeons, resigning with his colleagues William Overend Priestley and Robert Barnes in protest at Sophia Jex-Blake and other women being admitted to the college examination in midwifery, on the grounds that they were otherwise qualified in medicine or surgery.
_	In his "Encyclopedic Handbook of Cults in America" he articulated the distinction on the grounds that the two movements operate with very different epistemologies, motives and methods.
_	The umpire gave Wisden out, saying on the grounds that Buttress (Caesar's runner) and Wisden had not crossed.
_	In 2007 an Argentine judge ordered her arrest over the forced disappearance of an activist in February 1976, on the grounds that the disappearance was authorized by her signing of decrees allowing Argentina's armed forces to take action against "subversives".
_	In Israel, where a high concentration of such firms can be found, binary options trading was prohibited for Israeli customers in March 2016 on the grounds that it is a form of gambling and not a legitimate investment technique.
_	Within a week, the Indian government hanged Maqbool Bhat, who was waiting optimistically for the review petition against his sentence on the grounds that the case had several legal flaws from its very beginning in 1966.
_	His appeal was based on the grounds that the original verdict was unsafe and unsatisfactory, and that the judge failed to uphold the submission that there was no case to answer.
_	The judge, Jeremy Cooke, rejected a plea in mitigation from Amir that he had been involved in spot-fixing on only one occasion, on the grounds that the contents of text messages submitted as evidence suggested otherwise.
_	Seddon refused Barron the pension normally available to civil servants on the grounds that, as an officer of Parliament, he was not eligible.
_	Johnny Jolin announced on Facebook, Twitter and his official website that he was "retiring from playing music live as Johnny Jolin or in any other form" upon the grounds that God had convicted him of pride.
_	The legitimacy of the empire is explored in several passages, notably in the speech at 1.73–78, where an anonymous Athenian legation defends the empire on the grounds that it was freely given to the Athenians and not taken by force.
_	Some colleges and universities have banned Greek letter organizations on the grounds that they are, by their very nature and structure, elitist and exclusionary.
_	In April 1963, the United States Congress also decided to cut funding to the Ranger program by nearly 50% on the grounds that "no success had been achieved with any of the missions to date".
_	At around the time the decision to purchase the ships was made, many defence analysts advocated for acquiring a larger number of smaller vessels on the grounds that this would be better suited to conditions in Australia's region.
_	The IDF said most of those killed were likely shot by the Lebanese Armed Forces (LAF) and that they had a video that established this, but would not release it on the grounds that it might cause embarrassment to the Lebanese Army.
_	Tarak Nath Das urged Japan to align with Germany, on the grounds that American war preparation could actually be directed against Japan.
_	In June 2006, a federal judge rejected Newdow's Establishment Clause lawsuit on the grounds that the minted words amount to a secular national slogan, and do not dictate anyone's beliefs.
_	On 14 September 2015, a prosecutor ordered the impounding of all copies of the magazine "Nokta", which had published an issue containing a photoshopped picture of Recep Tayyip Erdoğan taking a selfie in front of a soldier's funeral, on the grounds that it had 'insulted the President' and acted as 'propaganda for an armed terrorist organisation'.
_	Sony Music Taiwan disputed the case on the grounds that they had purchased the rights from Universal Music, as "Love and Remember" was partly based on Curtis McKonly's arrangement of the Christmas carol "The First Noel".
_	In 1980 in "Chavis v. State of North Carolina", 637 F.2d 213 (4th Cir., 1980), the convictions were overturned by the federal appeals court, on the grounds that the prosecutor and the trial judge had both violated the defendants' constitutional rights.
_	Unfortunately for the ParaRoos, ranked tenth in the world, in July 2014, the Australian Sports Commission cut funding for the 7-a-side soccer program on the grounds that the team was unlikely to make the 2016 Summer Paralympics.
_	In July 2017, a lawsuit was brought in U.S. District Court against the heads of the DEA and Justice Department on the grounds that Schedule I listing of cannabis is "so irrational that it violates the U.S. Constitution".
_	The notice was served on the grounds that the trust's members had not sought permission from KiwiRail to access the site; one of the trust members responded by saying the trust had become concerned with the neglected state of the site and the potential fire risk, and had stepped in to clean the site up.
_	He launched his own landscaping business at the age of 10 but received a letter from the lawyer of a local landscaping company accusing him of stealing clients and demanding that he stop doing business on the grounds that he had no valid tax number.
_	While several zoos in Taiwan made bids to host the pandas, the ROC government raised objections, ostensibly on the grounds that pandas were not suited to the Taiwanese climate and that Taiwan did not have the expertise to rear pandas successfully.
_	However, on March 27, 1989, after the judge responsible for the case was replaced, the Araguaia guerrilla case was dismissed without ruling on the merits, on the grounds that it was legally and physically impossible to comply with the request.
_	Kilkenny won the game by 3–5 to 2–6; however, Dublin objected on the grounds that Kilkenny were late taking the field.
_	At trial, Neville filed a motion to suppress all evidence associated with his refusal to take a blood alcohol test on the grounds that it violated his privilege against self incrimination.
_	Since the party's formation, it has objected to every proposed state budget on the grounds that they have discriminated against the Arab population.
_	Greene had declined on the grounds that "It's Alive" consisted entirely of songs from the first three Ramones albums, which had already been covered by Screeching Weasel, the Vindictives, and the Queers, though Rev. Nørb suspected that it was really because Greene did not want to finance a double live album.
_	Initially, the MSPB's presiding officials sided with the employers on the grounds that selection of a penalty was a matter of agency discretion.
_	In 2006 he launched another campaign to have traffic light surveillance cameras declared illegal on the grounds that they have not been formally approved by Parliament.
_	He turned down a place at Balliol College, Oxford, on the grounds that the facilities' heating was not good enough.
_	They distinguished the two on the grounds that 'Bonding is a mature form of loving.
_	There had been an attempted run with a mineral train on 7 July 1884 but it was detained by the GWR on the grounds that the company operating the train did not have the Parliamentary right to use the GWR track.
_	Asanga, like Vasubandhu, refuse the pandaka recognition as a layman on the grounds that such persons are unfit to associate with or serve the Sangha.
_	The decision was based on the grounds that Hynie's previous marriage was invalid and that James Brown had abandoned his efforts to annul his own marriage to Hynie.
_	On March 26, 2009, the Pennsylvania Supreme Court accepted Grim's recommendations and threw out hundreds of Civarella's juvenile convictions on the grounds that the defendants' rights had been violated.
_	He appealed based on the grounds that his trial counsel Rensch was ineffective in failing to object to the introduction of the videotaped statement, that he failed to object to hearsay statements of Anna Mae Aquash, failed to object to hearsay instruction for the jury, and failed to object to leading questions by the prosecution to Robert Ecoffey.
_	The following day they were arrested by the Swiss police on the grounds that they had made use of false identities.
_	At a December 2008 meeting of the Executive Policy Committee, Wyatt and fellow councillor Mike Pagtakhan unexpectedly voted against a $476.1 million public works plan on the grounds that it did not provide sufficient resources for bicycle and pedestrian trails.
_	Various singers were investigated by international law enforcement agencies such as Scotland Yard, on the grounds that the lyrics incited the audience to assault homosexuals.
_	He has written extensively on international criminal justice, condemning the International War Crimes Tribunal in The Hague on the grounds that the UN Security Council resolution that created it was illegitimate (the Security Council acted "ultra vires" by creating it) and because he disagrees with its judicial procedures, for example admissibility of hearsay evidence.
_	In the Catholic Church, the belief that one religion is as good as another, and that all religions are equally valid paths to salvation, is believed to be obviously false, on the grounds that nobody honestly believes that, for instance, a religion based on human sacrifice and the subjugation of rivals is as good, true, and beautiful as one based on heroic love of God and neighbor.
_	During the civil suit the judge required Adams to name his sources, but allowed Bennett to refuse to testify on the grounds that doing so might reveal secrets that would put national security at risk.
_	The granting of leave to appeal on the grounds that the case creates a precedent always suggests that the decision of the Supreme Court has general legal relevance.
